Is there an important difference between the perspective where this decision is arbitrary (i.e. the age of majority could have been 25) and the perspective where it isn’t (i.e. in this jurisdiction the 22 year-old is old enough, and that’s the end of the matter)?
I think that most of the time there is a difference. 
The governing authority made a moral decision regarding the age of majority in its constrained arbitrary decision. The parties subject to the law, I'd imagine (in most cases), are merely following the rules as it relates to his or her particular interest at the time.
So while the ruling authority is actually making a choice with regard to the specific issue (i.e. the age of majority), the 21y/o clerk is not making a decision at all if he or she is just verifying some dates processing paperwork.
This is the most popular view, and mine as well. But there's an interesting twist to it. From the one perspective, that of the legislators debating on the law, it's an open question how to treat the 21 year-old trying to sign a contract. From the other perspective, that of the clerk, it is settled that they have majority. So, while the legislator and the clerk agrees on the age of majority, they disagree about the status this judgement has: for the legislator it's settled undetermined, for the clerk it's determined. But very often we discriminate between practical guidance based not just on its content but on the background features, like the source of the guidance (you may follow some advice because it comes from a trusted friend, but ignore an order that comes for an authority that you're not subject to). The discussion piece is written because of the widespread thought that arbitrary decisions are less deserving of respect than ones determined by principle. But this kind of status becomes hard to pin down if it's something that changes depending on the perspective you're in. In particular, it's possible for someone to succeed in doing something but to not know (or even be mistaken about) the background features of the act they're doing. Tyler Burge has an example of an isolated society that thinks that the language they speak is the only possible language, determined by nature. These people will be mistaken about whether their language is conventional, but nonetheless they speak a conventional language just like the rest of us. So, either we need a much better theory about what kinds of background features are relevant and when and how, or we need to give up that these background features are as important as people often take them to be.
the widespread thought that arbitrary decisions are less deserving of respect than ones determined by principle.
I don't understand why this is so. 
It seems to me that the sort of thinking involved when making the constrained arbitrary decisions that we're discussing demands more, mentally, from the decision-maker than do decisions made by simply following pre-determined rules.
You don't understand why arbitrary decisions are meant to be less respectable? Or something else? As for why it's meant to be less respectable, I'm just reporting on a (widespread!) sentiment. Outside of mathematical and logical contexts, 'arbitrary' is almost always used in a perjorative sense (e.g. every sense and synonym given in the linked dictionary entry). The thought presumably is that arbitrary decisions are to be contrasted to principled ones, and accordingly are bad by being unprincipled. The model I offer here (which appears in some form or another in a lot of places, the earliest I've found is in Aquinas) is where we can have decisions that are both principled and arbitrary to some extent, and play an important role in our moral lives.
widespread!
Smh.
Don't get me wrong, I too think principled choices are important (it would be impractical to dwell on every decision, especially if immediate action is called for). But, I guess I don't get hung-up on the word "arbitrary" as much as others. At my current job we talk a lot about the arbitration and adjudication of certain claims that we... uh, arbitrate. So, the word has pretty much lost it's negative connotations, for me.
Edit: added the word "that"
One of the interesting things that arises in law is this cool tension between casuistry and rules. Obviously, we like the idea of like cases being decided in like manners. It appeals to some intuitive notion of what "fairness" is. But a trick that advocates use is to frame the level of generality in such a way as to make like cases seem unlike (by focusing with more granularity) or make dissimilar cases seem more similar (by focusing with a wider scope). This leads us into case-based reasoning, where these "arbitrary" decisions seem to evaporate as every case can be limited strictly to its facts.
On the other hand, we like "bright-line" rules because they're such good predictive tools for modulating our own behavior. The drinking age is 21? Cool. It's illegal to drink before your 21st birthday. 
There could be mature 18-year-olds and immature 23-year-olds, which, under a casuist system, would require some sort of individual testing before we decided when you had achieved majority. Such a thing would be feasible in a small universe of persons, but could you reasonable extrapolate that kind of testing across an entire society?
The reason the tension arises is because while we like the fundamental fairness of casuistry (everyone judged according to the unique facts) and feel that this eliminates the arbitrariness (read: unfairness) of certain moral judgments, we also know that at some point societies must make judgments with what you call "constrained arbitrariness" or what I would term "a zone of reasonable disagreement." That is, two reasonable legislators might each have independent reasons for wanting to set the drinking age at 18 and 21, and neither one of them is right, but just as importantly, neither one is wrong either.
So in the rush to eliminate unfairness from moral judgments (and therefore ensure only fair and just censure for moral/legal wrongs) we can do harm to necessity of actors to act with less-than-perfect determination of the most rational course. And that's fine; a slavish devotion to rationalism in all actions would lead to paralysis. 
But that raises further interesting questions. Of course we make no moral judgment against the state senator who votes to lower the drinking age to 18. Of course we make no moral sanction against the judge who makes a bad call in a hotly-contested family case.
But what about other cases? Let's say a jury convicts an innocent person on evidence which (as it almost always will) underdetermined the verdict, and sentenced this person to death. Do we maintain, as some jurists do, that our moral obligation was satisfied due to the nature of the process, and that the decision, which while "constrained, arbitrary" in the sense that the jurors had to make up their minds with less-than-perfect determination of the result, was nevertheless rational and reasonable given the evidence presented? I suspect this is a harder notion to answer, because our instinctive reaction is "no, an innocent died!," but our intuition on this could be flawed. 
In other words, arbitrariness presents a difficult nut to crack because it seems inherent in any decision-making system we can devise, because a system that does not allow and tolerate arbitrariness simply cannot function as the ratio decidendi for any given action is always underdeterminative.
Cool post - I'm not familiar with this stuff at all, so a couple fairly naive questions:
Is the undetermination metaphysical or epistemic? That is, when you claim that so-and-so principles don't uniquely determine, is that to be interpreted as a claim that the reasons really don't uniquely determine (the metaphysical sense) or that we just don't have enough information, and may never have, depending on the scenario, and so the case is epistemically underdetermined?
Do you think that the motivation to accept the arbitrary decision scenario will be influenced at all by how important the decisions are to us, in some sense or another? For example, consider the question of when life begins, and when an agent is capable of giving sexual consent. Both of these are obviously very important -- morally and practically -- and much more than at least the book example (my intuition is more important than the age of majority as well, but that's significantly more controversial). Further, both are plausible cases, provided I understand your account, of undetermination, either in the epistemic or metaphysical sense above. I think it's clear that people will be far more hostile to arbitrariness when it comes to these cases, and I'm wondering whether those intuitions track anything in the theory; that is whether there is some theoretical reason to avoid arbitrariness when the results have significant moral or practical import.
Another possible (and popular) way of using underdetermination is as a motivation for a sort of pluralism, where there are multiple correct answers.
I think this is just another way of restating his point. The way we would describe this in law is a "zone of reasonable disagreement," that is, if we look at all the possible decisions to be made on a graph, the rational answers (i.e., those for which law and evidence lends at least the required amount of support), they will form a plot where no decision is necessarily any better than the other. 
I don't think this pluralist account or the purported monist account really reach any difference in the end. The pluralist account is concerned with the logical value of decisions, while the monist account seems motivated by avoiding moral censure for acting on less-than-perfect information. Each one reaches the same endgame, however, which is that any decision-making process must tolerate some ambiguity in the result.
I think it's clear that people will be far more hostile to arbitrariness when it comes to these cases, and I'm wondering whether those intuitions track anything in the theory
The way I see it, those intuitions are related to our own nebulous ideas about things like justice, right, and fairness. There is no true theoretical reason to avoid arbitrariness. Arbitrariness just means reasoning becomes more case-based and less based on stated principles. It's a tension that arises in cases where we want the law to function not only as a descriptive tool but predictive so that we can understand how we should behave in society. On the one hand, when life begins seem ripe for a casuist explanation -- simply provide a list of criteria for when life is considered "viable" and leave it up to a doctor in each case to assess whether an abortion may be legally performed.
On the other hand, how many abortions are performed daily? Is this really something we can practically tolerate? What if the doctor is wrong? Isn't it better to have a bright-line rule, like a 20-week bill, that simply answers these questions?
The people in the first camp would respond that, no, fetal development, while following a general schedule, isn't absolutely regular and there's no guarantee a 20-week fetus won't be post-viability, or that a 23-week fetus wouldn't be pre-viability. And therefore it is unfair to those persons seeking abortions/the fetus/doctors etc. to impose upon them that kind of moral weight.
On the other hand, what can a bunch of politicians and bureaucrats know about the practice of medicine? Would a doctor violate her oath to perform a "technically" legal abortion on a fetus she deemed post-viable? 
There simply are no good solutions which satisfy those intuitions we have about morality. Either we choose predictive power (and hope that this helps people make "right" choices by encouraging them to be lawful) or we choose intuitive satisfaction (and hope that a deliberative and adjudicatory system can hope to function without guiding principles).
I agree with most of this, especially about what it says about pluralism vs monism. But I want to resist the following:
Arbitrariness just means reasoning becomes more case-based and less based on stated principles.
I don't think this. I don't think that it shows that practically we are required to resort to case-based reason as opposed to principled. I think that the arbitrary decisions are in an important sense an elaboration or even completion of the underspecified and underdetermining principles. It isn't a matter of principles vs. arbitration, but instead a matter of reconciling the two perspectives. This is what I take Aquinas's view to be in the Treatise on Law, at least regarding his model about where variation positive law comes from given the shared features of humans and human societies.
instead a matter of reconciling the two perspectives.
Right. That's why I said there's a tension between casuistry and bright-line principles. We are constantly trying to reconcile these two opposing ideas, and what results from this synthesis (!) is the human activity of law.
Is the undetermination metaphysical or epistemic? 
Won't this just depend on your account of vagueness? If you think vague predicates are vague because of epistemic reasons, then the underdetermination here is also epistemic. If you think vague predicates are vague because of the semantics and/or metaphysics, then the underdetermination here is also semantic/metaphysical.
At least, that's how the description in the OP strikes me. The example of the appropriate age to enter a contract seems like a textbook case of Sorites-like vagueness. That said, it'd be interesting to see fully fleshed out account of the relationships between underdetermination, arbitrariness, and vagueness.
Edit: I suppose this is only relevant to vagueness cases like the age of consent and whatnot. I suppose other examples, like the coordination game or maybe even the Critique decision, won't be subject to the same analysis as your account of vagueness.
You say that someone may complain that this model privileges monism. But the pressure goes in the exactly the opposite direction. The concerns surveyed here means that we need to add another kind of determinant to our understanding of how these decisions get made: take whatever you think the determinants of morality are, and add 'constrained arbitrary judgements' to that list. Constrained arbitrary decisions are also a very helpful model for how we can accommodate different and even incommensurate types of determinants into a single practical framework--after all, we can only live one life at a time.
The underdetermination is practical: the available reasons underdetermine what course of action to pursue. In some situations the epistemic underdetermination leads to practical underdetermination (especially in strategic cases--much of the literature deals with what epistemic features are needed to allow agents to make determinately correct decisions). I don't know what kind of metaphysical underdetermination may be at issue, and I say this as someone who has read a lot of Aristotle and Aquinas (who have metaphysically loaded practical philosophy). Aristotle and Aquinas (and many others) have explicit room for practical underdetermination in addition to the epistemic and metaphysical concerns they have in mind.
The motivations of people subject to the abitrary decisions don't really matter. There's a means-end structure in place here: in order to efficaciously act in strategic and underdetermined practical contexts means that you need to be sensitive to the arbitrary decisions in play here (and when there aren't any to draw on, you have no dependable method to efficacious action). In effect it makes the landscape of arbitrary decisions in your vicinity one of those mundane inputs that informs your practical reasoning: just like the nutritional content of the food available to you is a determinant in you deciding how to fulfil your duty to feed your children, just so the arbitrary decisions in your vicinity informs your decisions about how to pursue the ends you may have.
I formulated this question after replying to ADefiniteDescription. Does the literature treat cases of arbitrariness differently between  the constrained arbitrary laws case and the coordination case?
In the former, the arbitrariness of our decision seems to arise out of vagueness considerations. There's a number of different things we could say about the age of consent -- maybe the age of consent is fuzzy, maybe the age of consent hyper-ambiguous or supervalued or subvalued or whatever. Importantly, we could take the stance that there is a sharp cutoff point for the age of consent, but that we simply don't know it. If we take this stance, then it might not be the case that the age of consent is underdetermined in principle, and we could at least conceive of having reason to revise our arbitrary decision (say, in light of new evidence).
In the latter, the arbitrariness of our decision seems to arise out of something about the coordination problem itself. That is, even if you're an epistemicist about the vagueness, you can't really be an epistemicist about the problem of deciding which side of the road to drive on. It seems like we have all the information in this case, and this is underdetermined in principle. Here, we can't conceive of having reason to revise our arbitrary decision, since we have all the relevant information.
That is, there seems to be at least two kinds of arbitrariness, from two kinds of underdetermination. Can we really give a perspicuous account of arbitration without at least acknowledging this apparent difference? Or am I missing something which unifies these two cases?  
I formulated this question after replying to ADefiniteDescription. Does the literature treat cases of arbitrariness differently between the constrained arbitrary laws case and the coordination case?
This is a difficult question to answer, and the contrast you're after is hard to pin down. For instance, it's popular to treat laws as if they just are arbitrary decisions in the face of disagreement, in which case there isn't a contrast here (at the least this is an important motivation for legal positivism, but you don't need to be a legal positivist to appeal to this feature of law). There are many features of law that suggest that there is more going on with the law than just arbitration on reasonable disagreements (e.g. Andrei Marmor in the book I listed makes a lot about how codification turns things that used to be arbitrary into settled questions and allows for further development). But it seems hard to deny that whatever else the law does, it also offers responses to instances of underdetermination in strategic cases.
Just noting we're "closing the loop" here.
I believe most who get arrested for marijuana are opposed to the prohibition laws.  But hey... now they can't vote in favor of legalization. 
Given the number of people in American prisons, they'd be a non-negligible voting block. 
Or anywhere around the world for that matter
Not nearly as much
Yes and they'll vote for all sorts of privileges for themselves. They'd vote for lesser penalties. They'll vote to make prison a vacation, like the Cartels did in Columbia. They'll vote to make everything legalized and purge their records. 
There will be politicians fighting over the prison vote, making commercials about how they'll lessen penalties down to nothing. Until the point where there's no one left in prisons but crime rates, injuries, and death rates, are soaring. 
But I'm sure reddit will act like all the prisoners are there for simply smoking marijuana and shouldn't have been in prison in the first place.
Yes and they'll vote for all sorts of privileges for themselves. They'd vote for lesser penalties. They'll vote to make prison a vacation, like the Cartels did in Columbia. They'll vote to make everything legalized and purge their records. 
Is there a reason they shouldn't be allowed to do that?  It seems to me that people with skin in the game are the first people who should be given a say.
Anybody who understands what they are voting for should be able to vote.
So like 10% of the U.S. population.
If only this was logistically possible.  A merit-based direct democracy. People who demonstrate aptitude would be eligible to absorb otger people's votes who trust in their expertise.  Our representatives would be replaced by anyone who we trust to use our vote wisely on an issue-by-issue basis.  This person has a PHd in biology? 100, 000 people donate their vote to them to vote on legislation about stem cell research.  This person has 28 years experience researching oil industry regulation? 200,000 people give their vote to them.  Your merit based rep becomes corrupt? Give your vote to someone else that very day.  I realize this won't get rid of help the older folks who have already been indoctrinated into business-centric propoganda but it would be better in the long run.
Meritocracy is insane and far too easy to manipulate via the power of mass media.  It would also favor those with time to spend watching their government (IE, retirees)
I'd like to take a moment to talk about mandatory voting.
Where I'm from voting is mandatory. Actually, "mandatory" with scarequotes would be a better way to define it. Nothing really happens if you don't show up to vote, there's like an insignificant fine that you will have to pay the next time you want to make certain bureaucratic processes. It's really not meaningful, even for a poor person it's a negligible amount.
That being said, voting being mandatory has had profound cultural effects that I deem possitive. Down here, voting is something everyone does every single time it has to be done, period. This not only has a profound cultural impact, but also policy consequences. I'll list some:
For starters, ensuring that everyone, especially the working class, can vote unhindered, is one of the prime directives of the system. This is why polls open at 6am and close at 6pm, always on sundays for every vote, every time. That sunday is also like "half a holiday", businesses are encouraged to close at noon and reopen at like 4.
Ensuring that the polls can take the massive influx of everyone without hiccups is something that has been a prime directive of the system since the getgo. Every school becomes a voting hub, with each classroom becoming a private voting booth. 
The fact that you only vote in one place, and you always vote in the same place, and that the same last names are usually grouped in the same school brings about a "tradition" aspect that is not to be underestimated. A family voting together and having a big family lunch after or before, while following the ellection on TV is the most normal thing. Additionally, you will see neighbors, old friends and old classmates when you go vote, since everyone is there. It's a traditional social occasion. This wouldn't be true if it were optional and generations after generations had not "gotten used" to voting. We don't even question it.
Removing the right to vote to anyone is something so taboo that any candidate would pay a massive political cost just for saying it. Not only that, but I've seen stuff in the US that could not even happen here ever, the amount of outrage that just one person being denied a vote causes real, immediate political issues. Not only for people in jail, but people with criminal records, people with dubious identities. If you show up with your ID and you're a resident* of the country, you VOTE, there's no way around it, there is no one that can ever stop you for no reason, and this is a very strong political conviction in my society, and I have the intuition that it stems from the societal and cultural tradition that the mandatory vote establishes over a couple of generations. I get the feeling that not being able to vote in the US is not as much of a big deal.
The intuition that some people may have that "mandatory voting" has the consequence of people going in and voting "anything" I think are wrong. The fact that it's mandatory and knowing that you will do it forces you to at least make a cogent decision based on something. Your ideological affiliations, the stance of candidates in a particular issue that matters to you, whatever. Also, it needs to be demonstrated that the average voter of a "voluntary voting" democracy is more informed than the average voter of a "compulsory voting" democracy. I actually have a theory of why it may be the other way round: in a "voluntary voting" culture there is the necessary notion that you can just "not care about politics". You don't vote, you don't follow the issues, you don't give a shit, no one will ever ask you to participate, you just pay your taxes and be done with it. In a compulsory voting democracy, you will have to face some concrete responsibility for the outcome of the election (responsibility that the non-voter of a voluntary democracy of course shares, because his not-voting is a choice). I think this leads to superior overall political awareness in the normal person, which in turns results in a more politically active society, which leads to more informed voters.
Not voting is still an option. There are actually two ways of not voting: blank voting, which is inserting the envelope without any ballots inside of it, and then there's null vote, which is inserting something in the envelope that is not a ballot (some guy from TV said he had the tradition of printing out a picture of the three stooges and voting them).
Just my two cents from Argentina.
*EDIT: Changed "citizen" to "resident".
The people who choose not to vote are still voting. They fill their ballot with "I choose to cede my vote to the majority."
They win every time.
Your first four points are very strong though.
I wonder if there has been any analysis of the before/ after of countries which have implemented mandatory voting. Are there concrete benefits?
Nothing really happens if you don't show up to vote, there's like an insignificant fine... It's really not meaningful, even for a poor person it's a negligible amount... Down here, voting is something everyone does every single time it has to be done, period.
I don't see the connection between the fine and the 'turnout'.  You say it's negligible, then attribute a profound effect to it.  
If you show up with your ID and you're a citizen of the country, you VOTE, there's no way around it
That's actually more stringent than most of our current voting regulations.  
Not voting is still an option. There are actually two ways of not voting: blank voting, which is inserting the envelope without any ballots inside of it, and then there's null vote, which is inserting something in the envelope that is not a ballot (some guy from TV said he had the tradition of printing out a picture of the three stooges and voting them).
You either pay a penalty by taking time out of your day or paying a fine.  I'd rather have the freedom not to vote, if that is what I see fit. 
Some counties charge 10 cents per paper bag in grocery stores. This is negligible for most people...yet, it serves a constant reminder to do the right thing, and bring your own damn resusable bag.
I don't see the connection between the fine and the 'turnout'. You say it's negligible, then attribute a profound effect to it.
First, I think you underestimate the legal power of something being "mandatory" even if the punishment is insignificant. a lot of people do or don't do stuff because of it being legal or illegal without having a concern about the tradeoff relationship with the punishment. This has a ripple effect as the legal becomes customary. Especially in the case of it spanning multiple generations. What I mean is that when a child asks "why do you go vote?" and the dad says "because it's the law", the child doesn't ask "what exactly is the extent of the punishment? is it actually more expensive than ignoring the law?"
You seem to ignore that the profound effect that I describe is not exactly a direct relationship of the letter of the law but a cultural phenomenon, and I do state that quite clearly. 
Also, there are the facts: we have steady turnouts in the low 70% range. 
You either pay a penalty by taking time out of your day or paying a fine. I'd rather have the freedom not to vote, if that is what I see fit.
Yeah well I'm not a libertarian, and I don't consider preserving your "freedom" in whatever sense you're describing it here (which seems to be "ability to choose between options") is a societal value at all. You also don't have a choice between having and not having 15 Lamborghinis, and society nor the state give a crap about that.
Here we get into a political philosophy discussion that I really don't want to have, but let's just say that I don't think that what you'd rather do or not is a good criteria at all for what the State ought to do.
For example, I think a lot of people would rather not use helmets. I consider laws forcing people to use helmets, fining them when they don't, are perfectly ok and we should have them.
I don't think that what you'd rather do or not is a good criteria at all for what the State ought to do.
I cant think of a better criteria.
I consider laws forcing people to use helmets, fining them when they don't, are perfectly ok and we should have them.//
That's because you're an authoritarian. I guess the whole idea of "My body, my choice" doesn't count for anything, anymore.
First, I think you underestimate the legal power of something being "mandatory" even if the punishment is insignificant. 
This might be a cultural difference.  There are all sorts of things Americans are legally required to do, but would rather pay a small fine to avoid.  For instance, I am requied to pay my local taxes quarterly.  I just pay them at the end of the year and cough up a 20 dollar fine.  So do most people.  
a lot of people do or don't do stuff because of it being legal or illegal without having a concern about the tradeoff relationship with the punishment.
Some people do, and those people are idiots.  If you could make more at work during that amount of time than the cost of the fine, just stay at work.  If your free is more valuable to you than the cost of the fine, then just stay home.  It's a trade-off just like anything else.  To pretend that it deserves some sort of pseudo-religious reverence is just idiocy.  
Also, there are the facts: we have steady turnouts in the low 70% range.
I would attribute this more toward culture than the fine.  
Yeah well I'm not a libertarian, and I don't consider preserving your "freedom" in whatever sense you're describing it here (which seems to be "ability to choose between options") is a societal value at all. You also don't have a choice between having and not having 15 Lamborghinis, and society nor the state give a crap about that.
Freedom means to not be intervened with in your activities unless they harm others.  Not being free to have 15 Lamborghinis given to you is same as not being free to fly because you weren't born a bird- it's a ridiculous reappropriation of the term that causes it to become devoid of meaning.  
Here we get into a political philosophy discussion that I really don't want to have, but let's just say that I don't think that what you'd rather do or not is a good criteria at all for what the State ought to do.
Why should the state require me to vote under penalty of law?  Shouldn't I have a choice in the matter?  
For example, I think a lot of people would rather not use helmets. I consider laws forcing people to use helmets, fining them when they don't, are perfectly ok and we should have them.
It's not the governments job to protect you from yourself. 
It's also worth noting that all this added civic involvement hasn't made the Argentina government any less corrupt in recent years.  
Some people do, and those people are idiots.
Ok so that's as far as we go with reasonable discussion. Thanks for stopping by.
I would attribute this more toward culture than the fine.
And what do you attribute the culture to if not the law that started the custom in the first place? That "south americans are inherently more participatory in democracy"? LOL, it shows that you've never been down here. 
It seems like you're not even trying to read me.
Freedom means to not be intervened with in your activities unless they harm others.
Then I just need to say that your non-participation on the democratic process harms, and we're all good to go, no contradiction here.
It's not the governments job to protect you from yourself.
Says who?
Ok so that's as far as we go with reasonable discussion. Thanks for stopping by.
Or you could explain why the state deserves pseudo-religious reverence instead of the normal cost-benefit analysis we apply to everything else.  
And what do you attribute the culture to if not the law that started the custom in the first place? It seems like you're not even trying to read me.
Culture precedes laws.  It is more deeply rooted.  I would attribute it to a general deference to authority that has resulted in the widely known corruption in Argentina's government.  
Then I just need to say that your non-participation on the democratic process harms, and we're all good to go, no contradiction here.
Democratic process requires choice.  That includes the possibility of no choice or participation.  To the extent that this option is limited, you're idea of democracy is also limited. 
Says who?
See, even in the question you are looking toward an authority for the answer.  The simple fact is that politicians always think they know what is better for you, but mostly are out from themselves.  If you want a less corrupt government, limit the extent to which they can effect your life. 
If you want a less corrupt government, limit the extent to which they can effect your life.
If you want a less corrupt government buy a rifle and demolish the state by blood and fire, start over and see what we get.
EDIT: Also, it's "affect", not "effect".
http://www.nizkor.org/features/fallacies/slippery-slope.html
http://existentialcomics.com/comic/9
Actually, this is a textbook application. 
normal cost-benefit analysis we apply to everything else.
lol @ the notion of people doing cost-benefit analysis about stuff. PROTIP: they don't, they just do most shit irreflexively, you included. Sometimes, at really important stuff, you analyze cost benefit. This is, quite honestly, cartesian, "rational subject", 1850 modern philosophy bunk bullshit. People ain't rational. You ain't rational. We are sometimes rational, if we're lucky.
pseudo-religious reverence
Because it hits you with a fucking stick.
Culture precedes laws. 
Says who?
It is more deeply rooted.
Says who?
I would attribute to a general deference to authority that has resulted in the widely known corruption in Argentina's government.
I'm pretty sure you have 0 qualifications to spew the absolute unfounded bullshit you're spewing. It would post you to /r/badhistory if you had actually SAID something.
Democratic process requires choice. That includes the possibility of no choice or participation.
Says who?
To the extent that this option is limited, you're idea of democracy is also limited.
Of course my idea of democracy is "limited". Do you have an idea for an "Absolute" democracy? The REPUBLICAN SYSTEM is a limitation on democracy, dude. You're displaying MASSIVE amounts of ignorance here. You don't choose judges. You only rule through your representatives. The people can't choose to depose a president mid term even if 99% of people wouldn't vote for him today, etc etc etc etc.
Wow, dude, you really need to catch up on your political theory. You reek of libertarian naivety. Of course my idea of democracy is "limited", what other form of thinking about democracy could be there?
See, even in the question you are looking toward an authority for the answer.
You could've answered "Said me" and then provide an actual argument for what you stated. I would've taken that. It's quite obvious, though, that you READ someone said this shit and you're repeating it. If not, you would actually have arguments for the axiomatic assertions you make.
lol @ the notion of people doing cost-benefit analysis about stuff. PROTIP: they don't, they just do most shit irreflexively, you included. Sometimes, at really important stuff, you analyze cost benefit. This is, quite honestly, cartesian, "rational subject" bullshit. People ain't rational. You ain't rational. We are sometimes rational.
So your argument is that people are irrational, therefore they should vote instead of do the things that they would rather do?  And course intelligent people weigh the uses of their time.  Only a fool wouldn't, which of course reverts back to my original comment.  
Because it hits you with a fucking stick.
Yea, but in this case it's a really small, meaningless stick (by your own account).  
I'm pretty sure you have 0 qualifications to spew the absolute unfounded bullshit you're spewing. It would post you to /r/badhistory if you had actually SAID something.
This is great.  Threaten to send in the downvote brigade because I suggest what everyone already knows,  that Argentina's government is widely corrupt.  
http://www.transparency.org/cpi2014/infographic/regional/americas
Of course my idea of democracy is "limited". Do you have an idea for an "Absolute" democracy? The REPUBLICAN SYSTEM is a limitation on democracy, dude. You're displaying MASSIVE amounts of ignorance here. You don't choose judges. You only rule through your representatives. The people can't choose to depose a president mid term even if 99% of people wouldn't vote for him today, etc etc etc etc.
You think that if people have the right not to participate in or vote then they would also have the right to murder someone.  That's a bit of slippery slope you've got there. 
You could've answered "Said me" and then provide an actual argument for what you stated. I would've taken that.
I did provide an argument.  Let me provide it again:  
The simple fact is that politicians always think they know what is better for you, but mostly are out from themselves. If you want a less corrupt government, limit the extent to which they can effect your life.
The whole initial part of the conversation is just dumb, you just refure to see a connection between law, customs and culture, which is plainly blind. I'll let you go on analyzing the world with your libertarian rational premises and complaining that it doesn't add up to it.
that Argentina's government is widely corrupt.
I'm not contesting that the government is widely corrupt. I'm contesting your bullshit unfounded reasoning in which that was only a part of.
The simple fact is that politicians always think they know what is better for you, but mostly are out from themselves. If you want a less corrupt government, limit the extent to which they can effect your life.
You can do whatever you want, that's no good argument for not forcing you to choose between a fine and a vote from the perspective of the state. State forces people to do shit, it's what it does. You don't like it? Grab a gun and burn it down, I'll be cheering you on. I agree that you as an individual must exert political pressure towards making it worthwile for the state to stay off your hair. That says nothing about the state and what is good for the state. I never said they were out for your wellbeing.
If you want a less corrupt government, limit the extent to which they can effect your life.
If you want a less corrupt government buy a rifle and demolish the state by blood and fire. Right now you're a dude in Reddit that can't be bothered to go vote, I don't see how you get a right to complain. You're just a guy someone steals taxes from, with no voice.
That's actually more stringent than most of our current voting regulations.
I should've said "resident" actually, thanks.
I think he was referring to the requirement of providing ID. In the US, many states don't have ID laws (many do, of varying strictness), but the requirement for ID at the polls has historical connection to disenfranchisement and discrimination.
We have universal national ID since like forever. I'm guessing Americans would go all MUH FREEDOMS at the notion of a national ID?
Not that it would be wrong, had not thought about it in depth... but I'm not quite sure what the problem is with a national identity card.
Something like that. I know it seems strange to most non-Americans, because the common perception is that the USofA is a monolithic entity similar to how many other countries in the world are. But because the US has a federal system of government, this creates a very different situation legally, politically, historically, and culturally.
The idea of a national ID runs into the notions of Federal vs. State power in the U.S. The Constitution of the United States identifies the powers that the federal government has, and in theory, all powers not given to the federal government are retained by the individual states as specifically acknowledged by the 10th Amendment. There is thus also a long history of legal jurisprudence around interpreting that delineation, and under what circumstances and to what extent the federal government can "conscript" or force a state to do something (e.g., require IDs as almost all elections are 'run' at the state level).
Oh, I see. Another Federality thing. 
Can you maybe lay this out for me? I'm very familiar with the US system of government. And I'm indeed pretty sure that the USofA IS a monolithic entity exactly identical to how many (all) other countries in the world are. 
There is one guy that has the nuclear football. There is one guy calling the real shots. I'm not a specialist in this, so I wouldn't want to overstep, but it is pretty clear that at this point in history the "Federal" thing is a facade for placating internal, historically unresolved, political tensions.
Let me change the subject at hand to ask you share with you an outsiders opinion here:
The payoff for the "Federal" thing, pragmatically, seems at this point really really bad for the US. It seems that the most transcendental decisions that your society has to make are decisions done by 10 old, heavily partisan dudes, instead of any representative organ. The Supreme Court seems to be the one that is ultimately calling the internal, important, impactful to everyday life shots in the US.
Sure, Same-Sex Marriage came out right, but Citizens United? It seems that you're gambling your living conditions in a "Federality" that, essentially, is a regime that seems eerily similar to the Iranian government! You have what is a council of wise old men that are in their chairs forever that are the Mujaidin Guardians of the Revolution, but they aint defending something religious but something more like muh state freedom.
I mean, if I'm not wrong you can't actually chase a murderer through state lines? What actual benefit is a pedestrian, normal american getting from Federality?
Respectfully, I think you actually have it backwards. The super meaningful, impactful, everyday life shots are determined by local and state government. The federalism angle actually prevents what you are describing -- if it's not a federal issue (i.e., something granted to the purview of the federal government by the Constitution of the United States) then the Supreme Court (nine justices, btw, not ten) can't even hear or decide the issue.
As for what the pedestrian, normal American gets from federalism... it depends on your perspective. As a Californian, I get the benefit of not having my day-to-day and the laws of my state decided by the people or county clerks of Kentucky. And if you are a citizen of Kentucky, they would say they get the same benefit -- to prevent California from telling them what to do.
the "Federal" thing is a facade for placating internal, historically unresolved, political tensions.
I would say it's not a facade, but the actual truth. Historically, we were grouped by states, and then became a Union. And there are tensions as a result of that, and many of them remain unresolved (or at least continue to have an effect to this day). I am pretty sure you are from Australia, correct? I think you either said so, or I assumed that based on some of the things you said. I think a good analogy is the United Kingdom. Imagine that the United Kingdom didn't just have 3 jurisdictions (England/Wales, Scotland, Northern Ireland) but instead had 50, and they were even more varied in law and culture. Each one has unique history that creates very different cultures and political views. And none would be too happy if the others got to impose their will on them in all matters.
Yeah, you're wrong about the number of people on the Supreme Court, their gender composition, and their role in society.  The vast majority of important issues are decided without the intervention of the Supreme Court, and the day-to-day lives of your average citizen are directly affected more by their state government than the federal government.
No, you misunderstand.  We don't even require ID in most states.  Talk about crazy. 
https://www.reddit.com/r/philosophy/comments/3o5duz/should_people_in_prison_have_a_right_to_vote/cvucuy4
I will just weigh in here with something irrelevant, and say that I looooove the Argentian dialect of Spanish. I remember someone telling me years ago that Argentian Spanish sounds like singing, and it DOES. 
Also, everyone should have the right to vote.
Thanks!
We have like 3 or 4 different accents across the land (we're the 7th largest country, surface wise). The accent you're referring to almost certainly refers to "porteño" spanish (literally: "from the port"), it's essentially the Buenos Aires dialect.
What's magical about it is that its "half italian", and around one third of the people have italian ascendance, so it's like "Italo-Spanish" to some extent, you know, bibidi papidi bubidi, but in spanish. 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=t30JzS0LHpk
Something worth trying. Trying is the key word, because we just cant keep going with what we have. We desperately need electoral reform in some form.
We need a VOTER society, not a consumer society. If our "representatives" do not want to change anything themselves we can hold a popular vote on electoral reform during a constitutional convention.
These reforms are possible at the federal level:
Publicly fund all elections at all levels of government. Only signatures required.
Institute a national unpaid holiday for all non-essential workers.
Institute financial rewards for voters so they actually vote on their day off. ($100+)
After overturning Citizens United v. FEC 558 U.S. 310 (2010):
All private donations are lumped together and doled out equally to all candidates. Want to help a specific person? Volunteer.
These reforms we vote in one state at a time:
Voting registration is automatic, everyone receives a ballot in the mail a month before voting day. They are free to complete it and mail it in at their leisure. OR Same day registration everywhere.
Abandon first past the post voting 
Institute an Alternative Vote
Voting booths are open 24/7 for a week (or a weekend at least) after the voting holiday to catch stragglers.
Require all voting booths to have information on every candidate, so that someone can crawl out of a cave and make a informed vote with only the information available inside the voting booth.
Pass a constitutional amendment with a popular vote during a constitutional convention for the following reform:
Automatic recall elections for politicians that do something contrary to the information they gave the voters during their campaign. Should the people see the reasoning behind the change of heart, they will not vote out the politician. (Currently unconstitutional: U.S. Term Limits, Inc. v. Thornton, 514 U.S. 779 (1995))
Yes. If politicians can prevent political advisaries from voting to protect their power they will by creating a legal system that imprisons adversaries/protesters. Look at the US, notice what percentage of black and hispanic men end up in prison, notice how they tend to vote democrat and the republicans are "tough on crime."
This is just a little conspiratorial.  Do you really think republicans are trying to imprison minorities because they vote democrat?
"Look, we understood we couldn't make it illegal to be young or poor or black in the United States, but we could criminalize their common pleasure. We understood that drugs were not the health problem we were making them out to be, but it was such a perfect issue...that we couldn't resist it."
- John Ehrlichman, White House counsel to President Nixon on the rationale of the War on Drugs.
"[Nixon] emphasized that you have to face the fact that the whole problem is really the blacks" Haldeman, his Chief of Staff wrote, "The key is to devise a system that recognizes this while not appearing to."
No, it's just a happy bonus.
That might not be their intention, you're right. But the consequences are the same regardless.
Probably not, but they certainly are pushing laws that make it more difficult for minorities to vote, such as voter ID laws.
Probably not, but they certainly are pushing laws that make it more difficult for minorities to vote, such as voter ID laws.
No more difficult than laws that regulate who can use the roads or buy alcohol.  Seems pretty reasonable to me.  
The Republican Party seems to be doing everything in its power to disenfranchise voters, so yes, I think they are.
Just a little conspiratorial. You know, because all cops and judges and crime victims in the country are republicans out to get minorities imprisoned.
I share your view of reality and will go down voting with you
Ah-hahaha!!!!
What a fucking moron. 
You read my mind.
Really??? Most people in prison shouldn't even have the right to make more children in my opinion. 
Minor drug offenders, and non-violent criminals shouldn't be allowed to reproduce? Okay buddy. 
So you are a supporter of child neglect?
Considering Americas voter turn out, I would be very surprised if they voted at all before they were incarcerated. 
I'm having trouble finding what percentage of prisoners voted before they were imprisoned, anyone have a source?
Considering Americas voter turn out, I would be very surprised if they voted at all before they were incarcerated.
I'm having trouble finding what percentage of prisoners voted before they were imprisoned, anyone have a source?
What does it matter if they've never voted?
Because that kind of shoots a hole in the "imprisoned for political reason" theory, doesn't it?
If it was true maybe however it hasn't been shown to be. I wasn't making a statement about that. My point was why would it matter if they've never voted with regards to the context of this thread.
How does it make sense to take my statement in the context of this thread rather than the specific comment I'm responding to?
Yes. As long as you're in a democracy, everyone should be able to vote. Democracies have already developed from only accepting a few voters to a larger scale. There's not reason to go back.
Then again, I think people who are in prison for extreme cases should not be involved with the ruling of a country. A democracy does not give us this option though.
Why should convicted felons be able to vote?
Instead of asking why a person shouldn't be able to exercise a constitutional right, why don't you give a reason why not?  And what other rights should they not have, whether convicted for robbing a store or tax evasion or DUI manslaughter (because remember, we're talking all felons)? And why not?
Here is a reason: they have a demonstrably lower regard to the well being of others.
Even nonviolent drug offenders? 
Yes even drug offenders. 
How does someone who smokes pot have a lower well being for others?
Wait you go to jail for smoking pot? 
Yes. In some places. 
Where are those places? 
Yes, a cop can attatch intent to distribute if there is more than 1 bag. 
Also self growers can go to jail, of course.
There is also those on parole who fail a drug test.
We are talking about going to jail for smoking pot. Not carrying pot around in your pocket. 
Wait really? I know some people who went to jail for a seed. Seriously. A seed. 
I seed what you mean....
Isn't that akin to providing a morality test barrier for voting? Should that be done? Should that be further done by the evaluating one's morality through the legal-criminal-political system? That form of judgment is demonstrably false, there are many examples from the past century. I think Chomsky would make this argument as well.
Another point I would make is that we should seek to provide voices for the voiceless. For example, adults vote against childrens' (or, "the next generation's") interests all the time. This is basically unavoidable. But it should be easier to vote and it should be easier to vote for a more diverse body of people, including and perhaps especially those who are directly affected by the current governing system. 
That's funny, considering how we have a track record of electing criminals. Hell, we have at least one presidential candidate right now that's under indictment and her name is Clinton. 
Here is a reason: they have a demonstrably lower regard to the well being of others.
Don't you mean you hold them in a lower regard? If they are citizens they have the right to vote. If you think they need that right removed you should present an argument for why that goes beyond they're cattle or you don't like them.
*I'm quoting your comment here in case you delete it and run away again.
No, I mean that they have demonstrated through their crimes that they view the value of others at a level which is not compatible with civilized society.
You're replying to a different person, I haven't deleted anything.
they have demonstrated through their crimes that they view the value of others at a level which is not compatible with civilized society.
You can't put a blanket over every single prisoner like this. Crimes and circumstances differ.
And what of a murderer who has served his time and been released after decades? Should that act of murder 25+ years ago disqualify him from voting for a president or tax laws? Why?
How does valuing others 'at a level which does isn't compatible with society' make any sense to use a bar for voting when its an arbitrary, subjective term?
i think you'll find that most of our legal system is arbitrary and subjective. I would be very entertained to see an 'objective' justice system.
It only exists in fairy tale land.
In that case you should be for allowing prisoners to vote, since knowing full well that many are subjectively incarcerated.
You blatantly ignored my questioning so I'll post it again:
And what of a murderer who has served his time and been released after decades? Should that act of murder 25+ years ago disqualify him from voting for a president or tax laws? Why?
What of a thief or bank robber? A drug convinction? 
"They already do it so why not" is NOT a reasoned argument to support your position. How do you justify an arbitrary blanket over all prisoners or past prisoners?
I answered one of your two questions. 
I believe that under certain circumstances when a distinct change in character has been shown, the right to vote should be reinstated. 
However, in blanket terms, citizens are assumed to know or have access to the law. A murderer will or should know that there are consequences for their actions, one of which is being excluded forever from some aspects of society, voting, gun ownership, etc. 
I see it as a just and reasonable part of the sentence of felonies.
Dishonest too huh? Better to tell a lie than be in the wrong I suppose...
That guy's quote is valid. If you're a convicted felon you have demonstrated that you are willing to bring harm to society for your own reasons/gain.
People that willingly cause harm to society for their benefit can not be trusted to vote in a way that won't harm society.
How often are objectively harmful bills floating around for these people to vote for? I don't recall too many "light infants on fire" bills.
Nobody knows what will happen in the future, but a more plausible bad thing that could happen is felons pooling their votes to get a shady official elected.
I find that wholly unlikely.
How? The aryan brotherhood could all move to the same neighborhood of a decently sized city and get an AB city council member elected.
This is the dumbest feed I've seen on Reddit in a while. I really can't believe there's this many people like you on here
I'm sorry I'm not entertaining you. Have you tried watching some TV instead?
The moral high ground you think you have in your philosophy is not unlike religious dogma. 
Because you have a simplistic association between to different things I am somehow affected? Please explain that.
*two
If you think that clearly demonstrates why they should no longer have a right, you're incorrect. 
That's not what being convicted of a crime means; it means that the justice system has found you guilty of a crime, and it will penalize you for that crime as a lesson to you and to others who might commit such a crime.  Assumptions about the character of a convict projected by people like you are just personal or social prejudices.
We're talking about voting.  They're being given a multiple choice question of who they want in charge.  We're not talking about putting Satan on the ballot.  What's the harm?  
Well they don't have the right to be among general society if they're in prison. That's why we put them in little cells with iron bars keeping them in. I'm sorry, but in actuality, it is incumbent upon you to explain why they should have the right to vote, not upon me to explain why they shouldn't.
It's a question of the purpose of prisons.  Are they meant to reform? if so, why can people not vote after their release?
But citizens all have constitutional rights. I don't have to justfiy why those rights should be given to everyone. Removing those rights however would require some justification.
They also have the right to freedom of movement. Certain rights are revoked when sent to prison. Voting is and should be one of them.
They also have the right to freedom of movement. Certain rights are revoked when sent to prison. Voting is and should be one of them.
Certain rights to you means whatever you want?
They are still citizens, are they not? As citizens we are afforded certain rights under the Constitution, including the right to vote. We break the law all the time, the only difference being that they got caught. So what if they deprived the rights of others. We have elected leaders depriving the rights of others on a daily basis and they get to pass laws to make it legal for them. It's a purely "do as I say and not as I do" methodology in this fucking country. 
We are also afforded the right to move freely. It is taken from you when you are sent to prison, so is the right to vote.
It's easy to see how restricting movement is in the best interest of everyone else, but why is allowing them to vote that bad? They can't do a worse job than what we are doing right now so what's the big deal?
But why? This is so ad hoc
Nope, sorry. People get rights unless there's a clear reason not to. That's why they're called 'rights'.
To him they're all privileges apparently.
It's called "crime". You are asking to vote in a government election for a lawmaker, of which the laws of the land you have already broke. The reason is you committed a crime. It's actually pretty clear. Black and white if I must say myself. 
Lol. If everyone that committed any crime ever never voted again, there would be no voters. Also, what other rights should they lose? 
You've got that backwards. You need to prove your position but just to be helpful here: The position of why they should have rights is simple: They're citizens. 
Why do you think they shouldn't? What criteria are you asserting that a person should have their rights withheld? Just because they have lost their freedom do they stop being people in your eyes?
They didn't trip, fall, and lose their freedom. It was taken from them for actions which we have deemed sufficient. The same reason they lose their freedom is the same reason they lose their right to be heard in political matters.
They didn't trip, fall, and lose their freedom. It was taken from them for actions which we have deemed sufficient. The same reason they lose their freedom is the same reason they lose their right to be heard in political matters.
Yes and they're incarcerated as punishment. You don't get to throw more punishment on top so you can feel good about it. Should we whip them too?
What do you mean I don't get to? Who determines the level of punishment if not citizens through their elected officials? I absolutely 'get to'.
The problem of them harming others is already solved by secluding them from the rest of the population. Taking away their right to vote serves no further purpose. 
You can vote on that, if it's a matter to be voted on. Unless you've ever broken a law of course, if that were the case you'd be a voting hypocrite. 
"They didn't trip, fall, and lose their freedom". That was fantastic. Thank you for that. 
Same reason you should.
A democracy does not give us this option though.
Of course it does.   There are no absolutes when it comes to real life or in how our ideals are translated into action in the real world.  
For example, everyone has natural rights that are ours just because we exist, but almost all of those rights can, in certain circumstances, be taken away from a person.  A person in jail, for example, has his natural right of free movement taken from him.  That's a pretty goddamned important right... I would say freedom to walk from point A to point B is a tad bit more important to a person than casting a vote, and yet, it can be taken from a person.   What would be considered kidnapping or false imprisonment when it happens to a law abiding citizen is simply another day to a prisoner... likewise, what would be disenfranchisement to an upstanding citizen is simply the removal of yet another in a series of rights from a prisoner.  
People lose their rights every day because they fuck up or are fuck ups.  An abusive parent can have his right to raise his child taken from him...  I could go on and on with the rights that can be legally taken from people. 
On the whole, I don't want prisoners having any say on how the coercive powers of government are to be wielded and applied to me, my stuff,  and those I care about.  They have, generally, demonstrated hideously bad decision making in their own lives and I don't want them using their fucked up decision making to affect our our country, our communities, and its people.  
This would make a lot of neo-nazi groups, street gangs, organized crime syndicates, and other objectively bad groups legitimate political parties.
I'm a yellow dog democrat. This is a bipartisan issue. 
Edit: Also a lot of states have programs that allow certain felons to regain their right to vote, which is awesome. Also, most non violent criminals wouldn't be felons if I had my way.
To just give every felon the right to vote opens the door for a lot of bad people in bad groups to gain direct political power. Just like they shouldn't be able to own guns they shouldn't be able to wield any political power. 
No.
If you commit a serious act against your fellow citizens then you've forfeited your right to determine the course of the country.
Simple misdemeanors don't strip you of your right to vote- it's only felonies.
Now there's very much a case to be made that some things that are currently felonies shouldn't be.  Fine- but that's a separate issue.  
Now I do think that once you're out (not just parole, but I mean that you've served your full time) you've paid your debt to society.  At that point you're not in prison, so yes, you should vote.
But people actively serving time for felonies?  No.
yes but isn't this de facto silencing descent? what if the law is unethical but it can't ever be changed because people who break it and are convicted can't vote to change it.
More like a HUGE case to be made.  Mandatory minimum sentencing laws, the millions of non violent convictions from the drug war, thousands of racist false positives in the south, etc. Otherwise agree.
Totally agree- the way we treat crimes that do virtually (or literally!) no harm to others very much needs to change.  It's absurd to spend money keeping those people in jail, and it makes no sense to deny them the right to vote.
Sure, why not?
Which is precisely the real question. If we are going to remove a right, then we need a very good reason. The default position must always be to protect the right.
Because I don't want the opinion of a man who thought it was a good idea to rape and murder people in regards to the future direction of our society.
And I don't want the opinion of people I disagree with, or don't like, or who wear plaid to weddings (seriously, what's up with that), deciding the future direction of our society.
Surely the criminal has as much interest in society as anyone else?
A criminal does not have an interest in society. That's why they are in prison...they violated some principle of society. Being part of the construct entails abiding by the rules, regardless of what you believe you are free to do. 
If they violate the system, what does the system owe them? I realize there are varying gradients of perspective to be applied at many angles here...but at what point do we simply not consider them part of society. They violated the social contract....again...what does society owe them aside from natural human rights. Voting is not a natural right...it is a privilege of society. 
Perhaps only severe/repeat offenders should reasonably lose this privelege. Minor offenders that have a chance to reintegrate with society should keep that privelege. 
Everything is subjective. We send offenders we believe aren't capable of regard for society into the isolation of prison. Should that be the line of privelege loss? 
Your story about plaid is an attempt to equate two vastly different things.
Everyone is born a regular member of society. You only become a criminal after demonstrating your lack of regard to others in a society. They have a demonstrably lower interest in society.
But surely there's other people who've demonstrated a 'lack of regard to others in a society' (apart from criminals) who are still allowed to vote? 
Members of society and the society itself are importantly distinct.
There's still rapist and murders out there that vote, they just haven't been caught
If theres that many rapists and murders in society then we have a bigger problem lol.  
It's not as easy as saying every prisoner has no right to vote. Some people are in for rediculous petty stuff, like drugs, which you doing, in my personal opinion is none of the government's business, among other things, so yeah those people should be able to vote, but people who have assaulted others, molested, killed, etc... they threw their right to vote away when they harmed the society they would have been able to change otherwise.
The question becomes, what are they going to do? Like, child molesters aren't going to magically vote molestation legal, that's not a bill that exists. They're going to vote on the same mundane garbage we all do.
Theoretically organized criminal groups could pool votes in a jurisdiction and get a bad guy official elected. 
Organized crime syndicates (let's presume those are common enough to matter) shouldn't be in prison to begin with, so they could already vote plenty.
While it's true that there are a lot of bad people out there that just haven't been caught, but there are large crime syndicates originate in prison.
[removed]
[removed]
If they own land then yea.
Right down to the basic American rule... Though, if you think about it, many people in America do not own land. All to many rent an apartment, rent a house, live in a dorm, etc. Then one would ask, does owning a house mean you own land. I would say yes, but from the work I do general city areas are consider city areas. The only people considered land owners are those with a large plot of land
Absolutely. Disenfranchisement laws in the US are a major problem, pointing out a policy of systemic repression and racism that prevents the country as a whole from remedying problems the poor are often susceptible to. Even if you are sentenced to death, you should still have the right to vote. No one should ever, ever, ever lose the right to participate in a democracy -- regardless of what society believes they did. 
This is preposterous to me. We have two distinct sets of rights. Rights granted by society and rights granted by nature. 
We can not deny anyone of their naturals rights; they are born with them and our acceptance of them allows us to define ourselves. On the other hand, rights granted by society are not truly "rights" they are more like privileges.  In order to maintain those privileges you must choose to engage and accept society....if you chose not to (by committing what society considers a crime or violation), you are denying yourself that right/privelege; not us. 
Even if you are sentenced to death, you should still have the right to vote.
So the aurora killer's opinion is just as important as mine? That sounds like a flaw in democracy, not a selling point.
Except for the fact that if you bothered to research voter disenfranchisement, you would realize that the concept is inherently racist. You shouldn't use one person as an example as to why you disagree with a policy, especially when considering the fact that 5.8 million people were blocked from voting in 2012, up from only 1.2 million in 1976 (the majority of which were black voters)... which would make sense if there was actually an increase in crime during that period, but there wasn't. There was a decrease in crimes committed, but an increase in people incarcerated (which were disproportionately black or other minority). 
This isn't one example. There are many, many monsters in prison from all races colors and creeds. 
If people are being convicted at different rates based upon the color of their skin, that is an entirely different and serious issue.
How do you respond to the concept that people like the aurora killer do exist and should not be allowed to vote?
So a Jews/blacks/poor/rich/woman's/Texans/disabled person's opinion is just as important as mine? That sounds like a flaw in democracy.
You can add ANY term in that spot and realize how ridiculous your argument is.
The difference between actions and nature/ circumstance should be easy enough to grasp, 
While I know it's unpopular in America, home of "prison should be pain and woe and hellish torment", I disagree with our stripping of basically every right of prisoners. Then again, I disagree with why lots of them are there in the first place...
The prisoners are most likely more trustworthy than the candidates they are voting for, So I would say yes. 
An interesting question. Interesting though, that as a felon in the US, voting is usually one of the first rights you get back.
While one can make a case for not allowing prisoners to vote while serving their time, denying former prisoners the right to vote is absolutely wrong. 
popped in to say this: if someone in prison has served their time and is set to be released in 6 months, they should have a say in who is going to run the country for the next 4 years-or on a more micro scale- who is going to run the city they live in when they are free.
well no taxation without representation so..
P: Files Taxes
Q: Has Representation
no taxation without representation --> ~(P & ~Q) --> ~P or Q --> P implies Q.
Thus since people in prison must file their taxes, and by Modus Ponens, the answer is: yes.
QED bitches
Voting should not be mandatory and people in prison should have the right to vote.
I'm not sure it's the voting records of the criminals in prison we should be worried about, if you get my meaning.
Yes, I believe they should. 
Prison should be geared towards becoming a productive member of society, avoiding future criminality and reducing recidivism. If that isn't the long  term goal then prison offers little benefit other than to keep people locked away from society it does nothing to prevent recurrence. 
Voting is something everyone can and should take part in. 
A couple of points: first, can we have some retribution for this guy over the awful background music, I support prison and denial of voting rights. Second, in the US being denied the right to vote is tied to being a convicted felon, not being in prison as such.
All of his supposedly bad consequences are all highly speculative. For example, black voter turnout in the US does trail whites, but both black and white turnout is significantly higher than Asian turnout. Seeing as Asians have a lower incarceration rate than both blacks and whites, it seems unlikely that turnout is significantly tied to number of convicted felons within a community. 
No.  You give up your right to vote when you decide to take away the rights of other people.
Drug offenders took no one's rights.
They transgressed against the rights of those who did obey the law by unjustly enriching themselves in a maner that other people were not allowed to.
wait what? who doesnt do that in a capitalist society?
Convicted felons (and this is not counting people falsely convicted, of course) have demonstrated that they are willing to harm society for their own gain/anger/reasons.
If you have demonstrated that you are willing to harm society for your personal reasons then you can not be trusted to vote in a way that won't harm society.
This is a long shot, but let me give you an example.
If felons have the right to vote then they could congregate in neighborhoods and get shady people elected to local or state government. 
I expect to be down-voted for this by everyone who doesn't agree with me, so nobody will read this.
I was with you until those last two lines.  People who have served their time should have their voting rights restored.
Hell no, and you shouldn't be able to vote unless you can answer basic questions about the candidate you voting for either. 
Lets talk about restoring the rights of felons before we talk about people in prison.
If a person is released from prison, they are rehabilitated and deserve full rights.
I say No. Think of prison in terms of the role it plays in a society.  It removes people from general population because they've demonstrated they cannot harmoniously live in that society.  In a democracy voters elect public officials that (in their opinion) will represent them and work (in theory) towards the betterment of said voters.  Now, if inmates are removed from society I don't think they should have a voting voice in the election of a public official to represent it. This assumes several things: all inmates are rightly convicted, and all inmates are convicted of crimes that directly contribute to the degradation of society (ie: murder, narcotic trafficking/distribution, pedophilia etc).
I say No. Think of prison in terms of the role it plays in a society. It removes people from general population because they've demonstrated they cannot harmoniously live in that society.
You don't honestly believe that, do you?
Prison is not supposed to be a camp to remove detrimental members of society, it's supposed to be reformative.
I don't disagree with you that prison should also rehabilitate inmates, but as such I think inmates shouldn't have voting rights in a society they are removed from. Just as I don't support the notion that a convicted felon that is back in society can't vote. 
Absolutely, so long as they are legally out of prison and not felons.
You don't go to prison for a misdemeanor. So of course they would be convicted felons..unless you're just joking lol
No.
Those who have been sent to prison show either a lack of judgement or a fundamental disagreement with the principles of law and order. These are not peoples opinions we should be taking into consideration. 
Once they are released they are assumed to have paid for their mistake, and unless the crime shows an incompatibility with our way of life (felony), they should regain their rights.
Once they are released they are assumed to have paid for their mistake, and unless the crime shows an incompatibility with our way of life (felony). they should regain their rights.
Whoa there! Justice systems I'm familiar with enshrine the principle that people cannot be judicially punished without trial and also that punishment ends.
I think any notion of permanent punishment should be considered very closely.
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Just what we need, politicians pandering to the prison vote. No, I'm sorry, that's not something that should occur. "Vote for me and I'll take a second look at your sentence." No, that wouldn't work.
You're afraid of something you have no reason to believe exists.
Let's take the U.S as an example; mass incarceration is the third great tool the powers that be has set in place to keep their "ancient" class system in place. It is used to on a massive scale imprison people, that violate laws that the powers that be has set in place only to incarcerate the lower classes of society. It is basically a tool to maintain oppression in the U.S. And in the U.S there is already a system set in place for these people to lose their right to vote, so change cannot happen.
Yes people who are or have been in prison should have the right to vote. It is a great democratic and humanitarian fault to keep anyone from voting.
But at the same time when we're talking about this issue, the issues of mass incarceration should not be excluded, nor the issues of punishment prisons versus rehabilitation. 
You could have asked if people in prison should have any rights and I'd be just as unsure of the answer.
Why not? Voting doesn't do shit anyway.
I say yes.  Prison is about two things - punishment and taking a dangerous person out of society.  Taking away someone's voting rights is pretty dumb punishment since half the people in this country don't vote anyway and voting is something we're supposedly trying to encourage.  
As far as taking dangerous people out of society goes, that needs to be done by infringing on as few rights as possible.  Taking away voting rights does nothing to keep dangerous people out of society and it infringes on a pretty important right.  Are people afraid prisoners are going to somehow get a skinhead elected to congress or something?  
Most of these people will be back in society eventually.  We should let them vote.  They'll probably vote better than the rest of us seeing as they've got nothing better to do all day than sit in their cells and read the news.
Yes. What a stupid question.
Democratic voting exists specifically to protect the voice of the people we hate. Convicted criminals should be allowed to vote at least as much as other citizens. Because if they could, maybe the penal system wouldn't be for-profit. So there you see, right now, why these sadistic and sinister rules were implemented in the first place.
Is this even necessary? Doesn't the book's numbering system do this for you? 
Sure, but I think the idea is that when reading the book you can't really have all propositions of the form 3.x directly in front of you because their sub-propositions will be in the way. I think it's a depth-vs-breadth thing. It's easy to get lost in the Tractatus' depth (i.e., following 3 to 3.1 to 3.1.1 before getting to 3.2) and miss the breadth (that 3.1, 3.2, 3.3, etc. are interrelated). 
I kinda disagree, those more in-depth points (3.1.1) work to prove the earlier point, so once you're convinced of this earlier point (3.1) you can move on to the next (3.2). Seeing the "breadth" would just be a matter of flipping back a couple pages to see the original point
Different people read in different ways.  Some prefer depth-first; others prefer breadth first.  This allows you to do both.
Totally! I'm not sure why Bourbon is being down voted. As a breadth first reader, I've found this extremely helpful as a sort of point of reference while going more in-depth into Tractatus. 
It's worth noting that this tree may not be entirely accurate (although it is very pretty!). There's a discussion at Daily Nous right now regarding the Tractatus and tree diagrams which may be of interest. In particular, David Stern notes that:
That’s a nice-looking website, but it runs into some problems when you look at the details.  In order to handle the relationship between proposition 3 and 3.001, its layout requires a node called “3.0” in between the two (which does not exist in the book’s numbering system).  And there is no “0” in the TLP numbering system, yet for some reason the site presents “0” as the base of the entire tree.
It could be tidied up, too. It gets a little messing when one opens multiple sections at the same time.
Still very cool, though.
I had a colleague who had done something similar for Spinoza's ethics. Dailynous featured it as well, but it seems to have generated less interest.
Do you have a link? I really loved Spinoza's Ethics and would definitely like to see this!
I just read the Tractatus recently (terrible analytic education in undergrad), and this site is super helpful regardless of the problems. I'm definitely saving this for the future!
I'm not sure why this is a problem.  If you get to a node with no content, you can just skip to its children.
[removed]
6. Die allgemeine Form der Wahrheitsfunktion ist: [p, ξ, N(ξ)].
donc Dieu existe
I think this is lovely. 
How does this work?
Click a thing and more things appear, then you click more things.  There are words, too.
Actually want to read this now, thanks OP!
World
/
Facts
/
States of affairs
/
Objects
Haven't had the chance to listen to this so apologies if I'm wildly off topic.
No substance is immoral in and of itself. Morality - regardless of whether it is ontologically knowable - is a human construct, and it cannot apply to inanimate objects. 
Certain drugs are produced under inhumane conditions, to say the least, but I think that buying responsibly produced and fair trade products is a separate issue. Clothes wearing isn't immoral because many of our clothes are produced in sweatshops for example. 
What we're left with is the question of whether it is moral to consume substances. I think many people who say it is an immoral activity hold the antecedent belief that certain drugs cannot be used responsibly. Context seems to play a large role in determining whether addictions develop - opiates are used in hospitals regularly without patients developing drug problems. I would say, prima facie, that no drug use is immoral that is partaken under responsible conditions in the right contexts. 
Anecdotally, I'd say that most drug use does not seem responsible. Many people I've known who take drugs feel like they are already being reckless by indulging and so are less likely to research effects and dosage. They view it as a 'dumb' activity that there is no sense in trying to be smart about. 
Also I've noticed the people most drawn to trying drugs are those whom are least equipped to deal with their effects and judge their consequences. I think if every drug were made legal tomorrow, the majority of society would not change many aspects of their lives in any significant way. However, if it were not tightly supervised then the most vulnerable people in society would just end up making themselves more vulnerable.
It's a complicated issue. I don't think it is immoral but a pragmatic society is wise to try proscribe or at least tightly monitor people's access to drugs. I haven't really spoken about education here, which would likely alter a few of the factors here but society will always have vulnerable people who are incapable of measuring consequences. It's in society's interests to minimise the repercussions of their actions.
What we're left with is the question of whether it is moral to consume substances.
Something I realized a while ago is that my objection to drugs (drug culture?) wasn't that people were merely consuming substances and deriving pleasure from them. My apprehension stems from the consequences of the consumption of drugs. I feel that many people are sorely lacking in the area of informed consent when it comes to ingesting such powerful substances. Informed consent in this context means understanding, or being made aware of, the entire spectrum of potential negative consequences - both mental and physical.
Most people think marijuana is harmless. In a purely physical aspect it is mostly benign from what I understand but it can and does take it's toll mentally, especially in chronic [har har] users. Sometimes consequences only become apparent after years of use. I used to smoke a lot years and years ago, and looking back I can see the nuanced ways it affected my motivation, ambition, and drive. At the time I didn't recognize it but now it's rather clear to me.
Like with many topics, I view it a risk vs. reward scenario and I often conclude that the risks outweigh any benefits. I feel that the conversation centers too often on the physical side effects of the drug and not enough on the potential long term mental and cognitive consequences.
Sometimes for an agent, consuming drugs is a rational choice. If you are homeless, jobless and mentally ill then injecting heroin can maximise the 'good' in your life. Weighing the consequences to a reasonable degree of accuracy will still tell you that stoned oblivion is preferable to harsh reality.
Anecdotally, marijuana ironically only appears to be dangerous to people who think it is "harmless."
Is consistency consistent is like asking is A = A? Well ... by definition: yes, yes it is.
Just in response to the headline, in general, I'd say both.  Assuming I can survive out at sea and the only issue I have is how long I can hold my breath..I can only hold my breath for so long to see the world of possibility under the sea.  But a lot of the time it's just going to feel like I'm floating out at sea.
Im watching the video now, its just a play on words. -_-
You cant be consistent because you will never grow and will stay stagnant. But you can be consistent on your character of what you do.  
The whole video should be called, Lets analyse the word consistency.
An Easy Skip in my opinion.
I loved reading Montaigne because it's like reading the thoughts of an old friend from across a gulf of centuries.  His voice is exceedingly, surprisingly human.  Would I normally want to be friends with, or even expect to relate to a 16th century French nobleman?  Not really, no.  But, I would vote for Montaigne as one of my top 5 historical figures to resurrect from the dead for a fun night at the pub?  Absolutely yes. 
He seems like an archaic and charming dork, unapologetically sharing the dorky things he likes to think about.
I enjoyed in his essays when he discusses the pleasure of having a poor memory, thus being able to revisit cherished works and enjoy them all over again.
Montaigne isn't taught in philosophy classes because there  is almost nothing to teach-- the man knew what he wanted to say and said it. The idea that complexity of language is tantamount to acuteness of thought is the main reason philosophy gets so little respect.
Because Socrates, Aristotle, Hume, Schopenhauer, Mill, Pierce, and the analytics are all such obscurantists 
"The idea that complex language is most important in the understanding of ideas is why philosophy gets so little respect"
Poor Montaigne :(
I love Montaigne. That is beautifully put. Hooray!
Exhibit A: Spinoza
research for second PhD in Humanities and Social Sciences (Performance Studies/Theatre & Drama/Dramatic Literature/Visual Arts), La Trobe University
If you enjoy philosophy of religion, as I do, then please stop spreading Kremer's videos. He does a decent job of explaining classical theism, but he completely misrepresents theistic personalism in each video of this series that I've seen.
I think you've posted the wrong video... or you've posted to the wrong subreddit.
What makes you say that?
I watched the video.
Having written this as an assistant professor (2002), who is John's audience? How insightful was it then, and now? How ground breaking is it, and how is it relevant to his new book on contextual assessments?
This really is an extraordinary book, unfortunately written in a manner, common among french thinkers of that period, that's begging the sort of accusations hurled (rightly, I feel) at Derrida. I found it was best swallowed with Gary Gutting's Michel Foucault's Archaelogy of the Human Sciences. 
Foucault did mention somewhere that he did tailor his major works in terms of style to fit in with the French institutions of his time. I wouldn't say he's as bad as Derrida though. Do you find it is simply the style that is offputting, or the expectation of a lot of prior philosophical knowledge?
Taken from Dennett's Breaking the Spell:
"John Searle once told me about a conversation he had with the late Foucault: 'Michel, you're so clear in conversation; why is your written work so obscure?" To which Foucault replied "That's because, in order to be taken seriously by French Philosophers, twenty-five percent of what you write has to be impenetrable nonsense."I have coined a term for this tactic, in honor of Foucault's candor: eumerdification.')"
Here's Searle telling the story himself.
Yeah, I think Searle mentions that Foucault once said that to him (Its also fun to read what Foucault has to say about Derrida). 
Its definitely the style (affectation even). I think the expectation of prior philosophical knowledge (in this case a lot of Canguilhem and Bachelard really) is par for the course.   
Yeah, as per the Hyppolite generation.
[removed]
One thing I recently realized: pragmatism is the philosophy of power. And that means being unburdened by prinicples and always being willing to "go over the top of" and act outside the conceived boundaries of possibility of one's opponents. The trouble pragmatism got into was trying to engage a philosophical tradition that has always been founded on the asexual dialectic of principles/counter-examples. So pragmatism - historically - tried to express itself within the confines of principles so it could enter the conversation. If you really want to understand pragmatism (note - my theses as an undergraduate and grad student were on American pragmatism), then read Caro's books on Robert Moses and LBJ.
Re: "pragmatism is the philosophy of power". I felt that when I was comparing Nietzsche and James. I happened to come across their writings during the same semester, and I found their approaches to dissolving truth as representation is somewhat close. They both dislike the ambiguity of that which is supposed to stand between world and word, and they both try to clarify it by dissolving the appearance-reality dichotomy. I think Nietzsche and James would have enjoyed a pint together for sure, but to say that pragmatism is the philosophy of power is perhaps jumping too far. no? Perhaps I am just confused about what you are referring to by power.   
I'm not who you were responding to, but I suspect you could replace the word "power" with "effect" to get the sense intended (or at least that's what I would claim): pragmatism is a philosophy of effect, which accordingly disregards principles and, in effect (so to speak), makes it a philosophy of power.
Perhaps the word is 'agency'?
If I remember correctly, Nietzsche actually read Charles Pierce. So there's that, make what you will. 
Pragmatism is almost entirely the result of William James insisting on saying shit the wrong way.  It's self-evidently a completely ridiculous 'explanation' of truth that has nothing in common with truth, but he could never just go out and say "there is no truth - here's what I live by instead".  
And the 'philosophy of power' bullshit...please put your dick back in your pants.  It's just being an antisocial bully, and it's entirely reactive against traditional philosophy (which is admittedly a mess and backed itself into a corner by portraying in-group morality as something that needed a rational justification).  If people could see a more complete picture of the people who engage in this kind of behavior those people would be harshly punished and ostracized.  It's almost entirely parasitic on the assumptions of friendly, honest interaction that are necessary for a functioning society.  If everyone was like that we'd go back to killing each other and then it would stop again.
Rorty?  http://aeon.co/magazine/philosophy/roger-scruton-fake-culture/
"The pragmatism of the late American philosopher Richard Rorty is of similar effect. It expressly set itself against the idea of objective truth, giving a variety of arguments for thinking that truth is a negotiable thing, that what matters in the end is which side you are on. If a doctrine is useful in the struggle that liberates your group, then you are entitled to dismiss the alternatives."
What is a bit weird is that Rorty can ONLY be interpreted in the context of the group. Of who is your in-group.  Truth is whatever that is rational for us, the in-group, to believe.
In practice Rorty's in-group was progressives, leftists, feminists, gays etc.
What weirds me out is that like most conservative people I am intensely loyal to the culture, history, national identity of my country. That is my in-group. So Rorty's pragmatism could be perfectly logically used as a justification for conservatives, even for rather extreme rightwingery. You just have to replace the "us", the in-group, not progressives, feminists and gays but basically the common average patriotistic married family guys in church, roughly. I could say that homosexuality is a mental illness or women should go back to the kitchen, without even meaning it is objectively true - because for "us" that is what is rational to believe, in order to further the aims of our group.
Interesting why Rorty would offer such a weapon to his enemies. I think because he cared about academia, and of course in academia we are thoroughly defeated. You will hardly find anyone with the basic simple level of 19th century patriotic-traditionalist sense of loyalties in academia. In Britain for example academics will rarely venerate the Royal family as a symbol of the nation, as an emotional show of national loyalty, or only ironically. However, outside the academia, outside elites, things are pretty different. 
Interesting why Rorty would offer such a weapon to his enemies.
For some people exposing the truth is more important than the potential abuses thereof.  So for example, do you tell the world about the specifics of the atomic reactions?  If sharing the best available information is an ideal, the answer is "yes" even if some people can later be hurt by this.  If global well-being is a top priority, then maybe some info is best not shared.
Alternatively maybe Rorty thought conservatives already knew instinctively how to protect their in-groups, but the liberals don't have strong in-groups usually, because liberals tend to be inclusive.  So maybe Rorty was trying to teach people who otherwise would be too open, to learn to close up a bit around their in-group, and learn to fight, so that finally they can stand toe to toe with the conservatives who already know how to do all this and are doing it well.  In other words, conservatives are not going to get anything new form Rorty, but all the otherwise wussy liberal groups will get a fighting chance thanks to Rorty's advice.  He might have thought that way.
Really I have no clue what he thought and why he taught whatever he taught.
Well in the first place Rorty would've dismissed Truth as a coherent objective and his ingroup was pretty marginal, all things considered. So it might seem (to an outsider like myself) that Rorty's philosophy ought to have led him to keep such thoughts to himself or at least to his group.
Incidentally, if you consider Rorty's ingroup to be academic philosophers then his idea ultimately fails its own criteria. To paraphrase Putnam, truth for Rorty is what you can get away with in service of some end and we're not letting him get away with that notion. (There are much more complete responses to Rorty but Putnam's pithy retort captures the thrust of the objections: there exists non-negotiable external constraints and we want to talk about them, dammit!)
To paraphrase Putnam, truth for Rorty is what you can get away with in service of some end and we're not letting him get away with that notion.
Rorty doesn't ask you to let him get away.  He's not asking for a permission.
I never said Rorty was asking for permission, I was making reference to Putnam's reference of a famous line from Philosophy and The Mirror of Nature which reads, "[truth] is what your contemporaries let you get away with."
I disagree with Putnam.
Ok... Putnam didn't say Rorty was asking for permission, either. There's a difference between asking to get away with something and trying to get away with something.
But in any case your objection to Putnam's admittedly cheeky use of Rorty's own quote is noted.
There's a difference between asking to get away with something and trying to get away with something.
Putnam is basically delusional.  His doesn't understand the reach of his rhetoric, which is limited.  He's not able to restrain Rorty at all.  It's not a competition in the way Putnam imagines.  Every mind is free to explore every possibility, limited only by fear, ignorance or unwillingness.
That has nothing to do with your previously stated objection. Putnam didn't say Rorty was asking for permission.
Yes and no. Rorty's philosophy is predicated on the idea on contingency, which does in a sense lead to the in-group effect that you discuss. However, for one to truly embrace Rorty's position, one can't simply say 'any in-group-established moral code or world view is True for said group simply because they believe it to be so'. Rorty was not a run-of-the-mill relativist. His philosophy was also not intended to be prescriptive in the way you're making it out to be. It's descriptive in nature, and merely intended to highlight the way in which contingent truths develop within social groups and how those contingent truths are the closest thing to Truth that we as a species can attain. 
Now, you're example regarding extreme rightwingers is flawed because it does not seem like you expect those individuals to openly acknowledge the contingency of the moral code that they're imposing on others (gays, women, minorities, immigrants, etc.). Your example seems to suggest that their mindset is: "it's true because that's what we say and nobody can say we're wrong since all values are constructed within communities of like-minded people; hence, we can't be criticized for our bigotry because our values are equally as valid as any other groups by definition". That's relativism. That isn't Rorty's position. Rorty would respond something like: "sure, your community has values X and Y, which, for your group are valid and representative of your contingent truth. Okay, fine. However, if you acknowledge that your values and beliefs are contingent, then you also must admit that they're also subject to change and only valid within your very small community. Of course, your community doesn't live in isolation; it lives within a much larger community of people who, at this particular socio-historical time think your values and beliefs are bullshit. And that bigger community of which your smaller community is embedded has power in numbers and institutional power as well, a lot more so than you do. And when your in-group tries to impose your radical values and beliefs on people who live outside your small community, they are going to push back, and rightly so. They are going to protect their own way of life from being influenced by yours, and you can't hold it against them because that's how power and influence work and contingent truths are only ever able to maintain credibility through the expression of power and influence." 
This is obviously a gross paraphrase of his position. Much more can (and probably should) be said. However, I need to eat breakfast.
TL;DR: Rorty doesn't believe that all beliefs are equally valid, but rather that they are equally contingent. The validity of beliefs is always relative to the degree that the in-group affirming those beliefs has power. Also, it's natural for people to form communities in order try to affirm their values, but when those communities collide, dominant groups tend to win out. It's not an inherently good or evil process, it's just how people and society exist and truth is formed.
That is interesting. Care to explain what you mean by being unburdened by principles? Aren't pragmatists operating within some kind of belief system/perspective? Otherwise how would they judge something as useful/pragmatic? For me "going over the top of" and empowerment is about transcending limiting beliefs - that takes a different kind of orientation IMO than only considering what is useful within your current perspective.
Well, back to James' original formulation: truth is what works. It's helpful to think about power's relation to rules. Power creates rules and doesn't answer to them. When you think about platonism in the pejorative sense of the term, you think of timeless, eternal truths/principles/laws/essences. For the pragmatist, treating rules as though they had intrinsic authority is to commit a kind of self-deception. One is projecting authority into rules and then denying that the projection ever took place. The pragmatist sees all these systems as human creations designed to meet human needs. Therefore, the pragmatist never feels beholden to some eternal system.  The pragmatist thinks that rewriting the rules is risky and therefore more interesting than simply plugging into a pre-structured system. Because anytime you treat yourself as though you plug nicely into a pre-structured system, you are treating that system as more powerful than you.
And people always respond with 'what about physics?' And sometimes the pragmatist will leverage some philosophers social constructivist accounts. But that's not really necessary. All you really need to do is say, "well, let's just instead focus on the kind of risks you're not taking - the kind of risks that are necessary conditions for creating change in where power lies. The kind of risks that we can agree make one's life feel meaningful."
Power creates rules and doesn't answer to them.
I don't think that is what power is. I'd call that domination. E.g. if people can see through your rules and cease answering to them - what kind of power do you really have? It's only temporary. It's insecure and hinges on people being disempowered. So you're very much a slave to the pursuit of keeping people disempowered. In a world were people are empowering themselves more and more - you'll need to apply an increasing amount of effort of keeping those fear based power structures up. 
Power to me is absolute truth. Because that is not temporary it's what is timelessly so. It's boundless. It's what will cut through all perspectives, it's what requires the least amount of effort to express (although a lot of fearlessness). It's what ultimately can't be avoided or denied. 
That kind of power doesn't dominate, it inspires people to be free. 
All you're doing is replacing a human-sized form of power with a de-humanized form. And then you're saying you want something big and eternal dominate you forever and articulate a life-structure that need never change.
I don't see that as a philosophical position. I instead see it as two other things: 1. a childlike desire to live in a world not of your making, but wherein all your needs are met - the eternal parents' house. 2. A fantasy of the lazy brain.
More on (2). Our lazy brain hates thinking. One thing that prompts thinking is change. Therefore, the lazy brain wants things that never change. It wants tools that never break, and relationships that once established need no more maintenance. None of those are real. They are all fantasy dreams of the lazy brain.
And if you want to get a more realistic understanding of power, again, I recommend Robert Caro's books.
you want something big and eternal dominate you forever and articulate a life-structure that need never change
Quite the opposite actually :). The absolute can't be pinned down into a life-structure that never changes - its very nature is infinite boundless potential. 
I instead see it as two other things: 1. a childlike desire to live in a world not of your making
Only true if you believe yourself a victim to the world in the first place. If you believe you're in fact the source of the world then whatever expression in the world, from your power and freedom, is just expression of your own will. To some degree you must already believe this to be true if you believe in things like changing your lazy brain.
-2. A fantasy of the lazy brain. Our lazy brain hates thinking. One thing that prompts thinking is change. Therefore, the lazy brain wants things that never change. It wants tools that never break, and relationships that once established need no more maintenance.
We're not victims to our brains. We can break patterns if we feel they aren't serving us or if they've played out their role - we are constantly evolving. We are creative beings that can transcend our own programming. 
Having talked with numerous self-described pragmatists of the Pierce / James / Dewey, I have come to think of pragmatism as a set of good ideas that have been articulated poorly.  It often comes across as a club for self-pitying anti-analytics, who reduce philosophy of mind to strawmen obsessed with "brains in vats", or just really bad neuroscience, and philosophy of language as mere pedantry.  While they are often not wrong, they tend to have a bad attitude about these things.  That is my experience.  Yours may differ.
The good version of pragmatism, I think, is the idea of this quote.
What difference would it practically make to any one if this notion rather than that notion were true? If no practical difference whatever can be traced, then the alternatives mean practically the same thing, and all dispute is idle.
Put forth a question, lay out the possible answers, and then discern what rides on any particular answer being true.
One example we liked to kick around was this paper by Stefano Predelli on Scare quotes and their relation to other semantic issues, and the related work in phil. language on quotation marks.  Nothing seems to ride on these arguments.
This is the point at which the question of attitude arises.  We can either dismiss the work of philosophers in the quotation mark cabal as silly, or we can engage with them...in the hopes that they realize their project is silly.  The first approach belittles the analytics.  The second approach is a therapy to help the analytics.
I dunno.  At the very least, thinking about pragmatism can help one understand why Rorty was in such a tough position.  It is difficult to embrace an idea by which the work of one's colleagues is evidenced to be nonsense, and not piss off the colleague in the process.
Science is a stricter form of pragmatism in that sense: replace "practical difference" with "physical difference".
Or rather, "causal difference."
The good version of pragmatism, I think, is the idea of this quote.
What difference would it practically make to any one if this notion rather than that notion were true? If no practical difference whatever can be traced, then the alternatives mean practically the same thing, and all dispute is idle.
Put forth a question, lay out the possible answers, and then discern what rides on any particular answer being true.
It's difficult to evaluate because I'm not quite sure what the opposite of the idea you quoted would be. I take that quote (let's call the idea it expresses q) to also say that if two notions have "no practical difference whatever [which] can be traced", then they never will have any differences whatever that can be traced, regardless of what technological advances we make. So two stars in the sky for someone 1000 years ago that look similar are not indistinguishable in the sense of q, because it is possible one day that someone would invent a tool (the telescope) that would in fact yield a difference between those two stars.
If I'm right about my interpretation of q (which I'm probably not, someone correct me) then what argument could possibly counter, or disprove, q?
I take that quote (let's call the idea it expresses q) to also say that if two notions have "no practical difference whatever [which] can be traced", then they never will have any differences whatever that can be traced, regardless of what technological advances we make.
Pragmatism, as I understand it, does not make "never will" claims of the type you articulate.  This because we often stumble upon new methods of inquiry that yield new practical results.  Note the first sentence of the quote:
What difference would it practically make to any one if this notion rather than that notion were true?
The pragmatic question for those folks arguing about stars 1,000 years ago is what practical difference it makes to them.  If two people articulate two different star theories to answer a star question, and there is no practical consequent to either answer, then the pragmatic response is to move on to something else.  When we stumble upon a new method of inquiry that yields information about stars that has practical consequence, feel free to take up the question again.
Pragmatism, done correctly, is not an attempt to posit Dogmatic rules for what is philosophically verboten.  Rather, it is a reasonable method for moving past practically inconsequential debates.
Your summary makes it sound like a Pragmatist would dislike NASA, because Thales of Miletus lacked rocket propulsion.  That is silly.
What difference would it practically make to any one if this notion rather than that notion were true? If no practical difference whatever can be traced, then the alternatives mean practically the same thing, and all dispute is idle.
I like to think that philosophical discussion isn't pointless, and there is a good reason we should discuss these things even if we don't know what use they will have. I advise that one interested in such questions should continue talking about them, but, once a dead end is reached, must look toward other avenues and problem solving methods - namely, science, I think it has done a pretty good job lately.
What difference would it practically make to any one if this notion rather than that notion were true? If no practical difference whatever can be traced, then the alternatives mean practically the same thing, and all dispute is idle.
Every analytic philosopher and scientist abides by this principle already when evaluating propositions though. So how is pragmatism unique?
Are you familiar with the hard problem of consciousness?  Arguments about qualia and supervenience?  Bickering about philosophical zombies?
Not much rides on those arguments.
What are you talking about? I can barely think of philosophical problems that have MORE pragmatic potential than those arguments...
For example?
I don't even know where to begin... those problems literally drive neuroscientific research, and, even more importantly, neurobiological research, as well as cognitive science research, and theoretical + clinical psychology.
It's absolutely mind-blowing that you would suggest that arguments about consciousness, the most important thing we have ever theorized about in all of history, are useless, non-pragmatic arguments...
The way that qualia function, whether consciousness supervenes or not, or what consciousness actually is... actually directly impact literally everything. We would have to redraw the entirety of our scientific paradigms depending on how we end up answering some of these questions.
Well, Physics actually has some pragmatic answers which are actually really interesting, and they have been critical to Einstein's derivation of the laws of general relativity:
Absolute Rotation and Mach's Principle
Edit: Case in point, this is exactly why pure logic and a dismissive attitude toward reliable empirical evidence is what leads to some unproductive philosophical conversations:
Centrifugal force is needed to explain the concavity of the water in a co-rotating frame of reference (one that rotates with the water) because the water appears stationary in this frame, and so should have a flat surface. Thus, observers looking at the stationary water need the centrifugal force to explain why the water surface is concave and not flat. The centrifugal force pushes the water toward the sides of the bucket, where it piles up deeper and deeper, Pile-up is arrested when any further climb costs as much work against gravity as is the energy gained from the centrifugal force, which is greater at larger radius....
Other thinkers suggest that pure logic implies only relative rotation makes sense. For example, Bishop Berkeley and Ernst Mach (among others) suggested that it is relative rotation with respect to the fixed stars that matters, and rotation of the fixed stars relative to an object has the same effect as rotation of the object with respect to the fixed stars.
Another analogy - you have a soaking wet tennis ball and you toss it vertically into the air and spin it, you should intuitively visualise that water will be 'flinging' off the ball for the duration of the whole spin, even when you aren't touching it. This would imply that simply rotating the object 'relative to the rest of the universe' actually exerts an outward force from the center of the ball.
With enough undeniable empirical evidence we must invent a fictional 'cause' of this effect, which is mathematically sound and enables us to perform useful calculations for practical purposes - for the realists; that is, the 'centrifugal force'. I think many philosophers dismiss invented causes just because they don't fit in with logic, but it is really important to integrate pure logic with new evidence - and if you are not satisfied, then you may help us progress to the next stage of understanding the nature of this 'made-up force', but for the love of God please don't dismiss it - it is mathematically sound, the purest form of logic!
TLDR; Basically, science investigates answered and unanswered philosophical questions and 'magical' incidences, it then measures the nature of these very accurately - assuming they are correct - and sometimes finds things that contradict previous logic. We must try to accept initial 'invented' causes that are mathematically sound and build on these to truly understand what is happening.
Adding to your points: we can't scientifically prove something is true, but we can scientifically prove something is not true. All of our scientific knowledge is basically just assumptions that have not been disproven and that are currently useful. Science is actually extremely pragmatic in its approach towards truth and discovery.
Exactly, philosophers should not be afraid to hand their logical conclusions over to science to be critiqued and ripped apart. That philosophical conclusion you made in that one tiny brain of yours is unlikely to be the end of it.
Problem is that science is very good at disproving physical things.
Science is very bad at disproving subjective things, take for example the concept of pain.
Science is not the end all be all argument to all discussions, especially not in one about pragmatism.
God has a very real function to many people.
I'm not sure how that's a problem, since most fields of science are exclusively focused on the physical world... The subjective is where some aspects of psychology and philosophy come in.
I don't think either of us are saying science is "the end all be all argument to all discussions" or that it is so in this discussion. We're saying science is very pragmatic in certain respects.
I'm actually learning about this in a course currently, William James feels quite alien to me, but I think this will really help me 
Read John Dewey
[deleted]
From a pragmatic perspective, I think (definitely not an expert), the "magical" technology or action that satisfies the users need in the moment is not a failure. It works in that moment therefore it is good. What happens when the situations change and new evidence is brought forth that contradicts the previous configuration: reconfiguration and change, => growth. I am most familiar with John Dewey's pragmatism which I believe is largely based on William James, but there may be some differences. His perspective recognizes the continuous and ever-changing nature of reality, clinging to no objective truth, which could be quite liberating in my perspective.
TL:DR - "Rationalism sticks to logic and the empyrean. Empiricism sticks to the external senses. Pragmatism is willing to take anything, to follow either logic or the senses and to count the humblest and most personal experiences. She will count mystical experiences if they have practical consequences. She will take a God who lives in the very dirt of private tact – if that should seem a likely place to find him."
I friggin' love how accessible James' writing/lecturing is. I think it's that accessibility that has made Pragmatism such an easy philosophy for me to adopt.
I was taught about William James and pragmatism at the University of Pittsburgh by an acolyte of John Dewey who was of course a student of James.  He told us many times pragmatism was the pursuit of maximum gratification.
He told us many times pragmatism was the pursuit of maximum gratification.
Really? This sounds more Epicurean. Perhaps I'm simply put off by the term 'gratification.'
Yes, it's possible I am phrasing it incorrectly, I have been out of the classroom for many years. As I have said I will look for my notes from this class. 
Would be willing to elaborate on what's meant by pragmatism was the pursuit of maximum gratification for me?
I have been out of the classroom for quite a while at this point so I can not meaningfully contribute, unless I can dig up my notes from Professor Gale's class. Here is his website:
http://www.philosophy.pitt.edu/person/richard-gale
An epistemology towards utilitarianism or something maybe? It's a bloody silly sentiment without some supporting context anyway.
I realize my response was simplistic. It was late and I happen to have been taught by one of the foremost scholars on James and I thought I would add a little something.  I will attempt to find my class notes.  Here is my professor's website:
http://www.philosophy.pitt.edu/person/richard-gale
Pragmatism can only be defined relative to idealism.  There has to something "unreal" if there is to be something "real."
Organized religions are extremely pragmatic.  Often confused with mysticism 
The metaphysics of a god are unimportant because it doesn't matter either way whether a god exists or not because the reality of the world remains the same regardless of if there is a god or not. Just in the same way that the question of going round the squirrel is unimportant because practically it matters not which truth you chose. 
The metaphysics of a god are unimportant
Not sure James would agree with this. Try "The Varieties of Religious Experience."
Didn't even want to read the article because I knew you misunderstood what I was saying. This is from the wiki article "Under James’ pragmatism, the effectiveness of religious experiences proves their truth, whether they stem from religious practices or from drugs"
This translates perfectly to the existence of god/non existence of god. So I think the problem is you misunderstood what I was saying. 
James had relatively little interest in the legitimacy or illegitimacy of religious experiences.
Really? Than why write a whole book on the subject?
To write about how the legitimacy and illegitimacy of religious experience is an indeterminate circle-jerk that has no bearing on the reality of a religious experience. He used the pragmatic method to explain how this is the wrong sort of question to ask when it comes to religious experiences. 
"Knowledge about a thing is not the thing itself. You remember what Al– Ghazzali told us in the Lecture on Mysticism—that to understand the causes of drunkenness, as a physician understands them, is not to be drunk. "
Unimportant in what sense? You could say the same about any belief: it doesn't matter what you believe because the reality remains the same. 
The metaphysics...as in the determinable truth value of whether god exists or not. 
Take the question of whether we both perceive the same apple metaphysically as the same colour of red. There is no determinable answer, but pragmatism would assert that this doesn't matter what really matters is that the apple is red. It opens the realm for a third sort of truth that is sometimes called intersubjective. 
Physics is a good example, metaphysically the mathematical representations are not the reality in fact they have and will change as time goes by. However it "ought" to be accepted as true because these representations gives important and effective information about the real world. 
So the existence of god/no god is unimportant because no matter how much you argue you cannot prove that god fundamentally exists or doesn't exist. Pragmatism is a response to the great metaphysical dichotomies of philosophy. It is meant to convince philosophers to move beyond the fundamental truth problems to look instead at the instrumentalism of a truth. 
This assumption is wrong.  People's belief in metaphysical (or lack of) mechanisms help people feel fulfilled about their lives.  Because even if you don't believe in the metaphysical, than the context of a self-entitled life remain unchanged, because they still rely on defined fulfillments.  
For example, the early Pagans believed in casual sex with strangers as a "ritual" to "appease the sex gods".  Both the believers and non-believers wanted the same thing:  Satisfaction.  
So by understanding satisfaction, pragmatism is the perceived fulfillment of satisfaction.  
Mechanism like baptisms, wedding ceremonies, fulfill these conjured "needs"
5 men walk into a bar: two empiricists, two rationalists and a pragmatist. After seating the bartender brings them a bottle of red wine and asks if it is the same colour of red that they all see. 
The first rationalist asserts that it is one wine therefore it must be the same colour of red that they are seeing
The second rationalist asserts instead that they cannot be seeing the same colour at all because they are merely seeing the essences of redness
The first empiricist argues that it must be the same colour of red because the light is reflecting off the same object and impressing the same colour on each of them
The second empiricist returns that they all have unique perspectives of this light and therefore they have different impressions of the red
They then all turn to the pragmatist who has on a frown, who then says I'm glad we can all agree that this is red wine because I ordered white. 
To explain further pragmatism is all about the metaphysics, having a belief and asserting the practicality of said belief is not what the method is about. This is because the second you talk about concrete realities and effects you are not talking about the metaphysics of something at all. Again pragmatism has nothing to do with the practicalities or benefits of a belief but about a method of avoiding indeterminate metaphysical circle jerks.   
Say there is a debate about the nature of reality whether is exists or is a figment of our imaginations. The pragmatist would be uninterested in this sort of discourse because it does not matter if it is or is not a figment of their imagination because they are still going to be going about the world as if it is real (Hume). What about the question of whether morality exists, this is unimportant because we are still going to go about the world as if morality existed (Dewey). 
pragmatism has nothing to do with the practicalities or benefits of a belief but about a method of avoiding indeterminate metaphysical circle jerks.
This seems sensible to me, but "avoiding some X" tends to imply "seeking some Y".  Not an academic here, but it seems to me that Pragmatism could be summed up by a phrase like the imperative: "Cherish Useful Rules".  Here (briefly) "Cherish" refers to acts of thought, belief or deed, "Useful" depends on community, context and values and a Rule is any kind of statement of the form "Given condition A, condition B leads to condition C".
And "Cherish Useful Rules" could be viewed as an alternative to "Seek Absolute Truths".
Using your same formulation I would describe it more as cherish useful truths. 
Keep in mind it was a response to the great metaphysical dichotomies. Its kind of a come on guys we have been going back and forth with this same shit for 2,500 years why don't we move past it already and find another means of assessing truth values.  
Hmm, I guess my maxim was more akin to everyday pragmatism (do whatever works for you, practicality not abstraction) than to philosophical pragmatism.  
Seeing the historical context of pragmatism, ah yes that helps me understand it better, thanks.
This presumption works against pragmatism because it makes it loaded.  It's not pragmatic to disconnect yourself from fully understanding a situation, it's simply idealism.  
The impasse that destroys your definition of pragmatism is that different groups will have varying, subjective ideas of what is "concretely better or worse".  
There are no "pragmatists", rather, there are people who use pragmatism.  There is no foundation-level essence of pragmatism.  The reason for this is because a human life lives within its own selfish context, with deep-seeded biological desires yet to be adequately defined.  
There was a story about the usefulness of giving out free condoms during World Cup and Olympic events.  The issue wasn't morality, but the realization that this type promotion eventually hurts the bottom-line.  Families visiting the Olympic parks spend a lot more money than singles.  
In the end, the idea of just handing out condoms on the street corners doesn't at all seem pragmatic, but another relative experiment with relative results.  
The avoiding of the moral question castrated "pragmatist's" ability to be actually pragmatic
No where in that comment did you talk about pragmatism. Instead you have conflated it with the word practical/useful which it is not synonymous with. 
http://www.iep.utm.edu/pragmati/
Nor did you understand a single thing that I was trying to say. 
I specifically made an example of of how the "pragmatist" should be interested in a moral discussion because it might affect the overall pragmatic value.  Even in the link you provided, the origins of the word fits what I'm trying to say.  I'm sorry it doesn't exactly align with your presumptions.  
What makes these philosophers pragmatists? There is, alas, no simple answer to this question. For there is no pragmatist creed; that is, no neat list of articles or essential tenets endorsed by all pragmatists and only by pragmatists   
Internet some more.  
You have no idea what you are reading then...I've studied it at the post graduate level specifically the ethics...the quote you provided supports what I'm saying so I'll try again there is no creed because it's not about the answers it is about the methodology. The methodology is specifically concerns the metaphysical dichotomies. How about you read more and actually care for what you are reading instead of being a rhetorician in a forum for the philosopher 
This post is arguing against a different idea. You're arguing for the idea that: God doesn't exist and everyone convincingly knows it, which changes how people approach the world.
I agree, but that isn't the situation at hand. God existing or not existing, with no evidence one way or the other, is what we are talking about. And in that case, god existing or not existing is irrelevant as far as humanity goes.
My issue is that atheism is used as a foundation for the argument of pragmatism.  I'm arguing that there is nothing to suggest that considering people's relative lifestyles and needs.  
Think about how pragmatism clashed with the idea of gay marriage.  Marriage itself seemed nothing more than unnecessary in the first place.
It was wildly considered "unnecessary" for gays to be married.  As if they couldn't participate in a "sacred ritual".  
There is something fundamentally deeper to people's needs than a pre-defined set of wants and needs.  Simply because people's wants and needs have mystical, noble, or philosophical needs.  
Large-scaled religions with established and a shared set of rules, like institutionalizing marriage for example, was a pragmatic venture.  
Pragmatism is the principle of having no principles.
Nice phrase. Somehow both meaningless and wrong, but well constructed.
Yee something close to my field! Thank you!
Post it to /r/cogsci as well, they'll appreciate it.
You can go ahead, I don't really browse there at all so doesn't make much sense for me.
Hey folks,
This space is for discussion of the article: ambiguities in the text, counterarguments to the arguments raised, clarifications, that sort of thing.
It is not a space for venting your own opinions on the subject of reparations in general.
Thanks.
Or why don't we all just band together and agree that shitty things happened and do our best not to repeat our mistakes. I don't owe anyone anything for what my ancestors did and no one owes me anything. Otherwise 90% of the world would owe me something.
I am leaving this comment up to provide context for /u/TychoCelchuuu's response, but ordinarily I would remove it because of Commenting Rule 2.
This is a venue for arguments, not for people to dump their opinions.
This sort of response is usually much more tempting for people who would owe reparations than for people who are due reparations.
You could for instance give the same response about contemporary wrongdoing: if I steal your wallet, I could say "why don't we all just band together and agree that shitty things happened and do our best not to repeat our mistakes. I don't owe anything for what I did and no one owes me anything." I take it your response would be "uh yes you do owe something, you can't just say 'I don't owe anything' without giving some further argument." The question is whether reparations are different or whether they are the same.
That is most definitely a different situation. If we are going with reparations as far back as normal civilization then the Romans enslaved my ancestors, then other random European nations. The Irish and Scottish purged my ancestors clan from their homes. The US forced my Mormon ancestors from their homes. That's a lot of people owing me something. Reparations are a sad excuse for people who want things handed to them with a smug grin and a strong sense of entitlement. We need to look to the future, as we cannot change the past.
It's true that it's "a different situation" in the sense that there are various differences between the wallet theft and the reparations being discussed here. However, saying "we need to look to the future, as we cannot change the past" doesn't capture the fact that they are different situations, because I could say the same thing after stealing your wallet. Also, saying "that's a lot of people owing me something" also doesn't capture the different - if 500 people each stole $4 from your bank account, I take it you wouldn't say "whoops, that's too many people to collect from, I guess I'm up shit creek without a paddle."
Moreover, your characterization of reparations as " sad excuse for people who want things handed to them with a smug grin and a strong sense of entitlement" could also be applied to your demand for your wallet. But I take it that you think your demand for your wallet would be justified even if offered with a smug grin and a sense of entitlement (and moreover I think you would say it's false that you would ask for your wallet with a smug grin).
I will agree that if someone were slighted or persecuted in recent history that they are owed something in return as they are still actively suffering. Like the genocide in Rwanda. Those people are still suffering from it. But the fact that my Mormon ancestors were still being driven out of their homes 100 years ago is simply a part of history and all those that suffered are long gone. The issue has been resolved due to the recognition of every Americans right to religious freedom. I wouldn't call that reparation because nothing was given to them in return for their persecution, but they are seen equally by the whole of America now.
We're not talking about being "seen equally," we are talking about material possessions. An issue has not been "resolved" if the possessions do not belong to their rightful owners, and we might think that the rightful owners of wealth generated by slaves are the descendants of the slaves, not the descendants of the slaveholders.
Unfortunately there is almost no way that most people can definitively prove what would be owed to them. I don't think dwelling on it will help anything. Who can say whether or not that some people and their lineage may have been saved by slavery. Plus common history about American slavery has been called in to question as many of the atrocities committed have been found fictional. Some slaves were beaten and broken but most were treated like your average laborer. And on top many were given money to spend however they wished. I'm not saying slavery was good. But that calls in to question how much is owed if so many had a better quality of life here in America compared to Africa and now their descendents can make a great life for themselves in today's time.
You seem fond of the wallet analogy, but it isn't a very good one. The main difference is that a wallet is a concrete thing with a discrete history of ownership and a set financial value, and that the relationships between the people involved are clear.
Whereas, reparations deals with much more abstract issues.
First, are the descendants of African slaves worse off than they would have been had their descendants not been slaves? It's not clear that the answer is yes (at least not in the financial frame that reparations discussions lock us into) -- look at the dire poverty you find in many African nations, and compare it to the standard of living most people, even poor ones, can eke out in the West. And not all descendants of slaves are poor, of course. Can a middle-class descendant of slaves really claim with certainty that he'd be better off if his family had stayed free in Africa?
Nor is it entirely clear that you can even make the same sort of distinction between  reparer and reparee that you can between descendant of rightful wallet owner and wallet thief. It wasn't uncommon for slave owners to father children on their slaves. And, of course, racial intermingling continued beyond the end of slavery. Which means many descendants of slaves are also descendants of slaver owners. Should they have to pay reparations because of their great-great-great-etc-grandfather's slaveholding ways? And if so, can they also claim a share of that payment for themselves?
Finally, of course, reparations wouldn't be paid from slave owner descendants to slave descendants. They'd be paid by the government to slave descendants.  And while some of the tax dollars used would come from the descendants of slave owners, an awful lot of it would come from people whose families never owned slaves (most northerners, southerners whose families weren't wealthy enough to afford slaves, the descendants of any immigrants, including European ones, who came here after 1865, and so on).
I am only using the wallet analogy to show that there can be reasons to return stolen property. I do not mean for the wallet case to be the same as the reparations case.
Incidentally, I'm not sure the various points you raise are very convincing. Just because someone is better off because their ancestors were slaves doesn't mean it's okay to keep stolen property - if I steal your wallet and you end up better off because you fall in love with the police officer investigating your case, I still owe you your wallet.
Just because the case is unclear in some cases when the lineage is intermixed doesn't mean the case is unclear in cases where the lineage is not intermixed, and, moreover, children of slaveholder + slave unions typically did not inherit the wealth. That people have intermarried later on down the line should make reparations more palatable, I'd think, because then the money isn't just going from white people to black people, which I suspect is what most people are objecting to, deep down.
I'm not sure why the reparations have to come from the government - if I steal your wallet the reparations come from me, not the government - and even if they come from the government, I take it this is because some form of collective responsibility is true, such that citizens are responsible for what their government does even if they personally didn't do it.
Just because someone is better off because their ancestors were slaves doesn't mean it's okay to keep stolen property
You've missed the point. There's no actual property involved. To the extent that the analogy works at all, the wallet would represent freedom. The slaves had their freedom taken away. Their freedom was returned to them. So it's not a cut and dried matter the way the wallet example is. Rather, the whole issue is one that arises once we're passed the point that the analogy can be helpful.  The question hinges on what duty we have to make up for perceived social harms flowing from the initial wrong. But it's not clear that the descendants of slaves have suffered objective social harm vis-a-vis what they could have expected had their ancestors not been enslaved. Yes, they and their ancestors were clearly disadvantaged relative to the slave-owners and their descendants, but that's sort of irrelevant.
Just because the case is unclear in some cases when the lineage is intermixed doesn't mean the case is unclear in cases where the lineage is not intermixed
How many people can honestly say they know their lineage back over close to two centuries? Especially the descendants of slaves, whose children's paternity might not have been certain even to the mother? That, again, is the real point -- there are no clear cases to begin with.
moreover, children of slaveholder + slave unions typically did not inherit the wealth.
So? We're talking about assigning blood guilt based on lines of descent. Which really is a bad idea from the outset, as you begin to see.
That people have intermarried later on down the line should make reparations more palatable, I'd think
Why would having money flowing from some descendants of slave owners to other descendants of slave owners be more palatable?
I'm not sure why the reparations have to come from the government - if I steal your wallet the reparations come from me, not the government
Again, you run into the problem of trying to sort out the descendants of slave owners from those who weren't. Worse, under your logic, you'd then have to match them with the descendants of the particular slaves their ancestors owned. And what if the slave-owner descendant happened to now be a welfare recipient? Would you force him to work to pay off the debt, turn him into a slave? And what, legally speaking, would be your justification? Because his ancestor did nothing legally wrong. Which is another flaw in your analogy. You're comparing remedying the unjust results of a crime (mugging) to the unjust results of perfectly legal actions (slavery). Legal changes aren't generally retroactive, for obvious reasons.
You've missed the point. There's no actual property involved. To the extent that the analogy works at all, the wallet would represent freedom. The slaves had their freedom taken away. 
Reparations aren't for the abstract idea of "freedom," they're for the distinct economic gains from slavery which accrued to the slaveholders rather than to the slaves. If reparations were just for the fact that people were enslaved, then the chance to do those vanishes when the salve dies, because "having been a slave" is not something you can pass on to your descendants, whereas "having wealth created by slaves" is something you can pass on to your descendants.
Their freedom was returned to them. So it's not a cut and dried matter the way the wallet example is. 
But it is cut and dried. The slaves created wealth. That wealth belonged to them, rightfully, but it was taken by the slaveholders. In effect, the slaves worked and earned a living and put their wages in a wallet, and then the slaveholder stole the wallet. Every day.
The question hinges on what duty we have to make up for perceived social harms flowing from the initial wrong. 
We're not talking about "perceived social harms," we're talking about real economic harms. (Nobody thinks any reparations are ever due for perceived harms, whether they be social, economic, or anything else. So I'm not sure why you think we're talking about perceived harms.)
But it's not clear that the descendants of slaves have suffered objective social harm vis-a-vis what they could have expected had their ancestors not been enslaved. 
They've suffered to the degree that they haven't inherited wealth that they would've inherited had the slaves been paid for their labor.
How many people can honestly say they know their lineage back over close to two centuries?
A lot, I think, if we do the research?
Especially the descendants of slaves, whose children's paternity might not have been certain even to the mother?
Does it matter that much?
That, again, is the real point -- there are no clear cases to begin with.
I mean, obviously there are some clear cases. Some people can unambiguously track their heritage to slaves or slaveholders. This is only a few generations we're talking about here.
So? We're talking about assigning blood guilt based on lines of descent.
No we're not. We're talking about reparations for harms inflicted on slaves. I don't know what "blood guilt" is but it sounds nasty and nobody would argue for that. And we're not basing it on "lines of descent" except insofar as one's descendants have a right to one's property, which I take it is very uncontroversial.
Why would having money flowing from some descendants of slave owners to other descendants of slave owners be more palatable?
Because I take it one of the main reasons people object to reparations is because they, like you, have some hazy concept of "blood guilt" according to which one race owes another race something, and they find this hazy concept objectionable.
Again, you run into the problem of trying to sort out the descendants of slave owners from those who weren't. 
You are making this problem more insoluble than it in fact is.
Worse, under your logic, you'd then have to match them with the descendants of the particular slaves their ancestors owned.
Ideally, yes, although you could of course just establish something more vague, like "$X per slave" or something.
And what if the slave-owner descendant happened to now be a welfare recipient? 
Then we're in the same position where you'd be if I stole and burned your wallet and I had no other money to repay you.
Would you force him to work to pay off the debt, turn him into a slave? 
Would I be forced into slavery to repay you for your wallet?
And what, legally speaking, would be your justification?
We're not talking about legality, we are talking about morality.
Because his ancestor did nothing legally wrong. 
But that's irrelevant.
Which is another flaw in your analogy. 
It's not a flaw, it's a disanalogy. Moreover, we can fix it really easily. Simply make it legal to steal wallets.
You're comparing remedying the unjust results of a crime (mugging) to the unjust results of perfectly legal actions (slavery). 
Yes. So?
Legal changes aren't generally retroactive, for obvious reasons.
If you spell out these "obvious reasons" I think you will find that very few of them apply to slavery.
Reparations aren't for the abstract idea of "freedom," they're for the distinct economic gains from slavery which accrued to the slaveholders rather than to the slaves. 
But again, it's not clear how to measure this. I mean, many freed slaves ended up working as employees on plantations where they had formerly been slaves. This did not make them wealthy. Nor do similar jobs today generally open a path to great savings and wealth. It seems likely that had the slaves been free men, they would have had much better lives but gathered comparatively not much more saved wealth.
We're not talking about "perceived social harms,"
The article does in fact mention these.
Does it matter that much?
Yes. You can't just handwave away the fact that there's a large overlap between the group of people who are descendants of slave owners and those who are the descendants of slaves, or that we have no real way of identifying who goes where.
I don't know what "blood guilt" is but it sounds nasty and nobody would argue for that
Except, since there isn't really a lot of actual property or wealth involved, it boils down to primarily extracting money from some people based purely on their bloodlines and giving it to others. That's blood guilt. But you're right that it is nasty.
Then we're in the same position where you'd be if I stole and burned your wallet and I had no other money to repay you.
Except you're being hand-wavey again. The point is that no one living in this scenario stole anything. Any wrongs done were done 160 years ago. That's eight generations, assuming twenty years a generation. That's more than enough time for regression to the mean to take place, for wealthy family lines to experience declines and their descendants to recover again. So there's no "I" who stole anything. Plus, if someone's ancestor was a wealthy slave owner but they are now a welfare recipient, then their children or grandchildren may rise to prominence again. Should the government hover in the background, waiting to pounce and seizing the reparations whenever it can? And why then if we are not talking about blood guilt should people who pull themselves out of dire poverty, having had no advantage from their ancestors' wrongs, be forced to pay for those wrongs? And if they shouldn't, on what grounds could you discount the claims of any who claimed that somewhere between the original sin and the present, one of the intermediate generations "burned the wallet", and so no reparations now were owed?
We're not talking about legality, we are talking about morality.
Oh, if we're only talking about those descendants of slave owners who feel like giving money to the descendants of slaves, then that's fine. No one would argue that they shouldn't be allowed to do what they like with their own money. Of course, that isn't what we were talking about and you know it -- we were discussing precisely government sanctioned legal remedies. And since that's the case, it's perfectly legitimate to point out that slavery was legal, and that even though it is now illegal, the law does not penalize people retroactively, much less make people's great-great-great-great-great-great-grandchildren pay for their sins of their ancestors. 
It's not a flaw, it's a disanalogy. Moreover, we can fix it really easily. Simply make it legal to steal wallets.
But that doesn't fix it. Because if it were legal to take other people's wallets, it would no longer be stealing under the law, by definition. And if someone took your wallet, knowing full well it was legal to do so, and then the laws were changed to make it illegal, you would not expect to have your wallet returned to you. 
But again, it's not clear how to measure this. I mean, many freed slaves ended up working as employees on plantations where they had formerly been slaves. This did not make them wealthy. Nor do similar jobs today generally open a path to great savings and wealth. It seems likely that had the slaves been free men, they would have had much better lives but gathered comparatively not much more saved wealth.
This might just mean that it's impossible to know the right amount to pay. It doesn't mean that there's no right amount to pay.
The article does in fact mention these.
Only by way of explaining why these are not properly thought of as reparations...
Yes. You can't just handwave away the fact that there's a large overlap between the group of people who are descendants of slave owners and those who are the descendants of slaves, or that we have no real way of identifying who goes where.
Why not?
Except, since there isn't really a lot of actual property or wealth involved, it boils down to primarily extracting money from some people based purely on their bloodlines and giving it to others. That's blood guilt. But you're right that it is nasty.
It's not based "purely" (or even at all) on bloodlines, it's based on inheritance of property that rightly belonged to someone else.
Except you're being hand-wavey again. The point is that no one living in this scenario stole anything. Any wrongs done were done 160 years ago. That's eight generations, assuming twenty years a generation. That's more than enough time for regression to the mean to take place, for wealthy family lines to experience declines and their descendants to recover again. 
How wealthy a family line is is irrelevant - it's not more okay to keep stolen property if you're poor, or less okay to get it back if you're rich.
Plus, if someone's ancestor was a wealthy slave owner but they are now a welfare recipient, then their children or grandchildren may rise to prominence again. Should the government hover in the background, waiting to pounce and seizing the reparations whenever it can?
That might work.
And why then if we are not talking about blood guilt should people who pull themselves out of dire poverty, having had no advantage from their ancestors' wrongs, be forced to pay for those wrongs?
We might want to limit it just to people who still retain the property in the sense of having built on the wealth that was originally stolen it (in which case we wouldn't do the "government waits to pounce" thing).
And if they shouldn't, on what grounds could you discount the claims of any who claimed that somewhere between the original sin and the present, one of the intermediate generations "burned the wallet", and so no reparations now were owed?
You could either check financial records, or say that this is implausible in some cases (most cases?). There might be other options too.
Oh, if we're only talking about those descendants of slave owners who feel like giving money to the descendants of slaves, then that's fine.
No, I mean, we're not talking about current legality. If morally things ought to be one way, then we might want to pass a law that makes them that way. So for instance if it were legal to murder, we would probably want to pass a law to make it illegal to murder. Since it's currently legal not to repay money stolen from slaves, we might want to pass a law to make it illegal to withhold this stolen property. (Obviously there are other solutions than just a law like that.)
nd since that's the case, it's perfectly legitimate to point out that slavery was legal, and that even though it is now illegal, the law does not penalize people retroactively, much less make people's great-great-great-great-great-great-grandchildren pay for their sins of their ancestors.
You could argue this, but it's a crummy argument. That slavery was legal in the past is no reason to think that people ought not to be forced to give back the property that was unjustifiably taken from the slaves. Perhaps the government ought to compensate the people who are paying the reparations, because it was legal back then or because they're not the slaveholders themselves, and perhaps we might want to institutionalize this to a large degree to the point where the government just handles all the reparations rather than taking money from specific slaveholder descendants. But the moral justification is, at its basis, the fact that property was unjustly taken from slaves and then inherited.
But that doesn't fix it. Because if it were legal to take other people's wallets, it would no longer be stealing under the law, by definition.
It wouldn't be stealing under the law, but it would still be stealing, morally speaking (by "stealing" I assume we mean something like "taking something that rightfully belongs to someone else without their permission"). Unless you think property is simply a convention that depends 100% on the government and 0% on morality, such that the government could pass a law tomorrow taking everyone's property and there would be nothing wrong with this, surely you can understand how taking someone's property, even though perfectly legal, can still be immoral. Like for instance when people took properties from the Jews in Germany when it passed the law saying Jews couldn't own businesses - if that wasn't stealing, then nothing is.
And if someone took your wallet, knowing full well it was legal to do so, and then the laws were changed to make it illegal, you would not expect to have your wallet returned to you.
I sure as fuck would!
If I'm not mistaken, the difference he's getting at is the clarity of who is the rightful owner and who was in receipt of the stolen property.
Let's say the guy you stole the wallet from was the great-great-great grandson of a notorious wild west cattle rustler who never made repayment (and your friend knows this, say because the family remains locally prominent). Should he track down the heirs of the victims? Oh, but the victims were themselves reputed to be guilty of shady business practices, with what justice can no longer be determined.
Who should get the wallet?
Or let's go back. The guy you stole from is white and your friend is black. Should he give the wallet back?
They know for sure that the friend's ancestors were the slaves of the guy whose wallet you took (they're into geneology). Or instead, one or both are recent immigrants and their ancestors had nothing to do with slavery. Now what?
Your only argument seems to be direct cause and effect and you fail to address completely the issue at hand.
What would you do if your father had stolen someone's wallet and after he dies of cancer, that someone who got his wallet stolen wants you imprisoned for the crimes of your father? That's a direct question and not hard to answer. Would you go to jail happily or resist it? Be careful what you're going to answer, it might invalidate all that you've written so far.
What would you do if your father had stolen someone's wallet and after he dies of cancer, that someone who got his wallet stolen wants you imprisoned for the crimes of your father? That's a direct question and not hard to answer.
Thats a terrible analogy for reperations. Whats happened is your father stole someones wallet and now that person wants their wallet back.
You seem to be under the illusion that reperations are intended as a punishment.
Please see "accessory" and "accomplice." 
Your only argument seems to be direct cause and effect and you fail to address completely the issue at hand.
My argument is just that sometimes there can be a duty to return stolen property that you own, even if you are not at fault for the property having been stolen. This of course doesn't establish that reparations are morally required, but it does establish one important part of the argument for reparations, and this is a part that people in the thread have been challenging.
It can be done. Relinquish inheritance to cut inherited moral obligations, or pay an additional social progressive tax.  
So take a family inheritance away to pay to someone's family that may have had a bad past? That's a little  outrageous. Most slave owners lost most of their wealth after the war anyway. Everyone lost everything. And what about southern white families who owned plantations but didn't own slaves that lost every single thing they owned. That would
 mean everyone who can trace their lineage to the South would be owed something. I still don't agree that if your ancestors suffered that you deserve anything because of what they went through. My whole life and my family has lived in the lower middle class as far back as we can trace and it may be attributed to the actions of other people but their obligations died with them. I don't envy the rich and I generally don't feel sorry for the poor. Who we are is up to us through our actions, not our grandparents.
It depends on on why you think we ought to return the wallet. If you think returning stolen property is an issue of strict social benefit, then redistributive justice is a responsibility you ought to apply on the basis of need and ability, not historical happenstance. If you think it's an issue of desert, then the non identity problem badly weakens the case for reparations.
That would suit some countries especially well. Why would the other countries agree though?
I think you need to get at this by moral arguments rather than appeal to individual self-interest 
I am looking at it on the grand scheme of things. If the whole world decided to right every wrong that's ever been done, we would be wasting vast amounts of time and money. And the article was rather individualized speaking of righting thebwro mg s of your parents. But reparations generally already happen on the large scale. In the US, people were enslaved for decades and now they share the same rights as any. Reparations given.
If the whole world decided to right every wrong that's ever been done, we would be wasting vast amounts of time and money.
Luckily no one intends to do that. Maybe we should look at what supporters of reperations actually believe instead of criticising them on the basis of the most extreme take on their position we can imagine.
In the US, people were enslaved for decades and now they share the same rights as any. Reparations given.
That isn't reperations. Sure the US stopped doing a bad thing, but they haven't compensated it.
Interesting article. I think wrongdoers have the duty to repair moral damage along with restoring what they stole, but the duties would diminish with each passing generation, to avoid an endless reparation duty from people who din't benefit to people who weren't wronged.
Let's say, it would start at point 5 with the first generation (wrongdoers vs victims), and end at point 1 for great grandchildren.
[removed]
Let's say I steal your wallet and I give it to my friend, then I die of a heart attack. Does my friend have to give your wallet back? My friend did no harm to you, you were not directly harmed by my friend. Is wanting your wallet back the same as wanting a handout?
Does my friend have to give your wallet back?
No. Chances are high that in that case, your friend would not even know who to return it to, nor would I know to go looking for that specific friend of yours.
A wallet analogy doesn't really work for longer time scale incidents such as the stolen generation(s) here in Australia.
I think everyone can agree that what went on with the stolen generation was not right, now that public opinion is something which has come about in the last 20-30 years, 70 odd years since it stopped from a different generation than the one which caused the pain (in some cases a few generations gaps)
Then we get to the matter of when those that caused the original problem are dead, who's responsible? The answer to that, is the dead person.
The acts of an individual over the course of their life time are not handed down as inheritance to their children and in some cases, specific children receive no inheritances at all, are they exempt from any assumed inherited responsibility for their forebears actions?
I can't really grasp how in the concept of being responsible for your own actions and demanding/providing reparations from someone who personally didn't cause you harm can work hand in hand.
EDIT: In terms of how you can reconcile that morally? After knowing for certain without a doubt that your ancestors personally did horrible things? That's up to the individual, after all, what do you have to do, to feel that you have fulfilled your moral obligations? Follow your personal morals.
Chances are high that in that case, your friend would not even know who to return it to, nor would I know to go looking for that specific friend of yours.
Your driver's license is in the wallet, my friend doesn't exactly need to be Sherlock Holmes to return the thing. Anyways, the whole robbery was recorded on camera by the police, who followed me back to my friend's house and got there just as I handed the wallet over and died of a heart attack, and you've reported the robbery to those same police, so you know exactly who to go looking for. Or maybe this all happened in the space of 15 seconds - I stole your wallet, tossed it to my friend who happened to be walking by, and died of a heart attack, all while you're standing there watching.
A wallet analogy doesn't really work for longer time scale incidents such as the stolen generation(s) here in Australia.
The wallet analogy is just meant to show that it can sometimes be a duty to return stolen property even if you were not the one who stole it. I don't mean for the wallet analogy to be a perfect analogy to Australia. There are of course differences, like the period of time that has elapsed, as you note.
Then we get to the matter of when those that caused the original problem are dead, who's responsible? The answer to that, is the dead person.
But nobody is arguing about this. We can all agree on that, just as we can agree that I am responsible for stealing your wallet, whereas my friend is 100% blameless.
The acts of an individual over the course of their life time are not handed down as inheritance to their children and in some cases, specific children receive no inheritances at all, are they exempt from any assumed inherited responsibility for their forebears actions?
Remember, we're not talking about responsibility. We all agree that nobody today is responsible for acts in the past, just like my friend is not responsible for the wallet theft. We're asking what we should do with the stolen property.
I can't really grasp how in the concept of being responsible for your own actions and demanding/providing reparations from someone who personally didn't cause you harm can work hand in hand.
Again, we're not talking about responsibility. If people today were responsible for the stolen stuff, then it would be easy to explain why reparations are justified, just like it's easy to explain why I should give your wallet back. That's not the question we are asking. The question we are asking is whether people who are not responsible for the theft, like my friend or like people today, ought to return the property.
Okay, I can see where you are going with the disconnect between responsibility and reparations (I think, let me know if I'm wrong)
Being honest, I'm having problems seeing how they can not be entwined. 
To engage in paying reparations, you are accepting responsibility and fault for the end result of what originally occurred. 
Without accepting responsibility, what are you paying reparations for? Is it to help people? Well that's charity when it's broad and technically discrimination when it only applies to specific groups (there are more people in x society than just y that need help). 
The question we are asking is whether people who are not responsible for the theft, like my friend or like people today, ought to return the property.
I'm thinking that this depends entirely on the time scale for you not having that specific property and the actual value of said property.
To engage in paying reparations, you are accepting responsibility and fault for the end result of what originally occurred. 
This isn't true. If my friend gives the wallet back, my friend is not accepting responsibility and fault for the end result of what originally occurred. The responsibility and fault lies with the thief, not my friend. My friend is simply returning stolen property.
Without accepting responsibility, what are you paying reparations for?
You are paying reparations to give back money that was stolen.
Is it to help people?
It is to return stolen property.
Well that's charity when it's broad and technically discrimination when it only applies to specific groups (there are more people in x society than just y that need help). 
Is it charity if my friend returns your wallet?
I'm thinking that this depends entirely on the time scale for you not having that specific property and the actual value of said property.
If my friend got rid of the specific cash in the wallet (say, they spent it on food) but they still have the equivalent amount of cash in their bank account, should they give you the money? If you can't remember how much money was in the wallet and my friend can't either (my friend just stuck it all under the mattress), shouldn't my friend still return as much money as we estimate the wallet had?
The time span question is a further one. We might wonder how long I have to hold on to stolen property before it no longer counts as stolen. How long do you think is a good time?
We might wonder how long I have to hold on to stolen property before it no longer counts as stolen. How long do you think is a good time?
Heh, that goes into an even trickier conversation I'm sure.
I'd argue it would depend on the value of the property originally, how easy it is to replace the property, the exact circumstances behind losing the property originally, why you lost that property and I'm open to additional factors.
Using the mythical wallet (and your second option, your first would result in the wallet being returned in a timely and mostly untampered fashion). 
I've assumed it was stolen in 1980 at a bar in Sydney around midnight on new years eve due to my rather short shorts not being able to hold a full sized wallet. Once you've stolen it you palm it off to your friend who is walking by, you stumble off to the bathroom and have a heart attack while taking a leak. I don't know the wallet is missing yet cause the schooner is still half full.
Now, if something like this actually occurred, most people would just write it off as a loss and move on (albeit slightly pissed and whichever random person flogged their wallet) due to it being of low actual value
1 day -> 28 Days - I'm still a bit shitty but have no expectation of getting it back, your mate has probably used the cash to get a slab from the bottle-o and the wallet is in landfill
29 days -> 3 months - might still be a couple of issues remaining but by the end of 3 months, it's probably out of mind. Your mate finished the slab a long time ago and has probably attended your funeral.
3 months + - out of sight, out of mind, probably only thought about during new years eve celebrations or when you go back to that specific pub. Your mate probably raises a beer in honour of the death slab you helped produce for him.
Now land, money, culture, etc. are something entirely different as it still exists (or at least most of it in one form or another). Maybe the government acquired it and then sold or gifted it to people who then continued to do that down the chain up to today. 
What if that government doesn't exist any more (British Empire/you), the original people they gave the property to have also died (your friend/settlers) and it was given to someone else in exchange for money (the shopkeeper who took the stolen money in exchange for a slab/settler2)
I think I'm blabbering at the moment but it is still a thought provoking concept (the original post).
[removed]
I believe the main argument is that going to college should be a norm.
What in the world are you talking about? Where does the article mention college admissions?! I think you've confused affirmative action with reparations, which is impressive because the article doesn't mention affirmative action at all.
And on the wallet thing, I hope you have a heart attack after stealing it, friend too. By the time that's all said and done, I would have most likely went through the frustration of replacing it and the contents at cost to myself, not someone else.
So, let me get this straight. If I steal your wallet and have a heart attack, my friend doesn't have to give the wallet back? Let's say this all happens in the span of 15 seconds. I steal your wallet, toss it to my friend who just happens to be walking by (my friend hasn't done anything wrong), and immediately collapse dead. What if I steal your car? Same thing? My friend doesn't have to give the car back? What if I clear out your entire bank account - all of your life savings? What if I enslave you for three decades and build up a great degree of wealth by having stolen all your labor? Does my friend really get to keep all the money I earned by selling the stuff that you made while you were my slave?
I was speaking towards another comment with the college stuff. 
You want to steal? That is great, goes along with the problem you are talking about, because an eye for an eye always works, right?
Sure, let the friend keep the money, I could care less, and could always earn more. This underprivileged life talk is all garbage, get up and stop sulking, do something, be someone.... OR just complain the rest of your life because you weren't given a fair chance and that the world is supposed to be fair, it isn't. Give someone that handout, and someone else will come and take it from them. 
You want to steal? That is great, goes along with the problem you are talking about, because an eye for an eye always works, right?
I don't quite understand what you are saying. Reparations are not "an eye for an eye" - the goal is to take the stolen property and return it to the original owner. The reason "an eye for an eye" is bad is because "it leaves the whole world blind" - nobody ends up better off, everyone ends up worse off. Reparations are different, because if I steal your wallet, and we take it back from my friend and give it to you, the whole world is not "blind." You end up back where you started, with your wallet. It's true that my friend loses the wallet, but that wasn't my friend's wallet in the first place. My friend did nothing to earn the wallet. 
This is closer to a situation where I stab you in the kidney and then I donate you a kidney to make up for it, but even that's not quite the same, because in that example I've destroyed a kidney, so something has been lost, whereas in the wallet case nothing has been lost - it has just moved around, and we're trying to move it back to the right place.
Sure, let the friend keep the money, I could care less, and could always earn more.
You didn't answer my question about the car, or the bank account, or the three decades of slavery. Do you truly believe that I can take these things from you and then give them to a friend, leaving the friend with no duty to return these things?
This underprivileged life talk is all garbage, get up and stop sulking, do something, be someone.... OR just complain the rest of your life because you weren't given a fair chance and that the world is supposed to be fair, it isn't. 
I don't think any of this is relevant to whether my friend has to give your wallet, car, bank account, or money back. Let's assume for the sake of the argument that you never complain - when I take your wallet, your car, your bank account, enslave you for three decades, etc. you just say "eh whatever." Still, though, my friend ought to give this stuff back, right?
Give someone that handout, and someone else will come and take it from them. 
Is returning stolen property really a "handout?" Is that how life works? Are you serious about this?
Car- I need a new one anyway, good thing i pay for insurance.
Slavery- Good luck with that one.
Bank Account- I don't keep much in there anyways, I tend to invest my money.
If this is your friend, they probably feel the same sense of entitlement you did, and I wouldn't expect anything more.
How about this... Should I just give everything back that was supposedly taken by my ancestors, even though I have no knowledge or direct ties to it, or should people learn from mistakes and attempt to improve themselves. There is nothing stopping self improvement except people themselves. I don't consider anything "stolen" property if it was not stolen from the person in question, they just don't get what they believe they are entitled to... some sort of inheritance, or in other words a handout.
I'm not sure you are taking this very seriously.
Car- I need a new one anyway, good thing i pay for insurance.
Let's say I steal your car and I steal the insurance money that you get paid.
Slavery- Good luck with that one.
This is childish. People are enslaved all over the world, and it's not because they aren't as awesome as you are. It's because sometimes someone threatens to kill you and your family if you don't do what they say, and you have no choice, because the government won't do anything to help you.
Bank Account- I don't keep much in there anyways, I tend to invest my money.
Then I steal your investments somehow. You're missing the point of the argument - I'm trying to point out that if something is stolen from you, you ought to get it back. If the example I pick (a bank account) is something that isn't relevant because, for instance, you have a small bank account, pick something that is relevant. If you think nothing is relevant, and anything can be stolen from you and it doesn't matter, then what is your problem with reparations? Can't the person demanding reparations just steal whatever they want from you, and you won't mind?
If this is your friend, they probably feel the same sense of entitlement you did, and I wouldn't expect anything more.
No, my friend is not like this. In fact let's say they're not my friend. They're a stranger. I've never met them. I just want to steal something from you because I'm a terrible person. I don't care who gets it, I just want to give it to some random person.
How about this... Should I just give everything back that was supposedly taken by my ancestors, even though I have no knowledge or direct ties to it 
The word "supposedly" is not helpful here. Nobody argues that something "supposedly" stolen ought to be returned. Only stuff that has been actually stolen ought to be returned. As to whether you have no knowledge of the theft, this might just be your own personal ignorance - people with more understanding of the situation might look at bank records and police records and notice that your father stole stuff and fled the country or something. To preclude your inevitable answer "my father didn't do this" or whatever, please note that this might not be about you. We might be talking about other people. So imagine the case where someone else's father stole stuff.
There is nothing stopping self improvement except people themselves. 
If I steal your money, this presumably impedes your self-improvement, does it not? By "self-improvement" I assume you mean stuff like "work hard, save your money, invest it wisely, etc." But surely if I steal all the results of your hard work, your self-improvement is being impeded not by yourself, but by my theft.
I don't consider anything "stolen" property if it was not stolen from the person in question, they just don't get what they believe they are entitled to... some sort of inheritance, or in other words a handout.
We've got multiple points up in the air here - now it sounds like you're saying something's not stolen from you if it's taken from one of your ancestors, rather than from you. That's more or less what the article is arguing, so I'm not really sure what in the world you are talking about.
That's what I'm arguing, it isn't taken from the person in question, get over it and do something with your life rather than complaining about the past.
Say every child is taken from their parents at birth and raised by a government program. Would the decedents of the people that had these things "stolen" from them still be entitled to them?
Let's go at this from another angle.
You say that nobody is "entitled" to stuff from their ancestors - in other words, if my father stole stuff from your father, and thus I lost out on my inheritance, I shouldn't complain. I didn't do anything to earn that inheritance! I should just work hard in my own life and earn my own money, right?
If this is true, then it seems like the principle is something like "nobody deserves wealth that they didn't earn on their own." Would you agree with that?
If that is true, then the stuff we are talking about in terms of reparations all counts as stuff that nobody earned on their own. This is wealth that was stolen in the past and then handed down via inheritance to descendants of slaveholders. So let's say that today, I am a descendant of a slaveholder. I have $50k in my bank account that I earned on my own, and $50k in my bank account from my slaveholding father via inheritance. According to you, nobody deserves anything from inheritance - they only deserve what they get from their own hard work. So, there would be nothing wrong with taking my $50k inheritance from me, right? I have no reason to complain about this. That's nothing I deserve. It's just stuff from the past and I have no right to complain if it's taken away.
If that's all true, then there would be nothing wrong if the government passed a law saying "all money inherited from slaveholders will be taken away and given to descendants of slaves." There would be nothing wrong with this because according to you, inherited money isn't "deserved" by anyone. We could take it all away and burn it; we could take it all away and give it to John Cena; we could take it all away and give it to descendants of slaves; who gives a shit? Nobody earned that money so nobody deserves it.
Would you say this is correct?
Yeah, but you're benefiting from the harm that your predecessors caused. You've already got the handout.
If handout means that I have been working since I was 13, have a lot of student debt, and have a hard time getting a job because of EEO, sure... sounds about right.
and have a hard time getting a job because of EEO
I've always wondered how people come to conclusions like this. Were you turned down for a job, and then did you ask the interviewer why afterward? Did they tell you that you were turned down to offer a job to a minority? 
It reminds me of that silly girl who thought she didn't get into a Texas University because of affirmative action. As if the only reason a minority would get in while you wouldn't was because of affirmative action. 
Funny you should ask. I have a friend that works at the consulting firm I applied to and interviewed. I did not get the job, even though my qualifications were basically on point (same type of work I had been doing previously). I asked him who was hired, and was informed it was a latina woman who was just out of college. I would assume some sort of EOE was present, but didn't go on to ask the hiring manager myself.
So the only basis you have for assuming EOE was present is 1) You didn't get the (what appears to be very competitive) job you were qualified for, and 2) A latina woman did
You don't see anything wrong here? 
Considering years of experience directly relating to the position (me) and someone who just graduated college... you don't see anything wrong here?
Setting aside the irony of a person with years of experience in a field complaining about how hard it is to find a job because of affirmative action, why would there be anything wrong there? You don't know her credentials, you don't know her internship experience. If it had been a white dude straight out of college, would anyone have raised an eyebrow about him getting a job over someone with more experience? 
I'm not really complaining about it that much, more so, just seems rather peculiar. On internships, that shit doesn't really matter. Just based on the size of the company and the rest of the employees, it was pretty clear what happened.
All I'm saying, is that privately owned companies should not be required, by law, to hire based on ethnic background. Probably not even EOE though, I mean a few years experience plus a masters vs a bachelor degree and no experience... Seeing as it was a woman, I would assume blowjob.
I don't know your background, but to be brought up in an environment where going to university is the norm is an advantage. To be brought up in financial security is an advantage. To be brought up by supportive parents is an advantage.
The purpose of handouts I imagine is to equalise the advantage those more fortunate have gained, not by any of their virtue, but by the luck of being born in the right circumstances.
There's a saying -- 3 generations from shirtsleeves to shirtsleeves.  It's pretty widely acknowledged that ancestral wealth normally doesn't last  very long and economic mobility allows anyone to ascend to a higher class.  Sure, some people benefit from their parents and some don't, but that's life.  In all likelihood, any advantage our ancestors may or may not have gained from screwing over other people has vanished by now and none of us are really substantially better off because of dealings a century and a half ago.
Do you have some sources to back that up? Because from what I've heard, ancestral wealth can last a millenia. It's also pretty clear that slavery played a large role in todays racial inequality.
Just Google economic mobility.  Admittedly, economic mobility has been lower in the US than in some European countries in recent years.  But even in the US, the people born into the highest and lowest income quintiles only have about a 50% chance of remaining there as adults, meaning 50% of the lowest quintile is moving up and 50% of the highest quintile is moving down.  
I think the racial inequality point is a good one, but its not because of 150 year old slavery per se.  Racial discrimination at a systematic level (ie government and education) still existed through the 1960s and 70s.  That was only one or two generations ago.  
The argument "animal research is not efficient" is not very good. A large part of molecular and cellular biology comes from studying mice, c.elegans and drosophila, all animals.
K, how do we tell if a new cancer drug is going to kill the patient or the cancer? We could just test is out on your sister or your child or your wife instead. The genetic and physiological similarities within certain organ systems are very similar to those of humans when tested appropriately. At the end of the question, inflicting known harm and/or potential harm on any sentient being is problematic, but which would you rather kill in preclinical trials, 100 healthy, cared for lab rats or 100 of your friends and family, probably economically disadvantaged individuals, as they tend to represent a larger proportion of people volunteering for these studies, trying to make some extra money. 
The argument, "Well we should just stop making dangerous drugs!" would only illustrate ignorance about the scientific and medical process of research and development, so while I'd like to hear alternative methods to the current system, that is not a valid claim to make.
Animal research is clearly a necessity. What I wish those who advocate for animal rights etc. would realize is that they are misguided to target scientists, who work under very restrictive protocols which ensure animal rights, whereas businesses are under no such restrictions.  Hell, in some institutions you cannot euthanize a fish in sight of another fish because of the stress it would cause the other fish, yet fishermen are allowed to leave thousands of fish to die on decks all the time, and the fashion industry is allowed to do what it wants without any check ups, they simply can claim "no products tested on animals" without any institutional oversight, just the word of mouth of watchdog organizations.
That's a really interesting point, I'll have to look more into that dichotomy. Thanks!
There's no reason not to target both if both are doing something immoral.
I think it is a fabrication to assume there are immoral things being done by scientists, when there is no evidence of scientists doing otherwise- that is unless you are a US Republican Congressman who believes faith over reality. The point is scientists are not doing anything immoral specifically because regulations exist. Yet, they are in the public eye, so given that ethics is always a relative concept- you need to compare between examples of "good" and "bad" in order to know what each of these are.  Those activists should devote their energies to exposing business practices, not hound the research scientists when there are real issues.  To make an an analogy, it would be similar to the Occupy Wallstreet movement suddenly deciding that credit unions have high interest rates and need to boycotted, when it is the large banks that are at fault, and which need correcting. 
If they test on animals there is a good argument that they are doing something immoral. That doesn't mean there aren't others who are guilty also. I'm not sure what activists you're talking about, since none have been brought up either by the video or in this thread. Nor is "what activists should really focus on..." ever much of a convincing argument from someone totally disassociated with the ideals of those activists.
You are making a faith-based assumption.... testing "on" animals  should not have an immediate negative connotation to you otherwise.  Would you say going fishing is immediately "immoral"? I do not think so, but for some reason research gets painted negatively to you simply because there is a more deliberate approach than just "going out to catch some fish". You seem to imbue your null hypothesis with something immoral.  Basically I'm saying the people who were interviewed were sometimes clueless about what research means.  Also, notice they call it a "debate", but I do not see any? few? scientists in attendance.  Frankly, activists need to bring something to the table to get scientists to be interested. 
What faith-based assumption in particular do you think I'm making?
Don't paint your opponents into strawmen, as you've done here and above with the Republican thing. It doesn't strengthen any argument you're making... It makes you make worse arguments. 
f they test on animals there is a good argument that they are doing something immoral.
That is an assumption that is not based on reality.  Just go to google and look up the advances that are made every day based on animal research in all kinds of "model" organisms.  Literally all medical advances are based on animal research.  It is a straw man to say otherwise, and sure, we can begin to move away from it over time.  But to try and say that if someone is testing "on" animals, you have an a priori reason to think they are immoral, that is simply fabricated.
What do you mean by fabricated?
I'm not making personal judgements, but judgement on actions. And note that I said that there is a good argument that animal testing is immoral, and something immoral is immoral regardless of benefits.  Imagine someone saying:"Sure the slaves have it bad---but Ive made so much money off of them!" That'd be a bad argument to continue slavery, and medical advancement is a bad argument to continue animal testing. What sources do you have, by the way, that prove all medical advances have benefited from animal use in research? According to the video around only 50% of animal research has turned out useful for human trials. A coin flip isn't enough to keep it around to me.
Do you think that moral judgements or arguments are necessarily faith-based? I having trouble with understanding what you mean by faith here, or where exactly you think I've made any decisions based on faith. I assure you my judgement here is totally secular.
No, I am just saying you do not know what it means to have a conceptual research question,decide the best way to narrow it down to experimentation, find if it either refutes your null hypothesis, or does not (which by the way, 50% success rate is very high for research).  Do you think scientists think in a dark room, decide I will cure X by trying Y, go do it and if they fail it is because they did something wrong?  Research, by its nature is going to lead to negative outcomes more often than you would think.  I am saying you immediately assume it must be immoral.  If I told you, I want to find out if dogs have color vision, and I am going to train them to discern two separate items based on color only, would you immediately say you have a good argument to say I am doing something immoral? No, it would make you someone who is ignorant of what research means, because that is an example of research.  And I don't mean ignorant in the negative sense, just that testing does not automatically imply damaging manipulation, that is all.
Don't paint your opponents into strawmen, as you've done here and above with the Republican thing. It doesn't strengthen any argument you're making... It makes you make worse arguments.
Interesting that you are the one putting forth that claim. Your argument here lacks any backing: you are only putting forth a claim and deflecting responses.
Which argument did I make without backing here?
The one for why we should view mouse life as equal to a human. Or even why we should take your moral views seriously. You are ONLY stating them. If you'd take some time to actually explain them it would come off as less obnoxious.
You are making a faith-based assumption
No he isn't. There are many rational arguments one can make for and against animal testing. When you say he's making a "faith-based assumption" what do you even mean? Do you even know what you mean? The implication of your sentence is that he came to his belief by some kind of irrational and unconsidered leap of faith - how do you know this? Did you ask him why he came to this conclusion? Did you consider that maybe he gave the matter a great deal of thought, pursued a great deal of reading, and came to the conclusion by following the arguments he felt were strongest to their natural conclusions? Did you even consider that maybe people might have different moral views to you but that they might not all be idiots making "faith-based assumptions"?
Would you say going fishing is immediately "immoral"?
Yes, and there's a great deal of very strong philosophical arguments in favour of vegetarianism/veganism which might also lead you to logically reject animal testing for medical research as well.
You seem to imbue your null hypothesis with something immoral.
This sentence is meaningless. It doesn't actually mean anything. 
I think it is a fabrication to assume there are immoral things being done by scientists
Try reading some testing procedures, then.  
It's on you to provide links/evidence....
At the end of the question, inflicting known harm and/or potential harm on any sentient being is problematic, but which would you rather kill in preclinical trials, 100 healthy, cared for lab rats or 100 of your friends and family
The argument is that at least those people chose to put their bodies to use in the experiment where-as you have made the choice for the animal, and that seems to be unjust in itself. 
As well, the video quotes ~50% as to how much animal testing ends up actually being useful, so why take the chance?
A lot of the work we do in pharma involves removing organs such as the heart and liver from rats every single day, extracting needed cells, and testing them against compound. Methodically. Thousands of times. For years. Nvm even getting into dmpk / adme-tox studies. Pretty much everything we do in pharma post HTS (and sometimes including) involves and is wholly dependent on killing thousand of rats, dozens of dogs, a couple pigs, and a few monkeys. The operation of every pharma would grind to a halt without research animals. I suppose if you gave us 20 people every day and let us butcher them into pieces for a couple years we might able to still operate, maybe even be able to speed things up a bit.  Lol. 
I suppose if you gave us 20 people every day and let us butcher them into pieces for a couple years we might able to still operate, maybe even be able to speed things up a bit. Lol. 
So why not? That sounds good! I'd like to speed up research.
Presumably your answer would be something like "but that's unethical!" But if that's an appropriate answer to the human case, why isn't it an appropriate answer to the non-human animal case?
Really? You don't see an ethical difference between killing rats or killing people?
What I'm asking is not whether there is a difference but why there is a difference. I was asking for your reasoning behind the decision that it would be unethical to do these things to humans but ethical to do these things to non-human animals. I assumed (perhaps incorrectly?) that you had some principled basis for drawing the difference between humans and non-human animals, such that it's okay to do things to non-human animals that it's not okay to do to humans, and I was asking you to describe that principled basis.
Who cares what does it matter.
Well, one reason to think it matters is that in the past, people have assumed ethical differences where none existed. So for instance back when black people were held as slaves, people used to think that it was okay to hold black people as slaves but not white people as slaves. An abolitionist might have asked "why is it appropriate to hold black people as slaves but not to hold white people as slaves?" I take it if the slaveowners answered "who cares what does it matter" our answer would be "black people care, and black people matter, and even non-black abolitionists care."
So in this case, it would be that non-human animals care, and non-human animals matter, and even some humans care. Maybe they are wrong to care. But surely the proper response to them is not "who cares what does it matter" but rather "here is why one ought not to care and here is why it does not matter." Absent some kind of reasoning, your response is no more convincing in this case than it would be in the slavery case.
I'm not here to debate ethics as I said in several other replies. I should have checked the subreddit before I made the first post and realized this is r/philosophy. Some other guy similarly pulled out the slavery logic on me and like I told him it's a stupid analogy. It's a huge stretch to compare enslaving millions of people for the purpose of picking cotton to killing millions of animals so that humanity can enjoy the fruit of modern medicine.  Its an extreme comparison and a very black and white way of thinking. Issues are complex and every situation and issue warrants its own assessment based on circumstances. My original post was to simply relay the importance and critical role animals play in scientific research specifically related to drug development, and how impossible it would be to do anything without them. 
Whether it's right or wrong or comparing it to slavery or whatever, this is just a big jerk-off session. My personal opinions the the issue don't matter. 
You commented on a thread titled "A Rational Debate on the Use of Animals in Research: Oxford Animal Ethics" despite not wanting to debate ethics? I think you only have yourself to blame here.
Your wilful ignorance is bringing down the level of discourse. You walk into a thread about the ethics of animal testing and openly admit you've no interest in talking about the ethics or even caring about whether they matter at all. Why are you even here?
Read my other comments in this thread. 
This is a short comment but I think it's a really good one.
If we're going to go down the route of arguing that testing on animals is justified because of it's consequences (regardless of the moral worth of the act itself) then why aren't we testing on humans? From that utilitarian perspective, if we can save many human lives by testing on just a few, why shouldn't we? If it's all about maximising the research results then why do we even care about the condition we keep the test animals in either?
LOL? Wow, have you been in the business a long time?
That's pretty horrifying. Your work, I mean. Not the possibility of having to find alternatives. Slave masters relied on slaves for their business—surely that doesn't mean it's better to have slaves.
Listen guy, it's not horrifying. We are making medication, engineering tiny chemical molecules, little pills that you eat, to cure people of deadly diseases that have been ravaging our species since the dawn of time.  It's fucking wondrous, spectacular, fascinating, awe-inspiring, and amazing.  I highly doubt that when the time comes when you will be standing in front of your father or mother, sibling, children, or spouse, and look into their eyes as they lay dying in agony from some horrible shit like cancer, or heart failure, or neurodegenerative disease, that you will give any fucks about the 10,000 rats or few dogs or monkeys we had to kill to engineer the treatment to save their life.  Would you rather have the rats, or your mom?  Because thats the choice you have.  Every single life saving medication ever, EVER, relied heavily on the use of research animals.  Every.  Single.  One. 
And nobody is looking for alternatives because there can be no substitute for animal models in pre-clinical and clinical drug development.  Period. And the fact that you compare the use of research animals to slavery and what, picking cotton?...to pharma? Really?  Were not picking cotton here, or making sneakers, or printing t-shirts.  Were engineering drugs.  It's very clear that you know NOTHING of how that process works. How hard it is, the challenges, the complexity.   It makes me question your age, because either you are extremely uniformed of the process and yet still hold these extreme views about us, (making you kinda dumb btw), or you are just a kid whose just very passionate about animal rights which is fine (and kids often have unrealistic opinions on things so it's fine).  
Drugs are engineered methodically, and animals are an intricate part of the engineering machine that is drug discovery.
The process often begins with picking a target.  Animal models are usually needed to validate the target. A proof of principle for the idea of the therapy must be demonstrated, and it's almost impossible to do this without research animals.  Next is building a screen for your target and executing the HTS.  We have to assay millions of different chemicals looking for interesting chemical matter using the assay designed specifically for your target.   It required a huge compound library and shitloads of robotics.  Like this...
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ap64ruCQTOQ
Proteins extracted and purified from cells derived from animal tissues are typically required.  Not because we can't make them from bacteria (sometimes), because that would actually be cheaper, but because we need the assays to be as physiologically relevant as possible.  Without a good screen, and every screen for every drug is completely unique, you got nothing.
Post HTS, the real interesting stuff happens.  Now we have some interesting chemical matter, and for the most part, this is where in-vitro shit ends and animal land really begins. Compound efficacy, potency, solubility, absorption, distribution, metabolism, pharmacokinetics, etc..all have to be fine tuned and this takes months-years.  Compounds that lit up the screen are turned into dozens of variants by the med-chemists, and those go into a slew of assays in DMPK, Pharmacology, (usually animal based) then come back to the med chemists to be tweaked and tuned, and go back out to DMPK /pharmacology again and the process repeats.  This goes on for a long time until you have a compound with good PK properties.  This process is essential.  This is the real drug engineering.  Just one example of some of the assays that are common, because I could literally write a text book on this shit, and there are many already...
Liver toxicity assay- Chemist gives you compound and we need to know how the drug will be digested (metabolized) by the liver.  How do you find this out?
Well, get some rats, cut out their fresh livers, mash them up with a pancake mixer, homogenize the tissue into a homogenous fluid, lyse (break open) the cells in the tissue, then spin everything down in a centrifuge.  This will separate the fats and cell membranes etc and leave you with the cytosol of liver hepatocytes.  A "soup" of the stuff (enzymes) inside the cells of the liver that are responsible for breaking down molecules in you body.  So take your soup, add your compound, wait a little bit for some digestion to occur, and put that shit into a mass spectrometer to determine what the breakdown products are. BOOOM.  Give that info back to the med-chemists/team.  Some of those compounds will break down into stuff that will be deadly for people once digested by the liver, and some of the compounds will come back clean.  The idea is to tweak the liver toxicity out of a molecule using this back and forth process, and there is no way it can happen without having some animals liver mashed up and put into a mass spectrometer.  
This is just one example of dozens of processes like this that test for all kinds of stuff I won't get into.  But I assure you there is absolutely no way to do this stuff without animal tissues. Another example is needing to understand how the drug is distributed in the tissues of the body.  We don't want the drug accumulating in you brain for example if it's suppose to go to the heart.  The only way to do this is to give it to an animal, let the drug absorb, then chop the animal up into a hundred tiny pieces and measure how much is in the brain, heart, muscle, fat, kidneys, liver etc....No other way to find this out.  And again once this is done, that info goes back to the med-chemists, compounds are tweaked again, and again the process repeats until all the parameters look nice.
Once you have a molecule deemed fit to be a safety assessment candidate, real animal testing is next.  Volume of distribution, multi dose studies, clearance, target efficacy in disease model etc, a fuckload of things have to be assessed.  Then you have to do this in several species, because different species have slightly different physiologies.  For example the rats might metabolize the drug just fine but dogs might not, and die.  You need to know this shit before you go into human trials.  Typically for good measure you do rats, dogs, primates, and if you can pigs are cool too.  Wow. OK you've made it this far and it's now been 2-3 years, oh yeah and so far you've spend 150 million dollars.  Ready to spend another 500 million going into clinical trials? Better be pretty confidant your candidate is pretty good by this point because next week your going to dose your first human and if he dies not only did you murder somebody, but you're also out of business.
In clinical trials (very simplified explanations) we have to do Phase I Human Safety Assessment with FDA: ~20Million dollars and 20 people later hopefully you'll know your drug doesn't kill anybody or cause some horrible shit to happen, and you'll be ready for Phase II.
Phase II will give you efficacy in humans, set you back another 50-100 mil (doctors all around the world working for you for months aren’t cheap), and if you make it through that nightmare then you can do phase III  (Large scale studies on patient populations, years).  So now you’re in the whole about 700 mil to a billion dollars and you still haven't made a dime.  But you will, because now you know you have a drug that is safe, and that works, and it wouldn't have been remotely possible without the death of thousands of animals, and years of work by some of the smartest and hardest working people on the planet.  And now people get to live instead of die.
I know this was really long but I hope you have gained a little perspective on few things. Making drugs may sound simple when you don't know a lot about it but its is actually some of the most complex shit humanity can possible be engaging in. It's fucking amazing, not horrifying.
TLDR: Read the fucking post I know what I'm talking about.
It's funny that you accuse me of not being able to read. You didn't make an argument for it being a moral business at all. No matter what the benefits are, animal testing is immoral at its basest level. The fact that there's an industry around it doesn't make it necessarily moral. The fact that it benefits a lot of people at the cost of a few doesn't make it necessarily moral. All you've done here is make a bunch of baseless assumptions. I try my best not to hold thoughtless prejudice. Do you honestly not understand the slavery analogy? Or do you just refuse to?
The fact that it benefits a lot of people at the cost of a few doesn't make it necessarily moral.
...Yes it absolutely does, sorry.  Your opinion on this matter is thoroughly fucking retarded, and I may in fact be starting to question your ability to read.  How old are you? I would really like to know I feel like I've been arguing with a 14 year old.
And no enslaving millions of black people to pick your cotton cheaply is nothing like killing a few ANIMALS to save millions of HUMAN lives.  Your analogy sucks.
Stressing that I think the guy you are arguing with is an idiot, I'd remind you that hyperbole is the bane of many a good argument. You aren't, on the industrial scale, killing a few animals. You are killing millions of them. However, when a program is successful you are indeed saving humans for decades if not centuries later so the cause is just, assuming reasonable ethical standards are maintained.
This is a philosophy forum. I'm not interested in trading quips but figuring out what's right. You're so confident in your own being right that you've failed wholesale to make any kind of argument at all. Insisting that you're right and that I'm a moron isn't an argument. If you can't handle someone criticizing your ideas without so childishly lashing out, it might be time, appropriately, to take a nap.
Do you see how easy it is to be condescending? If I can do it it must take no talent. Do you see that it doesn't really help either of our cases?
The significant part of the analogy is the enslavement. Would it be moral to enslave and sacrifice a few hundred or thousand (virtually countless for lack of meaningful animal testing regulation) human lives perpetually to save a few thousand or more human lives? Probably not. The utilitarian math isn't the trump argument you think it is, and you're operating with an assumption that you can't defend reasonably: that animal lives are inherently worth less moral consideration than human lives, and that humans have the right to use animal lives for anything. These are the arguments you (and others here) have failed to even begin to convincingly make, but they are what is required to make your whole argument convincing. In all my reading I haven't found the reasonable position to be the one that values human lives over animal lives or animal dignity. Those arguments are always fraught with species prejudice, the kind that you've demonstrated here.
Listen I'm not here to argue with you about morality.  I don't give a shit about morality.  You said what we do is horrible and you seem to think that we should stop animal testing because it's "bad or immoral" and I think I pretty thoroughly explained to you why that's frankly never going to happen nor should it.  I'm not here to argue with you about right and wrong in imaginary morality land.  I'm here to show you that using animals for research is totally necessary and must continue if we wish to keep enjoying the benefits of modern medicine.  
As to your slavery argument, it's just really stupid.  I don't really think your slavery argument has anything to do with anything really.  How are animals the same as people?  You say I can't reasonably defend that animal lives are inherently worth less moral consideration than human lives...Well I guess I can't defend against it anymore then in saying that that's a matter of opinion I disagree with.  I definitely believe animal lives are inherently worth less than human lives.  You obviously disagree completely.  But that's ok each one of us have our own idea of what's right and wrong and there is no "inherently right" answer.  All that matters is which opinion people agree with more, and very decidedly your opinion is in a huge minority.  We typically call opinions held in the extreme minority stupid.  
That makes sense, the choice vs the forced into it. Thanks for the clarification.
I seriously question those statistics and even if only 50% is useful, think of how many drugs the average cancer or congestive heart failure patient needs to take, now lets make 50% of those deadly/ineffective/have unacceptable side effects/etc. because there was no screening process before introducing them into human models.
I defer to the scholars who have done their research when things feel unintuitive.
If we changed our current system to the one suggested that only willing participants of testing may be tested on the following will likely happen:
Lower income and less educated people will be disproportionately taking part in these tests.
Any treatment, product, or drug that, as per the product realization, would require dangerous or deadly testing would never be developed.
Time-sensitive autopsies as to chronic and sub-chronic and acute effects would effectively be banned.
These things combined leads me to believe there would be further inequality in society, increased cost of drugs/treatments/products which will hurt the lowest earners in society economically, and many potential cures for debilitating diseases would be stopped at the drawing board due to ethical concerns. I think that from any utilitarian perspective this is problematic.
I think that we should be motivated toward funding quantum computing research since that has promise of fully virtual testing of drugs and treatments without requiring clinical trials procedures to demonstrate viability. 
Much of our population growth, prosperity, and long life today comes from the sacrifices of animals involved in animal testing in the past. Obviously their sacrifice shouldn't be taken lightly and we should find ways to lessen harm or even eliminate it to animal testing subjects, but not at the cost of progress entirely. It's a very difficult problem and I think aside from more ethical practices while keeping animal testing around is the only way forward ethically at the moment until computer modeling technology for this kind of testing improves.
I think that we should be motivated toward funding quantum computing research since that has promise of fully virtual testing of drugs and treatments without requiring clinical trials procedures to demonstrate viability.
Erm, could you expound? On the face of it this seems rather unbelievable. It would require (a) that we could replace these experiments with computer simulations and (b) that the computational prablems involved fall into the class of problems feasible solveable by a quantum computer. (a) especially seems like too much to hope for. In general, we don't expect to do all of science with just scientific models. Why would these specific questions be an exception?
https://mycqstate.wordpress.com/2012/12/16/theory-and-beyond-quantum-computing-for-chemistry-applications/
My right hand is now broken so going to keep it short. Basically it's predicted to be possible to do predictive chemistry modeling. if they can do that then why not biochemistry as well? What takes a million years for a regular computer takes hours for a quantum computer (if it is the kind of thing that a quantum computer could do). Full simulations are possible just currently not practical due to time. Quantum computers should change that. Some more info.
https://www.newscientist.com/article/dn18365-quantum-computers-do-chemistry/
http://news.mit.edu/2009/quantum-algorithm
Lower income and less educated people will be disproportionately taking part in these tests.
That's a problem with capitalism in general, and doesn't have much to do with the morality of using animals. It's worse to use animals who don't have a choice than to use humans who at least have some choice. Their lack of opportunity isn't specific to scientific testing. It's a larger issue. But it doesn't give us the right to use animals.
Any treatment, product, or drug that, as per the product realization, would require dangerous or deadly testing would never be developed.
Then that drug wouldn't be developed and different avenues of research would be taken.
Time-sensitive autopsies as to chronic and sub-chronic and acute effects would effectively be banned.
Then different avenues of research would have to be taken. 
A current lack of imagination or technical know-how doesn't mean we can just keep doing the immoral thing until something better comes along: it means the something better would have to be actively developed. Maybe the cost would be high but paying it would be more moral than not.
Much of our population growth, prosperity, and long life today comes from the sacrifices of animals involved in animal testing in the past. 
As well as the "sacrifice" of slaves or penny-wages workers across the globe throughout time. This is not a moral defense to use slaves or effectively use slaves.
You're arguing from a default idea that "we can use animals, even if we feel bad because of it," but that doesn't seem morally to be the case. I mean, replace "animals" with "the Irish" and you're pretty well off into a Swift essay. There's no reason to hold humans and animals to different degrees of moral consideration beyond what I've found to be an indefensible prejudice. 
I think that we should be motivated toward funding quantum computing research since that has promise of fully virtual testing of drugs and treatments without requiring clinical trials procedures to demonstrate viability.
Sure, but that doesn't absolve animal testing in the mean time.
but not at the cost of progress entirely
This video makes a good case that animal testing is already mostly unnecessary and not as useful as you've made it out to be here. The cost would be progress through immoral avenues, not progress entirely.
After reading your comment elsewhere on this thread, it seems that you agree with me to the point of "absolutely necessary" medicine. That's better than the current status for sure.
You are basically arguing that animal lives are equivalent to human lives. I think this is something that most people would disagree with. To make animal research morally okay, you have to accept that the life of a mouse is worth less than the life of a human. I agree that suffering should absolutely be minimized, but in the end, I would rather a mouse/rat die than a human.
Why do I have to accept that the life of a mouse is worth less than the life of a human? What reasons do you have for that? I try to base my actions and moral ideas less on feeling and more on reasoned arguments.
I don't think anyone could argue that mice possess the complexity, emotion, and cognitive capacity of human beings. That is simply a fact and not a personal feeling. I actually can't believe you even asked me to type that out.
What do any of those have to do with moral consideration? They're intimately experiencing, suffering animals. I can't believe your threshold is so terribly shallow.
It's a pretty reasonable idea that capability to experience qualitative states depends on cognitive capacity.
What evidence do you have that the animals you're talking about don't experience in strong enough ways to defy their right to not be exploited and used as subjects in experiment without choice? Most animals show enough cognition just through behavior that harming or exploiting it seems unjust to me. And if we don't know yet, it seems more moral to err on the side of caution.
Exactly, objectively there is no difference. You have to look at this as if you had an equal chance of rolling to live as an animal or a human. Would you choose one to suffer horribly and risk a 50 percent chance of getting those conditions? Of course not. What people seem to not understand about this issue is that they are not arguing that it would be better to use humans, just that it is equally immoral to test on animals as humans and potentially more so because the animals have no choice. Its a tough situation that probably will never be addressed. Right now we can just rest easy telling ourselves that animals are somehow worth less because you are not one and it is therefore ok to gain from their suffering.
One day it is theoretically possible to do testing virtually with quantum computing. Maybe we won't have to test on animals, just run a comprehensive simulation. It could be interesting when this is a reality.
Until then?
That's the problem. I posted another comment in reply to someone below more specifically, but I feel until then that we need to lessen harm to the animals and take care to only use animal testing when it is needed (life-saving or life-extending drug/treatment testing). Currently we aren't doing that (animal testing for cosmetics as an example), so it could be improved, but the hindrance on progress for society in general would be too great if we were to abolish all animal testing today.
Agreed
The guy's first sentence is a pejorative equating vivisection (live dissection) with all animal research. My research animals are anesthetized for procedures as simple as Phlebotomy or Injections. They're anesthetized before euthanization. They're euthanized before necropsy. They're never vivisected. They're never allowed to see each other die. I give them toys and extra bedding to play in. I use the smallest needles I can so they don't wake up sore.  
We don't give each other the same luxury. Local anesthetics and pain killers are a surcharge. Assisted suicide is murder. Watching others in physical trauma? Comedy. Afraid of needles? Don't be a pussy. That's western morality, and I'm the bad guy? 
Not going to pretend it doesn't exist: Vivisection. It's frowned upon so much that special approval has to be given. I don't know anyone who does it but I'm aware of the approval process: 
[deleted]
The justification is that the experimental formulation will go into people, and if it doesn't work as expected then 100-50000 people would succumb.
Testing on animals is not "immoral". It means you are basing it off your own subjective view and not one grounded in objective reality. Why does an animal life matter so much when thousands of other animals are saved in the process? The human species on a daily basis sacrifice themselves for other animals and causes. These tests are beneficial not only to humans but to other animals as well. We develop methods to help them and we can come to a better understanding of reality. 
Granted some of the environments that these animals are subjected to before the tests can be overly strenous. One step we can take is improving the environment of animals in lab settings. Making sure they are living comfortably up until the tests would be beneficial in helping both sides accomplish the goals needed to progress.
Why does an animal life matter so much when thousands of other animals are saved in the process? 
What objective reality are you using to argue that the cost is worth as much?
The cost of a moderate amount of animal life for progress and understanding of all other life.
A mere fact isn't a moral argument for itself. Why is that okay?
Remember I am being objective. I don't play this "moral" or "immoral" game you keep throwing out. Just what will benefit all of us equally. Animals suffer and a lot of the time other animals are the cause. That is life and we thrive on it. Scientific testing is a method before us that is beneficial for all animals. We should take the steps to fulfill their lives before we benefit from it.
Scientific testing is a method before us that is beneficial for all animals.
Well, it's clearly not beneficial for the animals being tested on.
all other life
Actually I think you really mean 'All human life'. Which, yes, we way very highly being human. But that it is very good that we save many human lives does not make testing the chemicals on animals less bad. It makes the bad act of killing animals worth it for a good act of saving human lives. 
I see the line of thinking here, but I'm worried about where it might eventually lead. Why are mammals more important than other animals? Why are animals more important than other life? At some point, death is a necessary requirement for the existence of life. Millions of bacteria die every time you sanitize your hands, or use mouth wash. Certainly these are not moral outrages, too?
George Carlin has handled this one for us
Presumably "life" isn't the morally relevant criterion here, but instead something like "sentience", "goal-directedness", or "capacity to suffer". It's pretty plausible that mammals in general have more of those attributes than a bacterium.
Sure, but why are those things valued? And certainly there are plenty of animals that are not mammals that experience all of the three criteria you listed, even invertebrates (think octopus). As for the bacterium, they certainly experience stress and react accordingly. Could this not also be perceived as pain/suffering? I don't think that all of the rights that humans enjoy necessarily extend to animals, and purporting otherwise creates some easily ad absurdum scenarios.
Animal testing is immoral, but it's the best we humans got at the moment and it's far less immoral than testing on live human subjects. Regardless, I'd love to see dangerous/painful testing done on cloned human body parts (skin, lungs, limbs etc.) rather than other animals but we're still a long ways off. And behavioural studies will probably always need human and other animal test subjects...
I think we're almost at the point where congress will just allow drug companies to go straight to human trials.  Just need to hire a few hundred more lobbyists.
It worked for Monsanto.  Ask anyone with a peanut allergy.
Seems like a troll question but it's not, why do people get so upset about animals and animal rights? 
Why do people seem to care more for other species than their own? We are the only species that we've ever known that do this. Caring for another species before your own is unnatural and quite frankly an illogical stand point. 
We test on animals because we wish to do the best for the long run of the human race, and animal testing helps attain this goal best.
Repeating that animal testing is "barbaric, immoral and stupid" is not a logical argument and without using emotional and/or faith-based reasoning it is very difficult to argue for animal rights equal to or above a humans.
Putting other species before humans would mean that we are performing tests on humans that we wouldn't be okay with testing on other animals. That isn't what is happening.
This is what many are suggesting, like a user suggesting prisoners be used instead of animals.
I don't think it is okay to abuse prisoners just because they have committed a crime, but that would be suggesting that we use people who (some would argue) are deserving, unlike animals who are chosen at random and have done nothing wrong. That still is not caring more about other species than humans.
who are chosen at random and have done nothing wrong
An animal can do nothing wrong as it has no sense of self, the exact same reason why using animals over humans is logical and moral. 
That still is not caring more about other species than humans.
Choosing to test on humans over animals is the very definition.
Repeating that animal testing is "barbaric, immoral and stupid" is not a logical argument and without using emotional and/or faith-based reasoning it is very difficult to argue for animal rights equal to or above a humans.
This is one of the more interesting dangers of education: These people, as a rule, are arguing from emotions but are rationalizing a feeling through logic. That's why bits of the argument work but the whole of it feels inconsistent and maybe silly.
As a for example, I've absolutely had pets that I would have killed humans over. But I am not mistaking my closeness to a few animals as being anyway a good measure to judge ethics by. I do fall into the pit of caring less for creatures I have less of an attachment to so I wouldn't claim a complete lack of bias here but if the testing is done under reasonable conditions and with forethought it is still most likely our best bet.
On an anecdotal, and thus a bit useless, note all of the anti-researchers I've met in person are basing this off the somewhat less ethical research that could be done in the 19th century and this strange assumption the Dr Moreau is out there turning leopards into people.
You can bet that as soon as I catch one of these experimenters and do the exact same thing to them as they are doing to the animal they somehow have a problem with it then.
I catch someone hurting an animal I do the same to them they were doing to the animal and not bitch one bit about any of the time I will get for it.
These people are no different than the Marine up the street from me that shot his dog it suffered until the next day when he shot it again. I really hope a bullet finds him.
Uh, who cares about some animal (and potentially, human) lives when we have the possibility to save far more in the long run?
(This is meant to be a provoking question)
Not even one single thing we have now that we would not if no animal was ever harmed.
You can bet that as soon as I catch one of these experimenters and do the exact same thing to them as they are doing to the animal they somehow have a problem with it then.
Why do you think this is a meaningful reply?
Lots of things are not a problem when it is happening to someone/thing else.
Same question as above.  
Do you honestly not see the argument they're making, or are you being coy?
I mean, I understand what point they're trying to make, but it's irrelevant and stupid.  
What's stupid about treating animals and human beings with the same appropriate respect?
because the value of a human life to another human is infinitesimally larger than of another animal.
This is unjustifiable speciesism.  
According to what? What argument do you have for that?
according to evolution, instinct, logic......
What do you mean according to evolution? How does evolution factor into your moral argument that human beings deserve infinitesimally larger moral consideration than an animal? What do you mean by instinct? What logic are you using to defend the moral disfranchisement of total species? Please outline your argument.
One of the subsets of evolution is behaviour. Behaviour of a species helps govern the continued evolutionary outcome of a species.
All known species of animals including humans show preference for their own species over others. As an example, instinctual evidence would be, I offer you two pieces of meat one from a human and one from a cow, instinctually you would choose the meat from a cow. This is not a learnt behaviour it is an innate one. For obvious reasons this would further your own species over another.
So for the reasons outlined we assert dominance over other species because it is natural to do so. To go against this dominance is inherently unnatural and is only possible because we are able to comprehend in the third person, something that no other animal is able to do.
I believe we should use prisoners sentenced to death for research before we use Animals. This would cut down on capital crimes by providing, what I believe to be, an even less desirable punishment for such horrific crimes. 
And why don't we use sex offenders for this kind of thing?
They are in it for one thing and one thing only money.
The stated position behind the link, that we need to revise our view of the assignment of linguistic meaning as arbitrary because of systematic patterns of meaning within languages, is fatuous rubbish and nobody should believe it. I presume that it's an artefact of whoever wrote the press release jazzing up some much less sensational but more respectable research. Looking at the article this is an announcement of confirms that: that result is respectable but hardly groundbreaking. It's even downright unsurprising, for reasons the authors indicate in the abstract. Even in the article they overstate the extent to which this result is surprising, largely by misrepresenting what the arbitrariness of language is meant to consist in. This isn't really surprising: people very often misrepresent the view they argue against in ways that is meant to make their own view more attractive. But when they get to discussing the mechanisms behind the systematic assignments they are also emphasising how their work ties in to the established understanding of how language gets put together, which isn't opposed to the arbitrary-assignment model.
The orthodox claim about arbitrariness of has never been that for each individual linguistic token it's an arbitrary matter what the meaning of that token is. Instead, the view on arbitrariness is that each language has a framework that determines much about meaning assignment, and this it's the choice of a particular framework that is arbitrary. So, it may be settled in English that if I make a noun-form of 'slither' I can use the gerund 'slithering' (amongst other options), but what is arbitrary is that English was like that. So, arbitrariness in the deepest sense is not about individual tokens but about the frameworks within tokens are placed. This fact can easily be obscured because even within a settled framework there still will be scope for arbitrary assignment (e.g. the framework very often doesn't tell you what the single right answer would be within that framework), but we need to distinguish between arbitrary choice between frameworks and arbitrary assignment of meanings to tokens, and see that it's the choice between frameworks that is the deeper and more meaningful example of arbitrariness.
There are two reasons why meaning assignment won't be completely arbitrary for each individual token even within a framework that is settled arbitrarily. Firstly, language is taken to be compositional. Secondly, language is meant to be productive. The fact that it's compositional means that meaning-laden pieces of language like sentences are (to some extent, though perhaps not entirely) composed out of smaller and more basic pieces of language (e.g. individual words and parts of words, down to what you'd have learnt of in school as 'roots' of words and what linguists call 'morphemes'), such that the meaning of the sentence is a function of the arrangement of morphemes (there is a debate about how far compositionality goes, but everybody agrees that very many instances of language is compositional). The fact that it's productive means that there are rules for language such that we can put the existing linguistic elements (morphemes, etc.) together in entirely novel ways which nonetheless get understood by other speakers of the language. The combination of these factors means that it's a feature of language that we have a stock of basic linguistic building blocks and ways of combining them that get used in order to produce new linguistic tokens and meaning assignments. So, we can have systematicity much like discussed in the article just from the semantic make-up of a language, long before we look at anything like the cognitive science concerns surveyed in the article. So, that there are also other concerns towards systematicity in play is neither surprising nor in any way a challenge to the view of languages as arbitrary. For instance, the article discusses how if your meaning-assignment is more systematic it's easier to learn and to apply, and that languages come with their phonological rules (the kind of sounds and sound-combinations allowed in the language) that guides its speakers towards using certain kinds of tokens rather than others.
The article occassionally talks as if there are cross-cultural similarities in how these structures work. But this is a red herring. Firstly, there are many languages, and it's extremely easy to find apparently significant correlations across languages. The problem is that it's equally easy to find disconfirming cases. Secondly, nobody needs to think that the choice between what I've called language frameworks is entirely unconstrained--for one thing, there it's very likely that there are underlying features about humans (like our physiological make-up and cognitive faculties) that shape the ways languages actually develop. Again, this is neither surprising nor a challenge to the notion that languages are arbitrary.
Great points and a very nice way of explaining De Saussure's ideas about arbitrariness (of sign and signified). The paper mainly targets Hockett's (1960) less articulated notion of arbitrariness, which is arguably more mainstream among cognitive scientists, and therefore worth confronting and nuancing. The full paper can be downloaded here BTW: http://authors.elsevier.com/a/1Rm2F4sIRuwrsh
You seem to focus mostly on systematicity here, while the paper also discusses iconicity, a type of motivated link between form(s) and meaning(s) that does seem to show some cross-cultural similarities. Your 'slither' example also seems to focus on only one subtype of systematicity, namely morphological structure, whereas the paper foregrounds another form of systematicity, namely statistical differences in the forms of of simplex words that can help language learners distinguish, say, nouns from verbs. In keeping with your point, the paper notes that the particular statistical cues that support this kind of learning can differ across languages and need not be cross-culturally similar at all.
The purpose of my post was to stress why this stuff, even if it turns out to be true, is no challenge to the arbitrariness of language, despite the claims of the idiotic press release. To that end I gave a model (not a new one) about how we can have systematic assignments of meaning even within arbitrary linguistic frameworks.
That said, I don't think there's much hope in the iconicity stuff, for two reasons. The first I already gave: there are so many languages that finding correlations is so easy to be spurious, not least of all because counterexamples to the suggested links are equally easy to find. Given the sheer size of the data set, the false discovery rate becomes a real threat to the significance of the correlations. Secondly, even if there was some pressure or determinant working cross-linguistically, it also won't be a threat to the arbitrariness of language. Because there are so many languages that conform to any one type of iconic link (and there are many disconfirming examples), it's by no means a settled matter that any one language displays this iconicity. So, for every language, there are multiple options available: at the simplest and coarsest level of description, to conform to the iconic link or not. And whether they do or not is arbitrary. Of course, the options are far more fine-grained than that--there are different linguistic frameworks available that conform to the iconic link and the choice between them is arbitrary, just as there are different frameworks that don't conform to the link which is the subject of an arbitrary selection as well.
Does anyone have any thoughts on how languages begin as opposed to evolve once they exist? The arbitrariness of language (that its rules cannot be derived from the laws of nature/physics/chemistry) is precisely why I can't see logically how the first language could have begun naturalistically.    
The classic philosophic treatment of this topic, concentrating especially on how there could be agreement on arbitrary meaning assignment without there being some pre-existing language in which to come to an agreement, is by David Lewis in his book Convention.
Could you kindly summarize Lewis' argument for us? I'd be super interested to hear the nut of it =) 
The SEP article on Convention gives a good overview.
Believing in laws of nature makes you a lawyer not a scientist. 
This makes intuitive sense to me.  I have noticed that in English, there is a common theme to many words starting with "sl-" - slick, slippery, slide, slushy, etc.  The sounds seems to reflect an essential slipperiness.
I was also thinking the other day about how the word 'yawn' creates the sensation of yawning in the throat. Also true of the related ancient Greek word, and the Latin word for gaping, 'hiatus.'
Also, almost every language has a word pronounced as "huh."
I wonder why you were downvoted, and I hope the person explains. Your post is very similar, though significantly less in-depth, to what I've read of Stephen Pinker, who in my understanding is considered a pretty important linguist.
It's actually a pretty old idea - a similar thought is expressed in Plato's Cratylus dialogue - that certain sounds are linked to certain concepts (eg. he mentions "R" sounds being linked to motion because the tongue was most agitated and in motion when making such sounds)
All the more reason the downvotes made no sense. I'm glad to see his score is more reasonable now.
If slippery was first then the other could have been generated through different dialects. They reflect an essential slipperiness because slipperiness is what you're defining as essential. 
I remember reading this in an upper level ethics class on Kant. We spent a good portion of one class discussing it and I'm pretty sure the consensus at the end of things was exasperation.  
But we are not the only beings for whom things can be good or bad; the other animals are no different from us in that respect. So we should regard all animals as ends in themselves.
See, why I don't like these kinds of arguments is that it's such a vague phrasing for something that is important enough to require a clear division. Animals are not the only things for whom things can be good or bad either, nor should we limit ourselves on even multi-cellular life. Should we extend rights to ALL living creatures then? This may be an argument worth pursuing, but the author decides animals are where it ends. Why? What is a good reason for that delimitation?
Why? What is a good reason for that delimitation?
I mean, the author explains that immediately before. She says that a 'being for whom things can be good or bad" is a being which can "like and dislike things, be happy or suffer". It seems obvious that plants and bacteria, for instance, can't do these things.
How is it at all obvious that plants can't suffer when they release specific chemicals that cause nearby plants to grow less based on where and what kind of bugs are eating them? How is the behavior of a bacteria that becomes clearly stressed in the light, and searches out favorable environments where it grows better not a sign that it likes/dislikes things? 
Quick edit: I keep seeing similar arguments in most animal rights posts on this subreddit - the general insistence that animals as a group somehow have the necessary complexity to suffer, but other beings do not. This is an argument based in nothing more than ones ability to empathize with said beings - there is no good scientific or philosophical delineation of what indicates suffering vs. not. The most often repeated argument is that a central nervous system seems to be a prerequisite, but there is absolutely no reason to believe that beings without a central nervous system would not suffer either.
This is an argument based in nothing more than ones ability to empathize with said beings - there is no good scientific or philosophical delineation of what indicates suffering vs. not. 
I don't think you can make such a broad claim. As a start, tropisms are different than sentience. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tropism
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sentience
Regardless, I think the argument may continue on like this: Maybe some suffering is going to happen regardless because the tropism/sentience line isn't going to hold muster. Should we go with what clearly does see suffering (pretty much all the animals we eat) or those where it is less obvious/harder to see actually happening (plant responses)?
To add to this: I'm not sure how someone arguing for the rights of plants could see it as an either-or situation, or even much of a response to an argument about animal rights. If it's true plants suffer, then we must stop their suffering as much as possible, which includes to a very large degree ending animal suffering. If you're going to make an argument you have to consider the implications of it. So many /r/plantstho arguments see it as some kind of checkmate, as if the vegetarian they're arguing with causes as much suffering as they do, just to plants, which, as I've tried to outline here, is an absurd conclusion. The "but plants suffer too" argument doesn't work as an argument to cause suffering to animals in any way.
You're completely right, except that at no point am I arguing either or. I agree with animal rights. I agree with plant rights. I disagree with philosophical arguments for them that are not well founded. The OP argument boils down to: "If things have consciousness they should have (at least a degree) of moral rights". I don't even disagree with this statement, it's just that the consciousness bit is so damn fuzzy and hard to prove in any context. Moreso, it's not a good categorical imperative - some humans are not conscious, but they do not lose their rights with their consciousness. 
I don't think you can make such a broad claim. As a start, tropisms are different than sentience. https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tropism https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sentience
They are, but as you state yourself the line isn't necessarily tenable, and it's quite difficult to prove sentience even in animals where we (feel) we can easily recognize their emotional responses to stimuli. How do we go about proving (or more accurately, disproving) sentience in other organisms? And while I've been through multiple threads been told this is merely a straw man, I'm not so sure it is, re your second point:
Should we go with what clearly does see suffering (pretty much all the animals we eat) or those where it is less obvious/harder to see actually happening (plant responses)?
Allow me to rephrase this in briefer format: Should we extend moral rights to those things that we empathize more with? I'm not so sure we should. I am all for a degree of life rights, regardless of taxonomic classification. But if we wish to grant rights exclusively to those organisms in which it's easy to see suffering, then that seems like a poor policy doomed to be replaced. 
Should we extend moral rights to those things that we empathize more with? 
We could extend some rights to those we empathize with. Like the right not to be killed or used only as a resource. I don't think that's horribly objectionable, but I'm sure others will argue in more detail with you elsewhere.
It's not horribly objectionable, it's simply a bad core argument to the rights of animals. Say, some culture across the world has no real empathy for many of our domesticated animals - the argument seems absurd to them that they should have rights. On the other hand, say this hypothetical culture finds farming objectionable because it harms the animals they empathize with by removing their habitats. The argument from empathy fails there completely. Don't get me wrong, I think it's a great addition to other arguments for the rights of animals, but it's a bad core for them.
I'm not saying it is the ONLY reason, just one of many to consider when extending rights. 
I understand, and again, I agree fully with animal rights. However, the post I was responding to presents the case for animal rights through the lens of their ability to feel good or bad, which is a proxy for consciousness, but then dismisses the possibility other organisms have this same property, or animals lacking it. 
dismisses the possibility other organisms have this same property, or animals lacking it.
I hate to be that guy, but lets say all organisms can feel pain. How does that make the animal rights argument any weaker? I'd argue that it would make that animal rights argument stronger(from a utility stand point at least). Also, if you're pro animal rights as you've said, why are you bringing up plants? Either we say plants feel pain, or they don't. Both ways, it's a moot point.
It's clear that animals suffer. We know they do. We can tell they suffer just from interaction. Scientifically we have similar organs re experiencing and suffering. You're strawmanning the animal rights argument when you present it as if it's only the ability to empathize. That's clearly not true.
It's less clear that plants suffer, and there has been no scientific evidence that shows they can suffer. They lack the organs that required to suffer as we know suffering. It seems clear that plants don't suffer the way we describe or know suffering. Same with bacteria. Maybe they suffer in a different way, but there's no scientific or otherwise evidence that they do.
None of this has to do with the argument presented. Based on what we know, animals seem to deserve some kind of rights, and based on what we know, plants don't seem to. You might make an argument for plants, and that's fine, but even if you were able to, despite lacking evidence, that wouldn't make the author's argument for animal rights weaker. The two don't have anything to do with each other.
If you'll note my initial post, my issue is not that she extends rights to animals (I agree with that), it's that the rights are extended in a fashion that arbitrarily stops at animals. Here's a simple though a bit grandstandy read on plant suffering just to get your mind around the concept. . 
Well as luck would have it, Korsgaard does mention plants in the paper we were provided to discuss. 
Things can also be good or bad for plants, and this kind of goodness and badness is not derivative from human purposes («The weeds are really flourishing in my garden; all this rain is good for them.»). Rather, it is good for the plant considered as a living or- ganism, functioning so as to survive and reproduce. The way in which things are good or bad for people and animals includes this, but adds a new dimension, for an animal has a point of view on which the things that are good or bad for it have an impact – they are also good or bad from the animal’s point of view.
So, what does anyone think is meant exactly by that new dimension in which things are good and bad for people and animals -- but not plants -- and which is called point of view? Mind? 
(But also, what's up with the subject of plants invariably being dragged into threads about animal rights? The subject of animals' moral claims on us is complicated and contentious enough.)
So, what does anyone think is meant exactly by that new dimension in which things are good and bad for people and animals -- but not plants -- and which is called point of view? Mind?
That simple delays the whole issue by a step: how do we know if something has a mind? Our general knowledge of mind is quite poor at this point, so saying animals have mind and therefore have rights may have unintended consequences.
(But also, what's up with the subject of plants invariably being dragged into threads about animal rights? The subject of animals' moral claims on us is complicated and contentious enough.)
And it's because it's complicated and tenuous that it should be a strong argument based on a well founded distinction of animals. (although, personally, I would not be against plant rights either.) 
And it's because it's complicated and tenuous that it should be a strong argument based on a well founded distinction of animals. 
Ok. But regarding what you've said above: 
See, why I don't like these kinds of arguments is that it's such a vague phrasing for something that is important enough to require a clear division. Animals are not the only things for whom things can be good or bad either, nor should we limit ourselves on even multi-cellular life. Should we extend rights to ALL living creatures then? This may be an argument worth pursuing, but the author decides animals are where it ends. Why? What is a good reason for that delimitation?
Though I find your points about plants to be interesting, that doesn't change the fact that you're off topic. Because it is not necessary for us to consider together both the moral claims of animals and the moral claims of plants (arguments for each can be considered on their own) the separate question of whether plants deserve moral consideration is superfluous to deciding whether or not animals deserve moral consideration. The Korsgaard paper limits itself to arguing for the justification of the moral claims of animals. It's both unfair to her argument and also rather pointless to complain that it fails to argue for what you wished it would argue for.
Again, I do find the subject of the moral claims of plants interesting, and I find your points about this subject substantive, but I can't speak for anyone else, as they might wish the discussion to be more relevant to Korsgaard's paper. Why not find a relevant link and make a separate post so we can discuss the moral claims of plants more thoroughly?
I'm clearly making some communication errors since in general people either think I am making an argument against animal rights (I'm not) or making an argument for plant rights (I am, but only incidentally). What I would like to do is make an argument against moral status granted through capacity.
I think plants are good examples of the issues with any ethical argument based on capacity, but they are hardly the only ones. I agree that consciousness has something to do with moral status, but it also may be a red herring (because people with no consciousness do not lose moral status). Furthermore, most people agree we should grant less moral status to some agents that have a lot of consciousness (a serial killer who greatly suffers when not killing does not grant any additional rights from it). In practice we seem to define ethical status based on more than capacity for suffering. This is exemplified by this article - Korsgaard extends moral status to all animals even though most of them lack much of the capacity to suffer. I agree with the extension, and my gut tells me sentience has something to do with it, but it seems like we return to a state of moral status depending on ability to empathize (why I believe we extend status to animals but not to plants). I realize I could have made this point clearer, but I forget that the animal rights articles here are quickly band-wagoned by people who are (rightfully) afraid that it will turn into a rehash of the same arguments for why animals don't deserve rights.
I'm clearly making some communication errors since in general people either think I am making an argument against animal rights (I'm not) 
I could see that you weren't.
or making an argument for plant rights (I am, but only incidentally). 
The argument for plant rights at times threatened to hijack this thread. 
What I would like to do is make an argument against moral status granted through capacity.
This is what told me you weren't making a case against animal rights. As you know, capacities of all sorts that are often mistakenly assumed to belong only to humans are usually used as grounds to deny animals moral consideration in an argument. I've always felt this intuitively and thoroughly unfair. The old measuring an animal's worth with a human yardstick kind of thing. It's possible the same thinking is being used against plants, the environment.
Korsgaard extends moral status to all animals even though most of them lack much of the capacity to suffer. I agree with the extension, and my gut tells me sentience has something to do with it, but it seems like we return to a state of moral status depending on ability to empathize
Korsgaard's paper doesn't really focus on suffering or empathy as reasons to give animals moral consideration, exactly.
I realize I could have made this point clearer, but I forget that the animal rights articles here are quickly band-wagoned by people who are (rightfully) afraid that it will turn into a rehash of the same arguments for why animals don't deserve rights.
I hear you. Why not go ahead and find some interesting relevant material (re: plant/environment deserving moral consideration) and post about it. I'd be glad to see it, anyway. 
also, some animals' nervous systems are not central, but seem more complex than that of some that are?
Very true, and part of the reason why something like an aspen forest, with hundreds to thousands of individuals trees that are communicating via roots should make one rethink of what our delimitations for ability to suffer are. 
To say that plants suffer simply because they release chemicals under certain circumstances is not  accurate or atleast i dont think it is. using words like suffer and stress to describe chemical reactions personifies the plant, thats where this problem stems from. This chemical reaction, is it the same chemical reaction that we humans call stress or do we call it stress beacuse of the situation in which the chemical is produced? the second definition is less accurate in my opinion.
Exactly! Sometimes when I get an especially feisty cabbage at the store I have to chase it down to get it in the pot.
I see, so the ability to move quickly should suddenly be a requirement for moral rights /s
Right, and any distinction between a plant's ability to suffer and an animal's is completely arbitrary, with no philosophical or scientific justification. 
Damn it you're right, I forgot about how taxonomic classification grouped all of the intelligent conscious things on the animal branch and nowhere else. Why, this sea sponge is clearly a more sophisticated and intelligent organism than plants that are able to recognize their relatives and grow faster in their presence. 
"How is it at all obvious that plants can't suffer when they release specific chemicals that cause nearby plants to grow less based on where and what kind of bugs are eating them?"
I can't believe this is even a real comment. Are you kidding me? Plants do not have a brain. Something that's necessary for pain and suffering. Animals on the other hand have biology that is similar to humans, so it's reasonable to assume they feel pain as humans do.
The most often repeated argument is that a central nervous system seems to be a prerequisite, but there is absolutely no reason to believe that beings without a central nervous system would not suffer either.
Have you never heard of a paraplegic? When the central nervous system is disturbed, or the afferent nerves can't properly signal the brain, there is no pain. Notice, that the brain is a central part of this. Can you tell me why you'd assume something without a brain can hold similar feeling as a human?
It always seems to me, that people come to the conclusion that it's probably wrong to harm animals, but rather than taking that conclusion and changing their action. They point to something as ridiculous has plants feeling pain, as a way to show, that we're somehow helplessly hurting things to survive and there's then no reason to change. Pretty good way to rationalize it to yourself, but it's bullshit nonetheless.
I can't believe this is even a real comment. Are you kidding me? Plants do not have a brain. Something that's necessary for pain and suffering. Animals on the other hand have biology that is similar to humans, so it's reasonable to assume they feel pain as humans do.
Here's a simple, easy to understand read that you don't need too much of a science background to get. 
It always seems to me, that people come to the conclusion that it's probably wrong to harm animals, but rather than taking that conclusion and changing their action. They point to something as ridiculous has plants feeling pain, as a way to show, that we're somehow helplessly hurting things to survive and there's then no reason to change. Pretty good way to rationalize it to yourself, but it's bullshit nonetheless.
It seems to me that rather than looking at my argument, which is in no ways against animal rights, but simply against the proposed basis for animal rights, people will often decide that the moral status of their cause trumps any need for having a consistent well founded reasoning for it and therefore I must be some lunatic who just wants to keep scarfing down meat at any cost. 
Here's a simple, easy to understand read that you don't need too much of a science background to get.
Did you just post a link that discredits your entire argument?
“Yes, plants have both short- and long-term electrical signalling, and they use some neurotransmitter-like chemicals as chemical signals,” Lincoln Taiz, an emeritus professor of plant physiology at U.C. Santa Cruz and one of the signers of the Alpi letter, told me. “But the mechanisms are quite different from those of true nervous systems.” 
My guess is that you didn't even read the article, but saw the words "intelligent" and "plant" and thought you struck gold.
It seems to me that rather than looking at my argument, which is in no ways against animal rights, but simply against the proposed basis for animal rights, people will often decide that the moral status of their cause trumps any need for having a consistent well founded reasoning for it and therefore I must be some lunatic who just wants to keep scarfing down meat at any cost.
What are you talking about moral status. I just gave you well founded reasoning. aka a brain. Plants don't have it. Humans do, oh, look what do you know animals do as well.
We've advanced pretty far in the last decade in terms of understanding our brain and we now know beyond a reasonable doubt that pain is a product of the brain. Brain stimulation for one shows us this, among other curious brain related phenomena.
I think the question needs to be asked. What "well founded reasoning" do you have that would allow you to hold the nonsensical idea that plants feel pain? Pain doesn't exist without a brain.
Did you just post a link that discredits your entire argument?
No, if you paid more attention you'd see the argument is that plants may not have a nervous system, but they use complex signaling in ways that mimics those of the nervous system.
My guess is that you didn't even read the article, but saw the words "intelligent" and "plant" and thought you struck gold.
Or maybe I posted it in disagreement to your statement that nervous systems are a prerequisite for pain.
I think the question needs to be asked. What "well founded reasoning" do you have that would allow you to hold the nonsensical idea that plants feel pain? Pain doesn't exist without a brain.
Yeah, again, I'm not arguing plants have a brain, I'm arguing brains aren't needed for a degree of consciousness, and furthermore, that membership in the taxonomic bracket where things tend to have brains does not guarantee it. Here is an extensive review article on the topic, hopefully you can access it though it may be under paywall.
No, if you paid more attention you'd see the argument is that plants may not have a nervous system, but they use complex signaling in ways that mimics those of the nervous system.
How does that help your argument that plants can somehow feel pain and suffer? It seems we're just arguing semantics at this point. Plants have been shown to react to their environment, this isn't exactly a new thing, but to take that fact and somehow jump to the conclusion that they can somehow feel pain and suffering is a stretch.
I'm arguing brains aren't needed for a degree of consciousness
That's not the argument you were presenting before. You were presenting the argument that plants can feel pain. Consciousness is something completely different and it really depends on your definition of that. Are plants aware of the sun? Or merely reacting to it chemically? Are they aware of the moisture content in soil or is this again merely a chemically induced reaction? They are conscious in the sense that they react to their surrounding, but does that mean they have some sort of human level of consciousness? I don't think that follows.
I'm not going to argue that plants don't react to their enviroment, but, this does not show they feel pain as you previously argued. I see now that you've cleverly abandoned that view. You're now on the argument that they are conscious.
If plants feel pain, then you need to show a brain. If you're arguing that plants are conscious you need to show a reaction. However, showing a reaction doesn't mean they feel pain. Feelings come from a brain. If you show a reaction with the absence of a brain, you're merely showing a chemical reaction.
What you're really trying to infer is that the reactions you see from plants to their environment is an indication of something beyond a chemical reaction and is something of a neurological nature.
Something that has never been shown and therefore is merely speculation and NOT based on some sort of well founded reasoning.
We are devolving into repeating the same argument over and over again, so I'd suggest you reread the thread (I've done the same) and at least come to an agreement on what we're arguing about.
My initial point was that plants can and do feel pain.
Your point seems to be that brains are necessary for pain.
My response was that no, brains are not necessary for pain, consciousness is and even that aside, plants have systems that are analogues of nervous systems.
That's not the argument you were presenting before. 
You're right that I should have clarified my position, but I am responding to about twenty different threads so I apologize if they get a little mixed up in their order. Many of the other responders have made a claim similar to: "She says that a 'being for whom things can be good or bad" is a being which can "like and dislike things, be happy or suffer"." In other words, plants don't really feel pain if they don't have the capacity to have an internal model of themselves. And you make the same point by making the distinction between a plant merely responding to stimuli mechanically versus having awareness. This awareness and ability will things is generally called consciousness. So, as to not argue about the specifics of plant brains (and some plant biologists to believe that plants have decentralized brains, even if that seems ridiculous to you), I had switched the discussion to plant consciousness, as that seems to be the larger crux to most people. 
If you show a reaction with the absence of a brain, you're merely showing a chemical reaction.
While I understand where you are coming from, this is hardly as simple of a claim as you'd like it to be. Is it impossible for a jellyfish to feel pain since it has no brain but merely a broadly distributed network of neurons? And if you agree that it's possible for a jellyfish to feel pain, then (again with the plants) what is different about a corn plant diverting hormone flow due to external stimuli across a vast network of cells? Do take a look at the article I linked if you can, it talks in general about the analogues of neurons in plants.
Something that has never been shown and therefore is merely speculation and NOT based on some sort of well founded reasoning.
If the last article is not to your liking, here's another article, with many cited studies of what has been shown in research: http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0303264708000312
I can't get to read any of these links you're posting, but I'd be interested in reading them(like you mentioned, they're behind a pay wall). Can't get any links from google.
Just popping in to say I wish more people agreed with you.
Are you saying that the argument is wrong because you think it implies the extension of rights to all living creatures? I don't see how that renders it unsound. That merely means it stops short.
No, I'm not saying the argument is wrong because it implies the extension of rights to all living creatures. I'm saying the argument is flawed because it uses a very subjective definition for what can/should have moral rights by claiming it's those things for whom (in an internal sense) things can be good or bad. If we can't tell what organisms fit that criteria, then what use is the argument?
Our lack of ability to discern does not make the definition subjective. Our lack of ability to know whether an organism deserves moral status does not mean that organism does not deserve moral status. (After all, it's unclear to me even whether you exist or things could be good or bad for you.)
Saying the sentience criterion is murky does not make it incorrect. (For the record I don't think the sentience criterion is murky in the slightest, but that's not the point.)
(After all, it's unclear to me even whether you exist or things could be good or bad for you.)
And yet we can both agree that both you and I deserve moral status even with ambiguity. Furthermore, if a person is in a coma with no brain activity we can still agree they deserve some moral status.
I don't think the sentience criterion is incorrect, I do think it's both murky and incomplete. And it's applied very badly (again, animals are very diverse in their capacities, so why should we extend rights to ALL animals).
On the other hand, why would I say you deserve moral status if I don't think you're sentient? The reason we both deserve status is because there isn't any ambiguity in either of our cases. I mentioned skepticism of other minds because it seems like you are, or were, being skeptical about the sentience of animals such as pigs, on the basis of some (perceived) ambiguity about the sentience of banana trees. If banana trees create skepticism regarding pigs, they might as well create skepticism regarding other humans. Regardless of whether you think it is difficult to judge sentience, surely we can agree some things are sentient, pigs being one of those things?
I don't think Korsgaard is arguing for the extension of rights to all animals, rather all demonstrably sentient beings, with animals currently being the only members of this category (with non-arbitrary, scientifically supported reason), and not necessarily all animals belonging to this category.
There is also no ambiguity that a person who is brain dead is not sentient, but yet they retain moral status. And while I agree with your reading of Korsgaard, we still have the issue of "demonstrably sentient beings" being very murky. Chickens are far less intelligent than humans, but do they deserve the same moral status as domestic pests like rats and mice that are probably smarter but are carriers of disease that are hard to avoid? To clarify again, I think they all deserve some degree of moral status, but I think in practice it is far less based on "non-arbitrary, scientifically supported reason" and far more based in our ability to empathize with said species. IF we could identify the capacity for suffering at all reliably it would be a great criterion for moral status, but we can't, and furthermore, in practice we don't. That is what bothers me about arguments from both Singer and Korsgaard, and the majority of the animal rights movement - moral status should be grounded in something stronger, and more importantly, evaluable. 
In the case of things that are not themselves ends, Kant says something along the lines of imperfect duty, i.e. something we the sentient owe to ourselves, and I think the Singer utilitarian would agree, our behavior to non-sentient things is only a matter of how we feel about that behavior. I think that brain-dead vegetative people with no capacity for recovery do not have to have moral status in either deontology or consequentialism. So this is not a clear case of something that is not sentient but definitely deserves moral status. However, for Korsgaard (less clearly for Singer), I'm definitely inclined to say she could get away with saying sentience is sufficient but not necessary, and still fundamentally have exactly the same views. All Korsgaard is doing is saying, "Sentient thing? You are definitely an end."
I have a bit of doubt that there is such a thing as a moral gradient in Kantian ethics, so if both a rat and a chicken are ends, then they are identical. Though that might be a simplistic interpretation on my part, because I'm definitely in line with Singer currently. And for what it's worth, Singer does apply a moral gradient. I believe Singer eats oysters, for example, and (I presume) he would choose a human life over a dog's, or a dog's over a worm's, because of a belief in a broader and deeper capacity for suffering. I would.
I have to say, it seems your argument that science doesn't reliably know capacity for suffering is rooted in a lack of familiarity with where the science is. (Again, if you are making the claim that it's fundamentally not scientifically knowable, we'd have to talk about whether it's fundamentally knowable for me that you yourself are sentient.) I think the science of the consciousness gradient is quite reputable, not at all arbitrary, and not at all based on empathy but on real neuroscientific evaluation. We do know that pigs have the capacity for suffering just as great as ours based on evaluation of their neurological system. But also note that it does not need to be used to exclude but to prove worthy inclusion. If you want to argue that it does not prove non-consciousness, that's fine, but we only need it to prove consciousness. Korsgaard does not need to definitely exclude plants to definitely include animals.
The last sentence is an equivocation; it's saying that because sentience evaluation is (allegedly) hard to do, then sentience shouldn't be our criterion for moral status, which doesn't follow. What the criteria for moral status "should be" is what they rationally are, regardless of their convenience. It would be wrong to re-evaluate what are reasonably chosen criteria solely because they lead us to skepticism of ethical knowledge.
I have to say, it seems your argument that science doesn't reliably know capacity for suffering is rooted in a lack of familiarity with where the science is.
I'll have to disagree with that. I'm not disagreeing that we can't show sentience in things where sentience is expressed similarly to us. But there is a practical limitation in identifying sentience in things that are more different from us, primarily because we have no good way to compare to them (as the many replies about plant sentience show). I wouldn't make the claim that it's fundamentally knowable whether a sponge is sentient, but I would say it's fundamentally knowable when another human is sentient. In between, we definitely have a gray zone where for some animals it is far easier to tell capacity for suffering than others. 
Furthermore, and this only matters when considering a moral gradient, I don't believe it is fundamentally knowable whether another being experiences anything to the same degree as yourself (even humans), because it would involve a quite complicated model of internal states (pain is perceived differently based on any number of priming factors such as exercise, reading passages about being male or female, etc.)
Korsgaard does not need to definitely exclude plants to definitely include animals.
True, but it limits our ability to apply the ethical standard.
It would be wrong to re-evaluate what are reasonably chosen criteria solely because they lead us to skepticism of ethical knowledge.
I'm not sure about that. Yes, I realize we can agree that if A then B and never know the truth of A. But if we cannot apply our reasonably chosen ethical criteria, what is their point, especially if the skepticism leads to entirely different application of the moral criteria? In this case, I think it is an easy sell to pretty much any person that any sentient being should be given moral status (because at glance it seems like a reasonable criterion, and sentience is a fuzzy concept). But if you asked a vegan whether a chicken met this criterion, versus the average member of the population, you would get very different answers. So our moral criterion clarifies very little. Now, chickens are an unfair example because we know they can suffer, so in this case A seems knowable, but at some point it does stop. Shouldn't we therefore look for a better moral criterion to begin with, even if we can say this one is true?
It remains to be demonstrated that other methods of consciousness are indeed even possible. Until it is demonstrated that things different from us can indeed be conscious, it is a base assertion to assume so, and it has little implication on our current evaluative method. As far as we know it, consciousness is a very sophisticated phenomenon that only occurs via a sophisticated neurological system. As far as we know, only a very specific, sophisticated kind of biochemistry can produce it. Lack of reason to believe something is conscious certainly gives us justification to behave as though it did not, imo. It certainly could be that the movement of objects in relation to one another is explainable by faeries, but that's a more sophisticated explanation than gravity. It could be that plants are conscious, but that's just a more sophisticated explanation of reality that (a) ignores our perfectly sufficient model of plant biochemistry as non-conscious tropisms, and (b) ignores our understanding of why things evolved to become conscious in the first place. By the way, every article you linked in other areas is an example of plant tropisms, of sophisticated biochemistry that is sufficiently explainable without resorting to consciousness; and I do have a pet peeve about science journalists using misleading personification language like "plant screams", "plant stress", etc. Consciousness is a worse explanation because of Occam's razor. It could be the case that rocks are conscious. We just don't know.
You're arguing for a pragmatic approach for the construction of ethics. Korsgaard would definitely say there is such a thing as objective moral truth, and she's out to find it. Moreover your example betrays you. In the case of chickens we do know, but in the case of some creature such that we don't know, the relevant difference is not the truth about sentience but our access to the truth. Lack of knowledge of sentience means our sentience criterion fails to inform us what to do. We would have to use some other evaluation process in that case to figure out what we ought to do. (EDIT: I kinda hastily submitted this and this paragraph is kinda crappy. Sorry. The point -> in order to say our criteria should grant us ethical evaluative power you have to imply that ethics are not rational/objective/Kantian. Which may not necessarily be wrong.)
The author doesn't claim that animals are the only other things that suffer.  The author only states that animals should be included in the category 'things that suffer'.  That category may very well include other things, however the case would be less clear and the author has chosen not to write on this topic. 
True, but is this really a good basis for the ethical status of animals? Note, I'm not saying I disagree with the conclusion of the argument (animals should have rights), I'm disagreeing with the process. How do we measure a requisite ability to suffer? Why should we draw a very arbitrary line by saying animals, when they show extreme diversity in ability to suffer (remember it includes everything from sponges to humans). I don't think there is a good line to draw, so my personal opinion is that any life should have some moral rights, however, where to go from there is a bit more difficult.
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Kant himself asserts baldly that animals are «mere means» and «instruments» and as such may be used for human purposes.
The End.
One of my pet peeves in academia is people who spit out publications by trying to get the positions of dead philosophers to accommodate positions the dead philosopher explicitly rejected.
It is the laziest form of scholarship.  Worse than lit crit, even.
One of my pet peeves in academia is people who spit out publications by trying to get the positions of dead philosophers to accommodate positions the dead philosopher explicitly rejected.
Why? Surely you don't think that Kant had an infallible understanding of all the myriad consequences of his moral philosophy.
The attempt usually involves a misreading the philosopher in question.  This is either through explicit misreading (they simply say something contrary to the philosopher's claims) or misreading by injecting contemporary science / cultural norms into the antiquated moral scheme.  In this case, we have the former.  Korsgaard misreads Kant.  Here be why.
Korsgaard's argument hinges on this passage:
Suppose my earlier argument is correct, and we ourselves are committed to the principle that all beings for whom things can be good or bad, all beings with interests, should be treated as ends in themselves. Then even if animals cannot obligate us through their wills, they can obligate us through their natures, as beings of that kind. For according to that argument, every act of our own will commits us the view that such beings are ends in themselves, and as such are laws to us.
Korsgaard lowers the standard of moral considerability from willing to merely having considerations of good or bad, having interests.  If we allow this degredation of moral standards, then Korsgaard can sneak animals into a morally considerable category.  As she states:
for an animal has a point of view on which the things that are good or bad for it have an impact – they are also good or bad from the animal’s point of view
The problem is that the point of view of animals does not include assessments of good or bad.  In the Critique of Judgment, Kant make a distinction between Pleasant, Beautiful, and Good.  Pleasant is something that applies to non-rational animals, but Beautiful and Good only apply to rational beings.  Non-human animals do not have a "good or bad" point of view.  Non-human animals have a "pleasant or unpleasant" point of view.  From the Critique of Judgment:
Pleasantness concerns irrational animals also ; but Beauty only concerns men, i.e. animal, but still rational, beings not merely qua rational (e.g. spirits), but qiid animal also ; and the Good concerns every rational being in general.
Pleasant is, as we would say, a subjective assessment particular to an individual.  One individual might consider Canary wine pleasant, while another individual considers it unpleasant.  These mere preferences can differ from individual to individual.  Good, in contrast with pleasant, is not subjectively perspectival.  Good is assessed with universal consideration:
but the Good is represented only by means of a concept as the Object of a universal satisfaction, which is the case neither with the Pleasant nor with the Beautiful.
Korsgaard misreads Kant by collapsing "good" and "pleasant" into the same thing.  This is explicitly stated in footnote 12:
I am not endorsing the hedonistic conclusion that only experiences themselves can be good or bad, insofar as they are pleasant or painful. I am only suggesting that there is a sense of «good for» in which good-for and bad-for are relative to the evaluative attitudes of the being for whom things are good or bad."
Korsgaard wants good to be a good-for.  For Kant, Korsgaard's "good-for" is an expression of the pleasant.  Good is not assessed in terms of good-for, since Good is assessed universally.
She can get away with this, because nobody reads the Critique of Judgment.  Especially nobody concerned with animal rights.
This is either through explicit misreading (they simply say something contrary to the philosopher's claims) ...
What you describe in parentheses is disagreement, which is not the same thing as misreading. You nakedly assume your conclusion: you seek to show that disagreement is a product of misreading, but to show this you simply declare that to contradict  a philosopher is to misread them.
for an animal has a point of view on which the things that are good or bad for it have an impact – they are also good or bad from the animal’s point of view
The problem is that the point of view of animals does not include assessments of good or bad.
This might be the case if:
To say that something is good or bad from an animal's point of view is to say that an animal assesses the thing as good or bad; and
Korsgaard, in making a Kantian case for animal rights, is committed to upholding every doctrine that Kant expresses throughout his philosophy. Note again the idea that disagreeing with Kant is, ipso facto, a misreading.
Neither of these conditions appears to obtain.
2 is curious.  In what sense is her argument Kantian when it conflicts with Kant?  Kant distinguishes preferences from assessments of Good.  Korsgaard collapses those two.
Korsgaard could articulate a moral system in which good / preference are the same.  Then she could give a Korsgaardian case for animal rights.  That is fine.  The problem is when she tries to make a Kantian argument that conflicts with Kant, by misreading Kant.
One can advocate animal rights without dredging up antiquated moral treatises from the 1700s.
Given that I've already disputed your claims that Korsgaard conflates preferences and assessments of Good, and that she misreads Kant, I don't see the point in simply reiterating those claims without argument.
In what sense is her argument Kantian when it conflicts with Kant?
In the sense that it is a development of theses, arguments, and so on that originally come from Kant. Why on earth would anyone take "Kantian" to mean "agrees with Kant in all respects"?
In the sense that it is a development of theses, arguments, and so on that originally come from Kant. Why on earth would anyone take "Kantian" to mean "agrees with Kant in all respects"?
Because
that originally come from Kant
I'm afraid you'll have to elaborate.
The theses, arguments, etc. that originally come from Kant would all agree with Kant.  They would all derive from the common origin of Kant's writings.  Kant says P, Q is derived from P, and so Q is Kantian.  This would be an example of someone not disagreeing with Kant, but rather taking Kant's premises and saying, "Hey, this other thing Kant never wrote down fits, too."
This is not what Korsgaard does.  She changes the argument, taking
Suppose my earlier argument is correct, and we ourselves are committed to the principle that all beings for whom things can be good or bad, all beings with interests, should be treated as ends in themselves.
and modifying the definition of good
for an animal has a point of view on which the things that are good or bad for it have an impact – they are also good or bad from the animal’s point of view
That is not Kant's position.  So, it is not Kantian.
Korsgaard can offer an argument in support of Animal Rights that borrows 95% of its content from Kant.  That is fine.  To call that Kantian, though, is mistaken since there is 5% not-Kant in the argument.
The only reason for her to call her argument Kantian is the attempt to leech credibility off of Kant for her own sake.  No one would give a shit if she articulated some personal argument for animal rights.  But if she can show that Kant actually supports animal rights, then she can utilize the esteem some philosophers hold for Kant to further her own ends.
She says
for an animal has a point of view on which the things that are good or bad for it have an impact – they are also good or bad from the animal’s point of view
Kant says
Pleasantness concerns irrational animals also ; but Beauty only concerns men, i.e. animal, but still rational, beings not merely qua rational (e.g. spirits), but qiid animal also ; and the Good concerns every rational being in general.
The problem, again, is that she misrepresents Kant.  She takes Kant's system, and changes things.  It ceases to be Kantian when ceases to be what Kant says, or what Kant's actual argument entails.
Otherwise, we are left with an absurdity wherein anyone can attribute any argument to any past philosopher.
That is not Kant's position. So, it is not Kantian.
Korsgaard can offer an argument in support of Animal Rights that borrows 95% of its content from Kant. That is fine. To call that Kantian, though, is mistaken since there is 5% not-Kant in the argument.
You haven't actually answered my question. Recall:
Why on earth would anyone take "Kantian" to mean "agrees with Kant in all respects"?
What you've done here is simply to assume that "Kantian" means "fully in agreement with Kant," note that Korsgaard disagrees with Kant on some points, and conclude that Korsgaard's argument is not Kantian. But what's wanted is an argument for your initial assumption.
After all, Korsgaard thinks her argument is properly labeled "Kantian," a journal accepted it under that title, plenty of professional philosophers have referred to this article without disputing the title (and would readily describe Korsgaard as a Kantian). So what special insight into the word "Kantian" should make us think that it really means something else?
Otherwise, we are left with an absurdity wherein anyone can attribute any argument to any past philosopher.
We plainly are not. For example, it would be utterly absurd if Korsgaard were to title her paper "A Millian Case for Animal Rights," or attribute to Mill the claim that "whenever
you
make
a
rational
choice,
...
you
presuppose
that
you,
and
by
implication,
every
other
rational
being,
have
a
kind
of
normative
standing,
the
standing
of
a
legislator
in
the
Kingdom
of
Ends,
whose
choices
are
laws
to
all
rational
beings." Her argument draws on Kant's claims such as this in a way that it plainly does not draw on the claims of other philosophers.
Korsgaard lowers the standard of moral considerability from willing to merely having considerations of good or bad, having interests.
But she believes animals do have will--not the same kind of will that humans do, but will nonetheless. See the quote from her on this page.
I agree that she might have explained that in this paper for thoroughness, if she found it important. But I think her argument was more with her current line of thinking, which is that we inherit our end status not from our will but from our capacity for considerations of good or bad. (She's asserted this in other papers.)
Kant says animals do not have a will.  From the Groundwork:
Rational beings alone have the faculty of acting according to the conception of laws, that is according to principles, i.e., have a will.
Whatever animals have is not a will.  On the page you linked, Korsgaard writes
A lower animal's attention is fixed on the world. Its perceptions are its beliefs and its desires are its will.
For Kant, will is "the faculty of acting according to the conception of laws, that is according to principles".  For Korsgaard, a lower animal's will is "its desires".  "Desires" are not "the faculty of acting according to the conception of laws".
So, Korsgaard is not talking about Kant, or anything Kantian, when she puts forth a new definition of will.
So you are enslaving Korsgaard to agree unconditionally with everything Kant says, or thus reject the label of Kantian? That's pedantry. No one is confused by her application of the word "Kantian" here. She explicates where she disagrees with Kant. She doesn't claim that her definition of will is Kantian. She doesn't claim that Kant says sentience is the deciding factor of moral status. Should she simply say that none of her philosophy is Kantian on a technicality. even if 90 percent of it is inherited directly from him?
No one is confused by her application of the word "Kantian" here.
Well, I can think of one person...
What is the motivation for calling one's arguments Kantian?
Anyone can put forth any argument they like.  They can articulate their own definitions, axioms, propositions, etc.  They can construct new rules for inference if they like.  An individual can argue for or against animal rights using whatever argumentative style they fashion.
But why take one's own argument, and categorize it under the label Kantian, or Humean, or Cartesian, or Augustinian, or Lockean?  What does one gain?  My answer is that one gains notoriety.  One leeches off the fame / renown of these older philosophers to lend to credibility to one's own argument.
That is why I do not consider it a terrific violence to maintain that non-Kantian arguments are not Kantian.  The individual can continue to make their own arguments, using their own definitions.  They simply need to stop borrowing another philosopher's name.
I completely disagree. The motive is not notoriety but ease of classification. I'd call myself a Humean Benthamite even though I don't agree with everything either says. It's easier than saying "moral sentimetalist utilitarian/animal rights supporter". I minored in philosophy and have no aspirations in the field.
Interesting.  My thought is something akin to "moral sentimetalist utilitarian/animal rights supporter" yields a better categorization system.  It places arguments within philosophical schools, instead of in a lineage with a specific philosopher.
Thanks for the different idea.
Disagreement and development is the foundation of academia.
If you disagree, then offer a new system.  Disagreement by misreading the establishes system is lazy and sloppy.
Calling Korsgaard's work here a "misreading" is lazy and sloppy.
If you would like to indicate where I misread her, I would be interested to see it.
On the second page of text she gives the Kant quote she has used in years of academic papers. In other publications she has discussed at length Kant's views on our relationship with animals. See Section 5 of this, for example. It's disingenuous to say to a famous philosopher that her knowledge of her predecessors is lacking just because it is not presented at length in every paper.
I like existentialism. I would even describe myself as an existentialist. But I really feel that Sarte is somewhat off-base in this particular essay. His initial responses to myopic detractors are useful and well-composed, but his ultimate goal of showing that existentialism provides a societal aim of maximising freedom seems misguided.
Existentialism, to me, is a position which clarifies certain (initially uncomfortable) truths about the absurdity and the nature of freedom for the human condition. So, when someone tells me that existentialism does not give us the tools to build a functioning society, I am inclined to agree. I think other areas of philosophy and science are needed to underpin society. These areas may engage with, or be informed by existentialism, but they are not identical to existentialism. Here's something I wrote a couple of years ago, in response to Sarte's essay:
The abstract idea of freedom on which Sartre attempts to base his moral system in his essay, "Existentialism is a Humanism," is insufficient for a number of reasons.
First, he fails to produce any actual moral conundrum which seeking to maximize freedom could solve. His examples are always choices between one's own happiness and that of one or more others, generally at the original one's expense. Yet there is nothing there upon which to establish a code of conduct for a society. If, for instance, the question were to arise in the court of Sartrian existentialism, of whether a man is right to steal food or other goods in the quest of increasing his own freedom, is the judge to declare the accused to have been sincere in his invention of self, and therefore innocent? If a person should behave in such a way as to represent humanity, then they can behave in any way whatsoever, provided there is no benchmark for humanity nor even governing principles beyond the vague increase of freedom. It is just like the sentiment of Dostoevsky behind his character, Ivan Karamazov, that if God does not exist, everything is permitted. That is, without an absolute morality, the morality introduced in its place must be treated as absolute, or else risk being non-functioning as any kind of morality.
Second, the notion of maximizing freedom is so vague and abstract in Sartre's piece that there is no way of gauging whose freedom is paramount. Clearly, acting in a way that increases one's freedom or the freedom of others is beneficial, but what about cases where one's freedom comes at the cost of the freedom of others? If, for instance, one is being taken to jail, and could increase one's own freedom by rapidly limiting the physical freedom of the guards who are leading one, is one right to do so? Is the freedom of one person as valuable as the freedom of another? Is the freedom of two people more valuable than the freedom of one person? These are questions which Sartre's idea of the pursuit of freedom fails to adequately address, yet which would have an answer in a functioning moral system.
Last, freedom for freedom's sake makes no logical sense as a goal. Freedom is how something is accomplished. One is able to act because one is free. If one uses that freedom to maximize one's freedom, one will be left with a further question: now that I consider my freedom to be maximized, how am I to act? Am I to act? Sartre's emphasis on obtaining and not repressing or oppressing freedom ignores these questions of what to do with the freedom one obtains, which feeds itself back into the first two concerns. The final irony of the situation is that it is Sartre himself who lends, in the figure of Roquentin, the image of freedom as ultimately unattainable. One may imagine a society which adopts Sartre's existentialist morality, and then imagine that society in the distant future, as it grows arbitrarily close to having achieved some sort of absolute freedom: the inhabitants would be indolent creatures afraid to move a single muscle, like Roquentin in his room, for fear that the action would limit their freedom while acutely aware that not moving may do the same. Indeed, one can hardly imagine a society of less free individuals than one wherein the accumulation and maintenance of freedom is the primary and only concern.
All I was trying to show there is that Sarte takes the system farther than it ever needed to go. Existentialism raises serious concerns which thinking people have to navigate, but it does not in itself prescribe morality. If someone told me that my french toast is useless, because it can not function as a hat, I would not try to show that it could theoretically be used as something like a hat; I would just tell them that it was never meant to fulfill that function. So, I still completely agree with every sentence in Sarte's concluding paragraph.
it's been years since ive read existentialism is a humanism, but i just wanted to make one comment.  The freedom sartre is talking about is anterieur to any value or moral which freedom could act towards. Sort of like Kant but without the moral law. So talking about any moral usage of freedom is besides the point, and precisely, sartre wants to show the anguish of being free with no compass with which to direct it. 
Plus sartre is doing a sort of heideggerian philosophical anthropology. you have to read sartre within this context and with all the baggage that comes with it.
I agree that reading Heidegger is a key to understanding Sartre, but it remains the case that Sartre does insist in this essay that the pursuit of freedom is a sufficient attribute of moral action. As I said above, I feel that this may be simply due to the tenacity with which he intends to meet the declarations of his dissenters. I agree far more with Sartre when, in much of his other writing, his claims are more geared toward coping with the radical freedom which he stresses in this essay's concluding remarks (and to which you are referring).
I don't know if it helps, but I think Sartre became a Marxist later in his career.
For those who are interested: Here is Michel Foucault's famous "What is Enlightenment?" (in both the original French and an English translation), in which he analyzes Kant's response and provides one of his own. 
This one-two punch was one of the first things we did in grad school (for critical theory). Highly recommended!
Kant, the only German philosopher my fellow Brits are confident in pronouncing, an English professor once told me.
why is Aufklärung spelt Äufklarung right in the title? #umlautsmatter
The author clearly needs some umlaut-enlightenment.
Missed opportunity: umlautenment.
Post-wit is 20/20.
Haven't seen this since undergrad....  According to this I should be enlightened.   Perhaps my only problem is that i'm too busy using other's definition of enlightenment to define my own.     
Actually, Kant is supremely far from saying you should be enlightened by now. Rather, enlightenment is something we must continually and perpetually pursue. 
Source: writing my dissertation on this.
no i get you.   thats sort of what i meant... is that i should be according to that way of looking at it....   to me this whole thing comes down to how free are we really?  there's a lot of complicated ways to get into what freedom means and how we are or aren't in our current situations.   
Sounds like you'd love my dissertation :P I can't divulge much for now though. It'll be in the public domain soon enough.
cool... you should post a link here when it becomes public.   i'd check that out. 
Maybe.. I'm not sure I want to make my identity clear on reddit ;)
Ah yes didn't think that far into it.   Probably better to not.
That said, if any of it gets published, I'll probably link to the papers from a throwaway :P
I just finished reading this for class when I spotted it here. Definitely a worthwhile read, and much more digestible than Kant's other work. 
[removed]
[removed]
Immanuel Kant was a real pissant....
AUTHOR:
Michael Friedman
ABSTRACT:
This paper considers the evolution of the problem of scientific rationality from Kant
through Carnap to Kuhn. I argue for a relativized and historicized version of the origi-
nal Kantian conception of scientific a priori principles and examine the way in which
these principles change and develop across revolutionary paradigm shifts. The distinc-
tively philosophical enterprise of reflecting upon and contextualizing such principles is
then seen to play a key role in making possible rational intersubjective communication
between otherwise incommensurable paradigms.
Concerning the conceptual shift regarding non-Euclidean geometries (and the consequent 'axiomatic' treatment of all mathematics) and since history has been very unkind to Riemann, here's an extract from Einstein as a small addition to this article: 
But Physicists were still far removed from such a way of thinking; space was still, for them, a rigid, homogenous something, susceptible of no change or conditions. Only the genius of Riemann, solitary and uncomprehended, had already won its way by the middle of the last century to a new conception of space, in which space was deprived of its rigidity, and in which its power to take part in physical events was recognized as possible.
Riemann's Habilitationsschrift, being a publicly delivered lecture, is quite readable. 
edit: Of course, 'the solitary and uncomprehended genius', which sounds strange to modern ears, had his precursor in Gauss with his interest in surveying and so on. 
Can you explain to me what the big deal about non-euclidean geometries in philosophy is? As someone who has studied Riemannian geometry I don't understand what the philosophical difficulty is? Hilbert pushed for the axiomatization of mathematics and now we're here. Is it that all of the axioms of mathematics should be naturally inspired?
Here's one aspect of the "big deal." Historically speaking, 19th century philosophy was dominated by Kant (for good reason, dude's a genius) and post-Kantians. But Kant's secure a priori foundation for mathematics necessitated Euclidean geometry, or at least necessitated that Euclidean geometry be the geometry of the world. So it was a huge philosophical shock when it turned out not to be. 
At the same time, Newtonian mechanics was the dominant example of a successful scientific theory. It's hard to understate how successful the theory was: the best experiments (see, e.g., Cavendish), very thoroughly conducted, extremely well worked out... and then it turns out that we have to fundamentally reconceptualize mass, space, time, and force and adopt an entirely different way of understanding the equations that we're using.
So philosophers were left trying to pick up the epistemological pieces: How do we justify mathematics, and the application of mathematics to the world? What parts of Kant should we keep now that his system has (apparently) been refuted? Are our best scientific theories bound to end up being proven false by unconceived alternatives? The advent (and then success) of non-Euclidean geometry was thus a major historical moment for Anglo-American philosophy. 
Interesting! How does Kant's thought rely on the world obeying Euclid.
How does Kant's thought rely on the world obeying Euclid.
Roughly, space and time are synthetic a priori structures of experience, not things "found" in the world. For Kant, then, we shouldn't be able to really even conceive of non-Euclidean geometries, let alone discover that the world obeys them.
Interesting! Did people not conceive of non Euclidean geometries before Kant?
Not to my knowledge. It's possible that you could find someone in the historical record that had something like a non-Euclidean geometry, but they certainly were not recognized as such. It's only about fifty years later that the issue really arises.
This is a common, and incorrect, reading of Kant (at least as per some modern Kant scholarship, e.g., Allison).
Spatiality and temporality are structures of experience, as you say, not structures of objects-in-themselves. That is, you cannot have a non-Euclidean experience because your mind imposes Euclidean-ness onto your experience. You can of course conceive of non-Euclidean geometries; you just cannot experience them directly in intuition. 
I don't know much about Kant or Kant scholarship, but isn't there something weird here, where, if one of Kant's goals in writing his first Critique was to give a way for science--and having Newton in mind here--to still be objective or escape the sort of skeptical doubt of someone like Hume, he is seen to ground not science, but merely experience? It would seem Kant missed his goal then. Or is the claim that an objectively valid structured experience (that's probably a bad way of putting it) provides a good ground to do science with, even if science ends up moving very far away from the picture presented directly in experience, or something like this?
Or is the claim that an objectively valid structured experience (that's probably a bad way of putting it)
Yeah I'm not a fan.
Kant isn't looking for an "objectively valid" structure to experience. His argument isn't foundational. It's transcendental.
Kant starts with the proposition that the natural sciences are valid and asks what else must be true. He also takes the Humean position insofar as any concept is meaningful and fulfilled, then we must be given the fulfillment of that concept in intuition (no Cartesian "innate" ideas). But the Humean picture is incomplete -- it can't account for things we need to make science work. Ergo, that stuff must still be supplied from somewhere, and if it is not given in the world, it must come from within our own minds.
Luckily Kant has an explanation for how this works. You see you, as the thinking subject, do more than passively receive information from the world. You actively organize it, make judgments about it. What's more, you're aware of yourself doing this (the transcendental unity of apperception). You can reflect on your own consciousness, which is how we arrive at the categories, which fills in the last little gap, and ipso facto, transcendental deduction.
He presents similar themes in the Transcendental Aesthetic as well.
Kant starts with the proposition that the natural sciences are valid
In the Prolegomena (what he calls the "analytic method"), but he also thinks this validity can be demonstrated (what he calls the "synthetic method") and takes the CPR as providing this demonstration.
But the Humean picture is incomplete -- it can't account for things we need to make science work. Ergo, that stuff must still be supplied from somewhere, and if it is not given in the world, it must come from within our own minds.
Incidentally, I think Hume says the same thing.  But the mind's constitutive role for Hume is psychological and established empirically while for Kant the constitutive role is transcendental.  So Kant understands Hume as simply taking for granted the transcendental structures he (Kant) demonstrates, and as having failed (by virtue of not giving this demonstration) at giving an adequate response to the skeptic (or however we construe the condition of sound epistemology).
but he also thinks this validity can be demonstrated (what he calls the "synthetic method") and takes the CPR as providing this demonstration.
Right, although I do consider that argument to be less successful than the transcendental method. 
o Kant understands Hume as simply taking for granted the transcendental structures he (Kant) demonstrates, and as having failed (by virtue of not giving this demonstration) at giving an adequate response to the skeptic (or however we construe the condition of sound epistemology).
That's certainly an interesting take. I don't recall enough Hume to judge whether I would agree, though perhaps Humean "habits of thought" were his own less artful way of describing the latent categorial, just as Kant's own way of describing it was a rough-hewn timber to Husserl's majestic sculpture.
Well, that's clearer than it was in my head, so thanks for that. My question, though, I think still stands. If one of the goals of the book is to explain the way our cognition must work in order for us to do science, isn't it weird, then, if, per Allison's reading, our cognition doesn't work such that we can directly do science, but our cognition works such that we experience things in a certain way and then we can do science that can completely contradict that experience?
To put it differently: it seems clear that the theory of relativity claims that things work in a certain way that's different from the way it appears directly to us. But for Kant there isn't any way the world actually works 'behind' the way it appears to us, or at least none that is accessible to us in any way. So the status of a scientific theory that contradicts our experience in this way seems really problematic for Kant.
But this, I now see, isn't any criticism of Allison's reading insofar as you've presented it. So in that sense, nevermind.
Right, on orthodox Kantianism, the geometry used by physics must be Euclidean, hence general relativity poses a problem for orthodox Kantianism.  There's no room in Kant for a physics unmoored from experience.
Kant has a two-source model of scientific cognition: the mathematical principles which constitute physical objects and their relationships are derived from the a priori basis of our sensibility, while the synthetic principles whereby objects are subsumed under laws are derived from the a priori basis of our understanding.  Our understanding posits concepts (of objects subsumed under laws) under the constraint of these concepts corresponding to/having been demonstrated in experience.  But, on orthodox Kantianism, we're not in a position to rethink the geometry of physical relations, since this is not understood to be part of our concepts (produced by understanding) but rather to be a necessary consequence of how we intuit space and time (produced by sensibility).
So, one of the key epistemological changes that happens (relative to orthodox Kantianism, following the lead of Hegel, and then applied to this particular problem by Neokantianism) is that this dual-source model gets rejected for a model were concepts/understanding are implicated in every principle of scientific cognition.  So that the mathematical principles involved in the constitution of physical objects and their relationships gets reinterpreted as being not a consequence of our intuition of space and time (in sensibility) but rather a consequence of certain concepts, and thus amenable to reconceptualization (e.g. along non-Euclidean lines, pardon the pun).
I am reading through this for a second time. There's not enough Quine in /r/philosophy, and there's not enough criticism of Quine in philosophy generally, so I appreciate OP. The author, however, is omitting a lot of post-Kuhn philosophy of science.
My preliminary observation is that there are no mentions of Feyerabend, or van Fraassen, or Lakatos - and so I'm not sure (in this analysis) if those guys are straddling the same turf of Friedman, or if the author is just avoiding them.
and there's not enough criticism of Quine in philosophy generally
eyes widen you and I are clearly not reading the same philosophy. I'll concede that there aren't enough good criticisms of Quine (Friedman's better than most), but there are a lot of bad ones.
Feyerabend, or van Fraassen, or Lakatos
Yeah... I'm not sure what Friedman would have to say to van Fraassen--for the most part, they're just interested in very different things. There's an unquestionable link between the Friedman program and the stuff that Lakatos did (on my understanding of the latter), so it might be surprising that Friedman doesn't engage more with him, but Friedman seems to be very much of the view that there was something crucially right in the Kant-LE-Kuhn chain of philosophy of science, and getting out what that is is what he's aiming at. I don't think he's really at all concerned with giving a whole overview of the discipline.
but Friedman seems to be very much of the view that there was something crucially right in the Kant-LE-Kuhn chain of philosophy of science, and getting out what that is is what he's aiming at.
Right, and it's something that is corrective of a lot of the folk history we have tended to tell ourselves about the development of epistemology/philosophy of science, it's something that takes up questions that were at stake in the initial meta-philosophical decisions that set analytic and continental philosophy off on their courses at the beginning of the twentieth century, and it's something that is at the core of the perennial concerns of epistemology generally--going all the way back to Plato.  So there's lots of ground to cover here without needing to survey recent philosophy of science.
it's something that takes up questions that were at stake in the initial meta-philosophical decisions that set analytic and continental philosophy off on their courses at the beginning of the twentieth century, and it's something that is at the core of the perennial concerns of epistemology generally--going all the way back to Plato.
somedays I'm tempted just to make farting noises when people make claims about the august historical lineage of analytic philosophy
You'll have to become famous first, so that this can be an entry in the philosophical lexicon.  wumpus. v. 1. to indicate the fatuousness of a philosophical claim with farting noises.  There can be meta-philosophical discussions about whether it's legitimate to object that one cannot refute an incredulous farting noise.
What august historical lineage though?
You'll have to become famous first, so that this can be an entry in the philosophical lexicon.
Do you think anyone has ever called ending an argument by saying "I just don't know what that means" Petering out to van Inwagen's face? I kinda want to. I'm sure that would be a great first impression.
What august historical lineage though?
The mythical one. If someone started prattling on about Sedgewick and the importance of ethical philosophy to the development of early 20th century Anglophone philosophy, I would probably not be inclined to make farting noises. In fact, I would almost certainly be fascinated.
I actually hadn't heard that one!  Since I appreciate both van Inwagen and petering out, this all makes me very happy.
But isn't this just the sort of thing we have to have in mind when we talk about the historical origins (historical development, nature, etc.) of analytic philosophy, if we're speaking in a properly historical (as opposed to folk historical, institutional, etc.) sense?  I mean, a lot of what people have in mind when they say "analytic philosophy" doesn't properly refer to anything that actually went on in the early twentieth century, but philosophically interesting things did go on, and which have a family resemblance to what people have in mind when they talk about analytic philosophy, so isn't it the job of history of philosophy to try to move the conversation from the folk history to the proper history?  Or do you think there's nothing properly historical to be salvaged from folk historical concepts about early analytic philosophy?
I actually hadn't heard that one! Since I appreciate both van Inwagen and petering out, this all makes me very happy.
So far my experience with him is being in one lecture where he looked grumpy the first half, appeared to fall asleep for the second, and left before Q&A. I blame him for none of these things.
I mean, a lot of what people have in mind when they say "analytic philosophy" doesn't properly refer to anything that actually went on in the early twentieth century, but philosophically interesting things did go on, and which have a family resemblance to what people have in mind when they talk about analytic philosophy, so isn't it the job of history of philosophy to try to move the conversation from the folk history to the proper history?
Yes, but somedays I just want to make farting noises instead of doing that. (I think you may have misunderstood me as criticizing either you or Friedman. Not my intention.)
Also: I've never thought of philosophers as doing "folk history" before.
Definitely, philosophy is full of folk history.  And in a way that determines our understanding of philosophical problems.  See every time people talk about empiricism.  There's no one I love more than Kant, but he sure made a mess of how we understand early modern philosophy, let alone supposed perennial philosophical dilemmas represented there.
See every time people talk about empiricism.
Since I'm now reading contemporary phil science stuff I'm realizing that empiricism means something else to just about everyone in these debates, something like: "the metaphysical position that denies unobservables exist" or maybe "the epistemic position that denies that we are licensed in believing in unobservables." 
And then there's Putnam, who you know I love, but man, the dude could really not have used "realism" in more ways if he'd tried, and while I appreciate his later attempts to show the overall consistency in his views (and think he's largely right), there's definitely some elements of folk history there too.
Is it controversial that there is "something crucially right in the Kant-LE-Kuhn chain of philosophy..."? Does Quine ever attempt to dispense with Kant or LE, rather than just showing the crucial limitation? SO I read this as overburdening Quine a bit.
Feyerabend, Lakatos, Van Fraassen (also Davidson) should matter to Friedman because they all challenge Kuhn's shallow notion of "normal science" and all the structural/semantic commitments therein. To put it bluntly: there is nothing in Newton to permit Riemann. Just wasn't in the imagination. The "periphery" of normal science was revised on the basis of innovation. There is no principle to guarantee that future innovations won't upend prior conceptions, but that doesn't mean we won't recognize a continuum of theorizing from the pre-Socratics.
To put it bluntly: there is nothing in Newton to permit Riemann. Just wasn't in the imagination. The "periphery" of normal science was revised on the basis of innovation. There is no principle to guarantee that future innovations won't upend prior conceptions, but that doesn't mean we won't recognize a continuum of theorizing from the pre-Socratics.
I don't see how any of this upends Kuhn. Indeed, you seem to be making a fundamentally Kuhnian point.
Thank you for reading my remarks that way. Kuhn definitely doesn't need upending (it's metaphysics on one hand, and the attention of scientists on the other, that get upended in a scientific revolution) - and so don't get me wrong, I'm not trying to be critical of Friedman. (The only reason to comment in /r/philosophy would be to be critical of my own grasp of the topics. I am edified by being told how wrong I am...)
In this case, I'm just not seeing how (or even if) he thinks Quine's holism is challenged, rather than affirmed, in Kuhn. Friedman's (or Habermas') distinction about a "communicative" mode strikes me as very similar to what Quine and Davidson elucidated. As a matter of translation - science "saves the phenomenon" even while the categories of understanding undergo revision.
So, thinking as I type - I guess the article should be read as addressing whether incommensurability is a problem for holism. Changing the measuring stick is revolutionary for Kuhn, but it all looks merely evolutionary once people get past the crisis.
I don't think that the speaker in the video is being especially charitable to objectors to Swinburne's argument. The latter three objections that he covers are explanations of our religious experiences to be supplied after a coherent philosophical objection has been formed. As well, they all seem to point to same sort of objection, which the speaker does not cover.
The summary of the Principle of Credulity here seems to leave out an important caveat. That is, while experience is generally reliable, there are epistemic defeaters that help us pick out unreliable experiences. So, for example, when I hallucinate a giant plate of blue fin tuna belly suddenly appear in front of me, I can dismiss this experience as a hallucination because I know things don't simply appear, I know that my character is not of the sort that I would go out of my way to acquire an endangered fish, and so on. In the case of taking religious experiences at face value there are epistemic defeaters that should significantly lower our confidence about the credibility of such experiences. I'll list a few that come to mind:
Religious experiences aren't as widely shared as other appearances to which the principle more readily applies.
It's not exactly clear what religious experiences are supposed to be evidence for. For some they're evidence that Jesus Christ died for our sins or that Joseph Smith was visited by God, for others they're evidence that the Quran is the word of God, and for still others they're evidence that the spirits of ancestors and animals are watching over us. This is unlike other applications of the principle wherein my experiences clearly support the truth of particular propositions. For instance, the appearance of a keyboard in front of me clearly supports the proposition that there is a keyboard in front of me. This situation is made even worse when some of the beliefs allegedly supported by religious experiences are mutually exclusive.
Philosophical objections to the existence of God are especially relevant here. The evidential problem of evil in particular seems built as a response to this sort of argument.
Along that same line there are metaphysical problems if God is supposed to be a mind. For instance, our best theories of the mind describe minds as either supervenient upon or reducing to some physical substrate. Yet God is supposed to have created everything physical, so the existence of God is in conflict with presumably well-founded theories of the mind.
That is a very important caveat that should not be left out. This is one that would almost always be included by a Reformed Epistemologist.
Religious experiences aren't as widely shared as other appearances to which the principle more readily applies.
There are many experiences which are not widely shared as other appearances yet we accept them anyway. For instance much of the observations scientists make I have not observed myself. I don't have their expensive instruments nor do I travel to space or all over the globe. I rely on the testimony of experts as I deem them trustworthy. It's important to note that experience in general is not shared. For all I know you don't have any experiences at all, or anybody for that matter, and only I have experience. I take for granted that you have experiences, along with everyone else.
It's not exactly clear what religious experiences are supposed to be evidence for.
I somewhat agree on this, in the same sense that I agree that its not exactly clear what our empirical experiences are supposed to be evidence for. If there is this objective reality that transcends my sense experience, and appearance is not necessarily reality, then who knows if my empirical experiences resemble this objective reality at all.
For instance, the appearance of a keyboard in front of me clearly supports the proposition that there is a keyboard in front of me. This situation is made even worse when some of the beliefs allegedly supported by religious experiences are mutually exclusive.
Eye witness testimony and memory has been shown to be quite unreliable and does not operate independent of our biases and worldview (see top-down processing vs. bottom-up processing). Here is a room full of law students watching a crime happen and almost all of them give mutually exclusive testimony: When Eyes Deceive - Eyewitness Testimony
If this is a problem for religious experience its a problem for objective reality or at the very least our consensus of what reality is supposed to be.
Philosophical objections to the existence of God are especially relevant here. The evidential problem of evil in particular seems built as a response to this sort of argument.
This applies to objective reality as well. George Berkeley and many other idealists like John Foster have brought up objections to notions of an existence of an objective reality. There's also the problem of other minds (both conceptual and epistemological), the veil of perception, and various issues with language etc.
Along that same line there are metaphysical problems if God is supposed to be a mind. For instance, our best theories of the mind describe minds as either supervenient upon or reducing to some physical substrate.
I'm not entirely sure about this. The Hard Problem of Consciousness has been really challenging this narrative. Prominent scholars like Thomas Nagel have also been pointing to the demise of this materialistic paradigm: Mind and Cosmos: Why the Materialist Neo-Darwinian Conception of Nature Is Almost Certainly False
But of course I'm not claiming God is a mind a here.
Yet God is supposed to have created everything physical, so the existence of God is in conflict with presumably well-founded theories of the mind.
Even if our minds were physical and our best theories regarding our minds fit a materialistic paradigm that doesn't suggest mind itself is necessarily materialistic. Just like how biological life that we know of  is on Earth and possibly explainable as emergent from processes on Earth alone, this does not suggest that there are no other life forms on other planets that are perhaps comprised of completely different chemical substances than us and may even contain other substances we're not aware of.
For instance much of the observations scientists make I have not observed myself. 
I don't think scientific conclusions are justified by experience, though. And when experience does factor into the scientific process it's not experience of an entirely different ontological category of thing. The experiences that scientists have in the lab are very much like the experiences that I have every day, just arranged differently.
If there is this objective reality that transcends my sense experience, and appearance is not necessarily reality, then who knows if my empirical experiences resemble this objective reality at all.
Philosophers do, since realism about the external world is easily the most popular and defensible position in contemporary epistemology.
This applies to objective reality as well. 
See above. That Berkeley would disagree does not make it so.
Prominent scholars like Thomas Nagel have also been pointing to the demise of this materialistic paradigm
I'm not endorsing materialism nor does my point require it. Note the modest claim that the mind might simply supervene upon the physical.
Even if our minds were physical and our best theories regarding our minds fit a materialistic paradigm that doesn't suggest mind itself is necessarily materialistic.
I haven't said that this is the case nor does anything I say rest upon this being the case.
I don't think scientific conclusions are justified by experience, though. 
Interesting. What is your philosophy of science regarding what justifies scientific conclusions?
And when experience does factor into the scientific process it's not experience of an entirely different ontological category of thing. The experiences that scientists have in the lab are very much like the experiences that I have every day, just arranged differently.
You're right, good point. However sometimes we do postulate and experience all sorts of stuff that is seemingly conflicting with our common sense and every day experience plus its still something we don't really experience we just accept the testimony of others. Take the quantum world for example.
Philosophers do, since realism about the external world is easily the most popular and defensible position in contemporary epistemology.
Oh yes realism is clearly popular but that doesn't mean we actually know its true or that its true. How do you know there really is an objective reality and how do you know your senses resemble this objective reality?
See above. That Berkeley would disagree does not make it so.
Oh I understand. I was just saying that what you are saying the negative says as well. So far it seems you're at a stalemate.
I'm not endorsing materialism nor does my point require it. Note the modest claim that the mind might simply supervene upon the physical.
Point taken.
I haven't said that this is the case nor does anything I say rest upon this being the case.
Sorry for the misunderstanding.
What is your philosophy of science regarding what justifies scientific conclusions?
I have no strong views on the philosophy of science, but I'm pretty sure that no one thinks that mere experiences justifies our scientific beliefs. Instead it seems like various theoretical virtues such as simplicity, explanatory power, has unifying power with our other scientific beliefs, and so on occupy this role.
However sometimes we do postulate and experience all sorts of stuff that is seemingly conflicting with our common sense and every day experience plus its still something we don't really experience we just accept the testimony of others. 
We postulate strange theories, but we don't have any experiences of the objects of these theories nor do we arrive at these theories via our experiences. As well, it's far less clear that we should be realists about these theories or that realism about them would commit us to their exact truth. 
Oh yes realism is clearly popular but that doesn't mean we actually know its true or that its true. 
Popularity doesn't mean that we know that realism is true, but the preponderance of evidence for realism does.
I have no strong views on the philosophy of science, but I'm pretty sure that no one thinks that mere experiences justifies our scientific beliefs. 
Well I don't recall saying "mere experience" but I don't see how experience doesn't justify certain scientific conclusion. We make all kinds of observations that confirms certain predictions and so forth. Science is based on observation and experimentation.
We postulate strange theories, but we don't have any experiences of the objects of these theories nor do we arrive at these theories via our experiences. 
Yes we do, we observe them via instruments.
As well, it's far less clear that we should be realists about these theories or that realism about them would commit us to their exact truth. 
Agreed!
Popularity doesn't mean that we know that realism is true, but the preponderance of evidence for realism does.
But what's the evidence for realism?
Well I don't recall saying "mere experience" but I don't see how experience doesn't justify certain scientific conclusion. 
Many mutually exclusive scientific hypotheses are consistent with the same. For instance, the Copenhagen interpretation and the many-worlds hypothesis are both consistent with our observations of quantum effects, the Keplerian and the Ptolemaic models of the universe are both consistent with our observations of the night sky, the Einsteinian and Newtonian models of gravity are both able to calculate a rocket's trip to the moon, and so on for many other hypothesis that have never even entered the scientific canon.
Yes we do, we observe them via instruments.
We create instruments with theory in mind. There is no instrument that you can tell you from nothing that quarks exist.
But what's the evidence for realism?
I take it that Pryor and Huemer have good arguments and I'm sure there are others that people more familiar with epistemology could point you towards.
Many mutually exclusive scientific hypotheses are consistent with the same.
That's true but not all scientific hypotheses are empirically equivalent. 
We create instruments with theory in mind. There is no instrument that you can tell you from nothing that quarks exist.
All instruments are are just an extension of our senses. We sense may or may not exist, but we can at least measure certain phenomenon and some empirical hypotheses can be falsified this way.
I take it that Pryor and Huemer have good arguments and I'm sure there are others that people more familiar with epistemology could point you towards.
Are you willing to share these arguments? Listing names doesn't really help. I mean I could say that Foster and Berkeley have good arguments against objective reality but that doesn't really get us anywhere.
That's true but not all scientific hypotheses are empirically equivalent.
Not all, but I didn't say that all were. I said that some were.
All instruments are are just an extension of our senses. 
And in the case of the instruments of the sciences they're theory-laden extensions. I'm not really sure where you're going with this.
Are you willing to share these arguments?
Sure. I like Pryor's 2000 paper and Huemer's 2001 book. Although, as I say above, someone more entrenched in epistemology could likely point you towards more sources on this issue. Also, again as I say above, the point here is not one particular argument, but rather that professional philosophers converge on the view that idealism is false and realism correct to such a degree that no other philosophical theory can lay claim to.
Not all, but I didn't say that all were. I said that some were.
Right and the ones that aren't we can just use experience for some of them.
And in the case of the instruments of the sciences they're theory-laden extensions. I'm not really sure where you're going with this.
Just that we do arrive at some of these conclusions via these instruments which are extensions of our senses. 
I like Pryor's 2000 paper and Huemer's 2001 book.
Thanks for the links. I checked out the paper and he doesn't seem to be proving realism (and you kind of made note of this), I don't have time to read a whole book right now so if you're willing to just share a particular argument from it that would be great.
Also, again as I say above, the point here is not one particular argument, but rather that professional philosophers converge on the view that idealism is false and realism correct to such a degree that no other philosophical theory can lay claim to.
I understand that a lot of philosophers are realists, just like how a lot of humans are theists, but this grants no support for realism or theism (as I'm sure you already know). As you've pointed out before materialism seems to be a kind of dominant viewpoint right now, surely this contributes to the notions of realism, however materialism is starting to unravel: Mind and Cosmos: Why the Materialist Neo-Darwinian Conception of Nature Is Almost Certainly False
It's not exactly clear what religious experiences are supposed to be evidence for.
Evidence against physicalism. From there many different groups would be emboldened to prove their non-physicalist hypothesis, others would of course be emboldened to push their insincere half baked religious beliefs as a way to control others. It's no surprise that evidence of religious experience will have many competing theories after the fact; but as it is philosophical materialism in the west is the arbiter of what is right and wrong. 
The evidential problem of evil in particular seems built as a response to this sort of argument.
That's only a problem for a very narrow set of Abrahamic belief systems and even within those the concept of evil can be nuanced into oblivion, from the liberation theologists to Kabbalah
presumably well-founded theories of the mind.
keyword highlighted 
Evidence against physicalism. 
I don't see how this could be the case. For one, physicalism is a view in metaphysics and experiences are not by themselves deciders between metaphysical theories. For another, why wouldn't divine experiences simply cause me to believe that there is something divine and that it's physical?
That's only a problem for a very narrow set of Abrahamic belief systems and even within those the concept of evil can be nuanced into oblivion
I agree that it's a only a problem for a very popular set of religious beliefs, but it seems pretty clear to me that it is a serious problem for that set of beliefs.
keyword highlighted
Of course theists can bite the bullet, but just as flat-earthers might bite the bullet and deny our best theories of gravitation, this does not make their view at all compelling.
So if we accept:
The Principle of Credulity states that if it seems to a subject that x is present, then probably x is present.
We get:
1) Observing public objects, trees, the stars, the sun and having a sense of awe.
Awe exists.
2) Uncommon events, witnessing a healing or resurrection event
Unexplained phenomena exists (just like UFOs - as in unidentified flying objects, obviously exists).
3) Private sensations including vision, auditory or dreams
Dreams and weird sensory experiences exists.
4) Private sensations that are ineffable or unable to be described.
More stuff we cannot currently explain exists/occurs.
5) Something that cannot be mediated through the senses, like the feeling that there is someone in the room with you.
Hunches and beliefs exist.
Or, we can interpret this Principle of Credulity as meaning that "whatever we have any reason be it ever so nutty to believe exist, exists", which is ludicrous. Quite a few people would be Napoleon and Jesus, just to name on contradiction that spring up immediately.
Edited the OP to give a more robust definition of "religious experience" or the numinous, according to Swinburne.
I fail to see how that addresses the problem: either the principle allows us to go from "sense of awe" to "awe" or it allows us to go from "I think I am Napoleon" to "I am Napoleon". The first gets you nowhere, the second is ridiculous.
There are times when our own conclusions drawn from the world may be false and we can determine that. Perhaps I see a red car drive by and two of my friends say it was blue, I now have reason to doubt the experience of the car was red.
There is a lot of epistemological baggage that comes along with this argument that needs to be addressed.
So... You're saying we have reason to presume what we see is the truth of the world (red car), unless we then receive evidence to the contrary (blue because friends say so)?
This still does not address my critique - either the principle allows us to go from "sense of awe" to "awe" or it allows us to go from "I think I am Napoleon" to "I am Napoleon".
Let me put it this way - what on Earth is the reason to go from "awe" to "god"? Why not stay at "awe"? You don't go from "blue car" to "anthropomorphic blue car that wants to be my friend", nor from "headache" to "demon basing at my skull from the inside".
So... You're saying we have reason to presume what we see is the truth of the world (red car), unless we then receive evidence to the contrary (blue because friends say so)?
This still does not address my critique - either the principle allows us to go from "sense of awe" to "awe" or it allows us to go from "I think I am Napoleon" to "I am Napoleon".
Let me put it this way - what on Earth is the reason to go from "awe" to "god"? Why not stay at "awe"? You don't go from "blue car" to "anthropomorphic blue car that wants to be my friend", nor from "headache" to "demon basing at my skull from the inside".
The awe can be agreed upon, Napoleon cannot. 
Let me put it this way - what on Earth is the reason to go from "awe" to "god"? Why not stay at "awe"?
That would depend on the person having the experience and if they sense divinity.
The awe can be agreed upon, Napoleon cannot. 
Which begs the question. But I'll play; the sense of closeness to God can be agreed on, God cannot.
As you yourself said, it depends on the person. Someone might be convinced that the awe they feel means the Judeo-Christian God is close to them right now - others might feel Enlightened, close to Allah, the name, Thor or maybe even the thing in front of them inspiring said awe at that moment (the nutjobs!)
The way you are presenting this so-called principle gives us no way to tell which of these people are more or less right than the other. You want to call awe "divine" because it feels that way (to someone versed in a specific way to think about revelation, divinity and god)? Fine. This gets us nowhere near a proof of that divinity/god actually existing.
Swinburne's categories of religious experience don't seem to me to require anything supernatural, whatever that means. "Supernatural" is a troublesome word. Could you define the supernatural and how it differs from the natural in the context of this argument?
Supernatural is a troublesome word, and so is the word "natural" for that matter. It just seems to be a placeholder for "empirical" in which case we should just stick with the word empirical.
My apologies, I took that out of a book that didn't really explain it well. Here:
1) The first category consists of religious experiences triggered by observing public objects such as the stars, a sunset, a mountain range, the sound of bells ringing in the New Year, or the blue-green marble of the Earth as seen from outer space.
2) The second category consists of religious experiences triggered by an uncommon event-such as a resurrection or a healing.
3) The third category of religious experience includes private sensations that can be described with a normal vocabulary, such as visions or dreams.
4)The fourth category of religious experience includes private sensations that are ineffable, that is, they cannot be described. This experience is a mystical feeling, not an audible or visual sensation.
5) The fifth category includes experiences that are not mediated though the senses, like the feeling that there is someone in a dark room with you even though you can't see or hear them.
Edit: Numinous
Even if we were to accept the Principle of Credulity (which seems like a Principle of Radical Subjectivity without these attendant criteria, and even with, is just a privileged form of same), I don't see how any of these experiences would constitute "evidence of God." Why not evidence of sorcery, or evidence of cosmic coincidence, or evidence of alien interference, or evidence of meddlesome spirits, etc.?
If we are discussing the "ineffable or unable to be described" or sensations that "cannot be mediated through the senses," why should we accept anyone's explanations as ontologically sound descriptions of their experience? This is not to discount that experience, nor to say that more than one person cannot have the same or a similar experience. But it is worth noting that in spite of similarities of description of these experiences that we might call "transcendental qualia," when it comes to justification of said qualia, explanations are all over the map. Further, people's language will be colored in advance by the proxies and modes of their cultural background, such that they will be inspired to describe these experiences in the manner in which they have been taught to; this makes the appearance of conformity less surprising. So I'm not sure we need the Principle of Credulity to accept the existence of transcendental qualia, but I'm not even remotely convinced it is sufficient as a mechanism for proving or explaining their cause. So, why have it?
I found an argument from Michael Martin claiming that if the Principle is accepted, its negative form ("If I have no experience of x, x probably does not exist") must be accepted as well. I don't think this is especially convincing for the obvious reason that the absence of proof is insufficient to make a very strong existential claim. However, I would take it a step further based on my personal experience, and say it is possible to have these experiences without needing to suppose a traditional God or any other supernatural agent or presence. If we are discussing a metaphorical God, I think the "religious" talk is misleading; use of the word God itself is so poetic as to be misleading in the formulation of a principle like this.
On Peter Losin's criteria, it really isn't clear what they have to do with the principle; they appear to be tailor-made to justify orthodox "religious" experience in its most pleasant and agreeable form; this feels too convenient.
Edit: Michael Martin
I found an argument from Michael Martin claiming that if the Principle is accepted, its negative form ("If I have no experience of x, x probably does not exist") must be accepted as well.
This is clever, thanks.
In the absence of any reason not to, we should believe they had these experiences.
Modern psychology and our current understanding of the subconscious DOES give us plenty of reasons to not believe they actually had these experiences in at least 99% of cases in all five of Swinburne's categories.
Heh, modern psychology has occult origins too and so does the exploration of the sub conscious
All of science and philosophy itself has similar origins.  Its come a long way baby.
How so? Typically we only assign psychological projections to things we already think are false. For example, if I see food in the fridge, I know it's there, I don't assume that it's not really there but a result of not getting enough food as a child.
For instance, 
5) The fifth category includes experiences that are not mediated though the senses, like the feeling that there is someone in a dark room with you even though you can't see or hear them.
This phenomenon is addressed very thoroughly by the psychology studies regarding the mind's heuristics of Apophenia and Pareidolia.
There are a great number of other heuristics and mental illusions that have been discovered, many of which directly impact these "religious experiences".
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/List_of_cognitive_biases
Apophenia and Pareidolia
This reinforces my point that we only look for psychological projections when we know something is false, like Jesus in toast or a face on the moon.
There are a great number of other heuristics and mental illusions that have been discovered, many of which directly impact these "religious experiences".
And we can rightly dismiss these claims, but I don't see the need to toss out a priori assumptions about the world, which is what you are  doing. All the data that our bodies receive is then turned into sorts of patterns, just because we can be fooled sometimes doesn't mean we are always fooled. 
I agree that "all possibilities should be considered"...But there's also the other end of the spectrum: How we discern the imaginary from the real... and the acknowledgement that the imagination is perhaps the most powerful and meaningful aspect of humanity.  We don't need to make claims about reality for something to be powerful for us.
The difficulty to me seems to be about going from subjective experience to objective reality and it's not an easy gap to cross. But consider one of Swinburne's examples:
Kierkegaard was a philosopher  [objective]
Kierkegaard was a great philosopher  [subjective]    
There are criteria to distinguish between mere philosophers and ‘great’ philosophers which arguably makes greatness more than a subjective issue.
The same seems to be the case with moral issues, are they actually objective or just constructs?
The difficulty to me seems to be about going from subjective experience to objective reality
Exactly.  That's why any "objective claim" should be expected to rise far above plausible "subjective claims".  Just you saying you had this experience with your particular interpretation doesn't cut it.  Additionally, an appeal to the "blurry boundary" does not work when the topic under discussion is a very significant distance from that blurry boundary.
And back to my point:  Why place an undue claim about reality, when you've experienced such a subjective sensory input?   If I can't discern it from being imaginary, the humble position is to assume it IS imaginary.
That's why any "objective claim" should be expected to rise far above plausible "subjective claims".
Then I will just go back to my point about applying the same skepticism to ordinary sense perception. All experiences are subjective.
until they can be confirmed or verified by reliable means, sure.  And their reliability reflects their relation to the quality of those means.
Define reliable, typically we rely on others testimony and RE's are not unique and can be compared, usually forming traditions.
What counts a reliable then, you are going to rely on other uncheck checking procedures?
confirmed or verified by reliable means
Got any examples that aren't on your "blurry boundry?"
Others have spoken to the Principle of Credulity and why it fails. I think the premise about all of these experiences not being explainable via natural processes fails in light of all we know about human psychology, physiology and bias. Even if we accept that some of these experiences could not be explained by natural processes we understand today, he still hasn't made a case for why we should jump to the conclusion it's a supernatural explanation.
I give it a "failed on faulty premises".
As far as I can tell, the "Principle of Credulity" is simply extremely lazy epistomology. Swinburne argues that if a person sees someone walk on water, they should believe that person walked on water.
Swinburne's Principle of Credulity appears to be designed to beg the question of whether religious "experiences" are objectively real -- if you seem to have experienced it, then we can't question it. It's just a tricksy way of translating the Christian religious practice of professing belief (which never needs to be defended, in-culture) into an academic context, without penalizing it for being objectively indefensible. 
There's always that cocoon of safety around religious belief, wherein experiences that meet the prescribed criteria are simply accepted without needing to go through a messy epistomological process. This "Principle" is simply an attempt to extend that safety zone into an academic sphere. It's outright asking you to "just accept" the original premise.
Huh. I don't think I've seen "Begging the Question" in its most literal form before now. I didn't realize people would actually do that. 
A much stronger, intellectually honest Principle of Credulity would be something like David J. Hufford's investigative thesis in The Terror That Comes in the Night -- that if witnesses insist they saw something supernatural, and relate that, the investigator should believe that they really saw something, or experienced something, and that something might be important, regardless of how it's related to the investigator. 
Applying this approach to local ghost stories that seemed like quaint and highly culturally-specific folklore, Hufford identified an objectively measurable sleep disorder that locals had simply mythologized. 
That's what a philosophical approach like the Princple of Credulity would look like, if it were an honest analytical approach instead of a faulty rhetorical wedge. 
The Tibetans have an incredibly comprehensive phenomenology of different types of spiritual experience.  The three main types are gross (body, objects, nature mysticism, oneness with the world soul), subtle (non material sensations, dreams, kundalini energy, chakras), and causal (the ground of being, formless awareness, the Self, deep dreamless sleep).  
Then they map every single stage of awareness (sensorimotor to body to mind to soul to spirit to non-dual) as you experience each kind of religious experience and interpret them differently.
The problem with the Principle of Credulity I think is that the experience need to be inter-subjective and reproducible. I can take anybody with me outside and ask "do you see the stars?" and get a yes. 
I cannot take anybody and ask them "do you feel the presence of god?" and get a yes everytime, it doesn't work the same way.
Currently it's very acceptable to believe in stars and not very acceptable to believe in paranormal things. If I witness a ghost with another person and they later say they never saw a thing, how do I know they aren't tricking/filtering/protecting themselves? It's about just as likely as me tricking myself into seeing the ghost imo. 
When asking about the stars, you are assuming that the sun is not out or there isn't a roof or clouds obstructing the view. The stars might not be visible at different points.
There are places where people would answer in the affirmative for "do you feel the presence of god?" like church, the top of mount everest, from space etc. 
You've got to admit there's much less settings where someone is likely to feel the presence of god than to see the stars. The likelihood are certainly also quite different. Like 99.9% of people will be able to see the stars (the 0.1% are blind) but only, what, 1%, 10% will feel the presence of god? And there will be a large fraction that will never feel the presence of god, no matter the settings.
It's not a completely binary thing, but for me it's clear the two situations are quite different.
It seems to me that this is just attacking the analogy though, if we take something we all don't see very often, like a specific chair then the problem melts away.
what, 1%, 10% will feel the presence of god? And there will be a large fraction that will never feel the presence of god, no matter the settings.
Honestly I doubt the figure is that low, especially with the number of people that attend church or meditate weekly. While speaking of the numinous and the transcendent, Christopher Hitchens said: "Everybody has had the experience at some point when they feel that there's more to life than just matter."
The Principle of Credulity states that if it seems to a subject that x is present, then probably x is present. Generally, says Swinburne, it is reasonable to believe that the world is probably as we experience it to be.
Is this supposed to be a principle that helps you find truths about the world, or does it intend to do something else (like make you live a happier life)? Because it doesn't seem like a very robust principle for the former.
I don't see how it's not. If we see a man in a sport coat we naturally form the belief that there is a man who is in fact wearing a sport coat. We naturally take this to be a true belief warranted by our experience. Like OP said "But opponents wish to see strong evidence for these experiences, however, when the skepticism of the religious experiences is then turned onto sensory experiences, we end up in radical skepticism. So why be skeptical of certain experiences and not others?"
There is a lot of epistemological background to the principle, so I would say it is the former. I have been trying to grab some books of Swinburne's, but I take it to be something like reformed epistemology.
opponents wish to see strong evidence for these experiences, however, when the skepticism of the religious experiences is then turned onto sensory experiences, we end up in radical skepticism. So why be skeptical of certain experiences and not others?
I really like that point. I wonder if anyone could answer that in a satisfying non dismissive way. 
I'm tempted to side with Rupert Sheldrake that quite simply our culture informs our questioning and our culture of science is materialist and scholastic. It's simply ignored because it doesn't fit our current zeitgeist 
Not all of these experiences cannot be adequately explained through natural explanations.
I just wanted to point out that you're making a huge leap in your formal argument in your statement above. This is non sequitur from:
In the absence of any reason not to, we should believe they had these experiences. 
Thanks
Intros end at about 3 minutes in. For those who don't know Don Marquis has published what is uncontroversially the best defense of the view that abortion is morally wrong. In this talk he defends his view as an alternative to the view that Peter Singer famously holds, that abortion and infanticide are often permissible. Singer then gets a chance to respond to some of Marquis's criticisms (~45 minutes) before a Q&A session featuring guest soloist Jeff McMahan.
Thank you! (I'm going to read-up a little before watching. Is this Prof. Marquis you have in mind? http://faculty.polytechnic.org/gfeldmeth/45.marquis.pdf?)
Is this Prof. Marquis you have in mind?
That is the same Marquis that appears in the video.
Can anyone summarise the two positions? 
Yes. Marquis can and does summarize both positions.
How does Marquis distinguish having an abortion and simply not having any children?
https://www.reddit.com/r/askphilosophy/comments/3mk0pq/don_marquis_argument_against_abortion_doesnt_make/cvfnsxf?context=3
Funny that it really seems like Marquis is the more utilitarian one in this debate. Why add a constraint saying that potential people's interests don't count? If you're trying to promote the satisfaction of people's desires and interests, then create as much flourishing and value in the world as you can!
Then Singer says that would be absurd, because it entails that simply not having children could be wrong, and this doesn't fit our intuitions. But that's not obviously the case. We will have to accept at least one counterintuitive conclusion sooner or later (inevitable in this sort of debate), so adding procreation as a contingent duty isn't necessarily the worst route to take. Does it mean that everyone should automatically have as many kids as possible? Of course not, in fact it's highly plausible that people should be having less kids than they are now, because of overpopulation. Secondly, it's probable that the actual best thing for a moral saint in modern society is to spend their time and money contributing to other things than raising families. And finally, individual exceptions for people in bad social and financial situations are perfectly justifiable if we want to have the healthiest, most-flourishing society of contented individuals that we can. These reasons will allow us to permit both abortion and infanticide, at least in today's society. Besides, in basically any society, it makes more sense to simply incentivize procreation than to crudely force unwanted pregnancies to come to fruition. But in principle, many cultures have accepted, or still do accept, a basic obligation to continue familial bloodlines. Even in Western society people often think that even if parenthood isn't obligatory, it's at least admirable or supererogatory in some way. Moreover, modern medical technology and social safety nets, including surrogate parenthood, reduce the demandingness of such a duty and will continue to do so with future technological advancements.
What Marquis says against such a position is that there is no one specific person who is being harmed when you refuse to have a child. But this isn't satisfactory either. The right response to this will depend on your personal view of identity theory, but a fetus or an infant still has a very indeterminate personality. Depending on nurture factors, it could turn out to be for all intents and purposes an entirely different person. Or imagine a person who has a rare type of multiple personality disorder which causes their entire persona, thoughts, and memories to change every time they go to sleep. Isn't it wrong to kill them in their sleep? If it is, then the barest, strictest form of potentiality is still morally important. 
Funny that it really seems like Marquis is the more utilitarian one in this debate. 
I agree it seemed that way at first (surprisingly), when he's disputing some of Singer's arguments. But later, the crux of his argument against abortion turns out to be about personhood and identity and the relationship between that and potentiality (the "specific person" issue). That line of reasoning seems highly non-utilitarian.
Or imagine a person who has a rare type of multiple personality disorder which causes their entire persona, thoughts, and memories to change every time they go to sleep. Isn't it wrong to kill them in their sleep? If it is, then the barest, strictest form of potentiality is still morally important.
Many such questions seem best addressed by analysis of scarcity and idealized economic value. 
I'm not sure I can fully make sense of the (Dark City-esque) scenario you describe, but taking it at face value and ignoring any medical-miracle aspects:  would agree it would not be permissible to kill such a non-continuous person in their sleep. This is basically because it requires a lot of investment to create a functioning adult, and society values functioning adult: the nightly resets don't much affect that person's value.
On the other hand, the "barest, strictest form of potentiality" need not be morally important. For example, let's say it is is very cheap & easy & reliable to produce a zygote; then it would be of negligible moral concern... all the real economic investment comes later in developing that zygote into an infant, functioning adult, etc. (This may not be quite true in practice about zygotes but probably is about even barer potentialities, like sperm cells.)
The 'economic' approach may seems disturbing because it sometimes sounds as if endorses (entirely incorrect) views like "only employable people have moral worth". But this confuses idealized economics with mere money. The latter—which concretely evaluates the value a person's formal labor—is only a tiny fraction of the full social benefit a person offers to society. I think if this style of reasoning is conducted properly it renders irrelevant (as Singer wants to do) most considerations of 'personal identity', 'life', etc.
Speciesism is a little inherent to this issue, as humans are uniquely capable and sentient (more the former) on a level most animals really aren't.
We should kill animals willy nilly; however, there is a compelling reason why, if forced to kill one human (one infant even) or one animal, most of us would reasonably spare the human.
I don't think Singer and Marquis bring up speciesism here because of anything to do with animal welfare. Rather, the thought seems to be that a principle like "being biologically human grants one moral relevance" is false at least in part because it's speciesist. We don't even have to bring up animals at all  here, we can simply suppose that live in a Star Trek like universe, where many other species that are mentally very much like us reside. It's then natural to think that vulcans have the same right to life that humans do, even though vulcans aren't biologically human.
Of course they deploy other counterexamples as well, such as anencephalic infants.
Human-like, yes. Indifferentiable from humans based on key metrics. But if you want to argue that animals consumed for slaughter are deprived of certain things, you can, but these things are orders of magnitude different than in the case of humans. Animals are not pursued of interests they would otherwise engage in--their ability to engage in recreational activities (sans man, perhaps) is limited. Domestic animals are different in this respect, and perhaps occupy a middle ground.
But if you want to argue that animals consumed for slaughter are deprived of certain things, you can, but these things are orders of magnitude different than in the case of humans. 
What did I just say? Let me repeat it for you:
I don't think Singer and Marquis bring up speciesism here because of anything to do with animal welfare. 
I guess I was arguing something orthogonal to all this. Or perhaps using Singer's metrics for other purposes. It's not welfare, but any metric concerned with deprivation of pursuits does not end with humans and animals being interchangeable. But as you mentioned, human-like beings are, morally, humans.
Is there no tension between Singer's views of permissible infanticide, and yet the slaughter of animals for consumption? I guess he rejects potentialism, but I think an awful lot of things have roots in potentialism.
Should I not murder a neighbor simply because their spouse loves them? 
Should I not murder a neighbor simply because their spouse loves them?
What about Singer's analysis suggests this? It seems pretty clear to me that Singer thinks murdering your neighbor is wrong because your neighbor has a concept of himself through time. Unless your neighbor is an anencephalic infant, in which case I'd wonder how he was able to marry...
And, lest you think these students are somehow more dispirited than the usual hormonally wracked/existentially pumped variety (undergraduate and graduate alike), let me tell you that this is a phenomenon I’ve observed over the years, on a number of North American campuses, and it continues to astonish me. They are exhausted. These children of first world everything, every material good and privilege that humans have wrought, fashioned and fought for over millennia, are simply tired of the whole thing.
You haven't actually asked how much time these students spend working, have you?  Because it's a lot.  They seem exhausted because they're literally exhausted.
And he's probably one of the people exhausting them.
*she
Yeah, I agree with the general sentiment of the author, but they're just being idealistic and requesting their students be "deep" like themselves, without analyzing what's going on. I guess the immanent implication of writing this article is that the problem is they haven't read enough articles by philosophy profs telling them why it's important to be "deep."
It ain't easy being a  puff puff philosopher, you know.
I confess I haven't read the article but it's also possible they are students born into privilage-- not saying they don't or haven't worked, but (and I work at a top US university), a lot of them (most?) have lived lives and will continue to live lives removed from the daily "existential" struggle of making ends meet
I am not sure how the first part about pleasure seeking, and the students answering with simple, easy pleasures, is supposed to connect with the rest of the text and building a self. I haven't read Kierkegaard, does he define that link clearer than the author here?
I mean I doubt anybody that is trying to do something meaningful with their lives would describe that striving as pleasure seeking. You may derive some pleasure from it, but that's hardly the first word that comes to mind when I think about doing something with my life. Pleasure is cheap in the first world, you can have a meaningless life full of small pleasures or a meaningful life full of pleasures as well.
I think I didn't quite understand the point of the text.
She's claiming that these students are tired/bored of modern life because they have been trained to regard the world objectively at the expense of developing themselves as a person. 
I guess she's taking the lack of enthusiasm at listing pleasures combined with the only pleasures listed being relaxing ones as signs that the students don't have any passions.
At least that's as far as I can go in connecting her intro with the rest of it. 
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
[removed]
Is it not possible to enjoy the subtle nuances of getting drunk by slamming domestic beers...?
Kierkegaard describes developmental stages that begins with a concern with immediate sensual pleasures then progressing into more abstract projects that unfold over time. Each stage reflects a different response to and understanding of the problems of nihilism. From this perspective, a collective inability to transition from purely aesthetic concerns indicates a failure in the culture to cultivate the conditions necessary for a very basic level of reflection and thought.
Edit: Having reread the section, the responses she received reflect the lowest level of aesthetic concerns. All of the sensual answers she expects are concerns of their own that can be developed, wine tasting as an example with alcohol or the Kama Sutra as related to the art of sex.
Thanks, that makes sense and clarifies what she was aiming for. Still that's a peculiar way of thinking and you can't just drop a question like that without having let the students read the author first. If somebody questions me about pleasure that last thing that will come to mind are my more abstract projects. Which doesn't mean that there is no pleasure involved in them, but I rationalize them in different terms.
And even if the question was more pertinent, a room full of strangers would be hardly the place where I would discuss my inner projects.
You're not the only one, the author is a terrible writer who seems quite full of herself. The claim that kids these days are less spirited is bullshit, too. No wonder people think philosophy is useless.
Maybe you only think she's a bad writer and full of herself because she references Kierkegaard as if he's important, while you think the oldest, most foundational part of academia is useless. 
It's funny how the teacher asks the students about what pleasures they want from life asking them a question that many would find highly personal and inappropriate(so do you silly teens think happiness is about sex and drugs?). Then after she backs them into a corner they give simple answers like 'comfort food'.
Then she pretends to diagnose a materialistic, empty mindset that does not provide a compass for moral actions nor a guide to true happiness. She is actually building up the narrative she herself wants whether she's aware of it or not. That narrative being: 'We are fundamentally confused, animalistic autamatons who need to ask the hard questions about our purpose in life, whether there is any and if we can pretend there is any('freedom' to create meaning).
Maybe teens relate somewhat better to existentialism than other branches of philosophy in general. Still i don't think existentialism is a useful term to describe the views of all who came between Kierkegaard and Foucault. The way it's main ideas are watered down and generalized into a sort of anxious, physicalist nihilism is not going to give anyone any unique or profound insight into life.
Dear Reader: what do you think I hear? Sex, you say? Drugs? Sex and drugs on the beach? (...) No (...)
I know I would think sex (all kinds of filthy, deviant nasty sex..) and drugs too, but never dare say so out aloud in front of everyone. I'm pretty sure I'm not alone in that.. It doesn't completely derail his argument, but I do think he brushed a little lightly over this in the first part of his article.
Me too. I'm sure that most of the students were thinking of one or more drugs and/or sex
They are exhausted. These children of first world everything, every material good and privilege that humans have wrought, fashioned and fought for over millennia, are simply tired of the whole thing.
She keeps saying the same thing over and over again, with the only evidence being one student who didn't answer the way she liked. She is then disappointed and disapproving when a student asks for clarification and definition of terms. I can guess why she doesn't see much enthusiasm in her classes.
She's clearly terrible at facilitating classroom discussion. She's trying to use the discussion itself as an illustration of her point. That's a bad idea. The discussion should be conducted for its own sake, not to prove the professor's point.
The task of education is not (again, borrowing from Socrates) to pour external facts and claims down their willing (or unwilling) gullets, but to set a challenge, that of developing what Kierkegaard calls ‘interiority,’ the aduton or sanctuary that is an established self, one committed to a task in the world.
Any school which believes this should advertise it clearly on all their advertising materials. Let it serve as a trap for the deserving, and a warning for everyone else.
I would say that it is a symptom of the rottenness of our society that education is exclusively seen as a means to get a job. We're edging closer to a future alike the one in Brave New World, everyone with an education specializing in their own small STEM field and having no thoughts outside of that small sphere. No point in teaching English, or Philosophy, or any field of study that will not result in an in-demand job, otherwise it's a waste of money. What we need is engineers and computer scientists and nothing more.
It's small-minded, dead-end thinking. That being said, it's the only kind of thinking that is allowed for when a degree costs a hundred thousand dollars.
everyone with an education specializing in their own small STEM field and having no thoughts outside of that small sphere. 
It seems like the sciences are becoming more and more esoteric, and therefore more time and resource intensive to become efficient at. It seems like asking someone to have a specialty that legitimately takes years of studying to master combined with a general proficiency in the liberal arts is demanding too much.
I'm not so sure. I mean, to an extent this has always been the case, to specialize so much in one field for most people always means neglecting other areas, but even the most dedicated scientist has other interests outside of their work, or at least ought to have. Carl Sagan famously concerned himself only with physics until he started smoking weed, though, so who knows? Either way I think it is a scary prospect that we should specialize ourselves so much that we can't expect people of science to have serious interests outside of their own fields. It seems to me that a mere couple hundred years after the enlightenment we are once again dividing ourselves into castes.
Well, a caste system requires a complete lack of class mobility. In the United States, it is still possible for the poor to become wealthy, and plenty of wealthy people become poor. Our income mobility is decent.
I said building, not have already built. A class system exists, as it is.
You sure about that? #wearethe99%
It's a very calculated political move. Scholastics and esoterics have abandoned the church for science, since the times of Comte at the least. We're made to focus on methodology in order to create a caste of ones who know the real objective truth and everyone else. Of course most students that are crammed with methodology turn out to be idiots in anything outside of their field. 
Could you show evidence for that historic thesis that there's been a deliberate scholaticization/esotericization of academic science?
The only thing I ask is that you consider it and not simply dismiss it because it sounds uncomfortable. I'm speaking in absolutes but really I'm just offering a perspective. 
It's a simple reasoning, it's happened before and it's happening again. 
Just show the bloody evidence.  Of course good evidence will change my mind, but since most people making the claim don't have good evidence, I'm skeptical going in.
What would evidence look like right now? Did peasants in the medieval period have evidence of such a thing happening to them? It probably won't come to public consciousness until this historical period washes over. I mean we're at a point right now where we seem to think that methodologists, esoteric sub fields of science(most of astro and quantum physics) and hyper specialization is the absolute shit and should stay like it is. 
I would say that it is a symptom of the rottenness of our society that education is exclusively seen as a means to get a job.
Well, I think it's a symptom of the rottenness of our society when education is exclusively seen as 'a thing you pay someone to take classes for'. We have the internet at our disposal, the free flow of information, and with philosophy, english and otherwise, an absolute wealth of timeless books, and more.
That being said, it's the only kind of thinking that is allowed for when a degree costs a hundred thousand dollars.
Well, yeah. But if people were sincere about the importance of people learning philosophy, english, etc, they'd be looking for ways to make it something a person could engage in without dropping a dollar. Take the money out of the equation, and suddenly for many people this noble task of education no longer seems worth the effort. Funny how that works.
But if people were sincere about the importance of people learning philosophy, english, etc, they'd be looking for ways to make it something a person could engage in without dropping a dollar.
What? This doesn't make any sense. You have to pay to learn how to do medicine, and I doubt people are insincere about the importance of medicine. 
What? This doesn't make any sense. You have to pay to learn how to do medicine, and I doubt people are insincere about the importance of medicine.
Few people talk about how important it is for most of humanity to learn medicine. What they want are doctors, surgeons, nurses, etc, which is a specialty field requiring things like cadavers, chemicals, strict training undersupervision and more. If the desire was simply that some people become familiar with medicine, then 'Go to medical school' would be overkill and useless advice too.
With philosophy, there's no need for cadavers, for strict training under a professional who wants you to come to particular conclusions (In fact, that's pretty abhorrent) and more. Want to learn philosophy? You'll need books. At most, books and a lesson plan, maybe some other people to talk to at times. If the desire was, first and foremost, to give people an exposure to philosophy, even considerable knowledge of it, the whole 'Go in debt paying tuition' bit could be very easily circumvented, to great effect.
You don't make any sense. You're arguing that if people thought something was important to study, it would be free. So do you think nobody thinks anything is important to study, because it costs money to go to college?
You don't make any sense.
I'm making perfect sense. Which seems like the real problem you're having here.
I've pointed out that if getting people to learn philosophy is the real goal, there's a myriad of ways to get very far with this without anchoring them to debt and years of formal education - indeed, without costing them a penny. Do you deny this? If your answer is 'No, BUT...' then save what comes after the 'but'. It's irrelevant, you do understand me after all, and you agree.
If your answer is 'Yes, I deny it', then give your argument. This'll be good.
I think he's saying that (for example) when learning philosophy you might do it better if you have someone that can point out errors in your thinking as you're learning it. For most people it isn't just a matter of getting a book list and plowing through it. Writing papers does help people clarify their thinking and having someone to grade the paper and offer feedback is useful, and probably not free.
It also takes a lot of time, and that is not free because it has an opportunity cost.
I think he's saying that (for example) when learning philosophy you might do it better if you have someone that can point out errors in your thinking as you're learning it.
That's a legitimate point, but I also question whether that's 'what he's saying' as opposed to 'what he should have actually said'.
But even the example you're giving is one which can be heavily addressed by, say, joining an online community of people who discuss philosophy. You talk about the opportunity cost, but keep in mind, formal study has the opportunity cost of not just time, but a tremendous amount of money.
Is it better to not study philosophy at all than to just start opening books and study on your own, even with online lesson plans - which, again, are pretty easy to make free?
I was talking about the monetary opportunity cost. If we (as a society) think it's valuable for people to spend time studying philosophy and art and music and other non "career" subjects for lack of a better term, we should be subsidizing it not only with free education but also with stipends.
Some people are auto didacts but most aren't and many people will benefit from instruction, lectures, and a subject matter expert helping them to learn and challenging their thoughts. These things all cost money even if the texts themselves are available for a free download.
It's true for any topic. I mean, I can name a few teachers that were instrumental to my understanding of computer science, math, and philosophy and I never ever would have been able to get that understanding by reading some material online and discussing it in forums/reddit. I don't think there's any real replacement for the kind of focused immersion you can achieve in a university setting away from jobs, parents, etc.
Well, I think it's a symptom of the rottenness of our society when education is exclusively seen as 'a thing you pay someone to take classes for'. We have the internet at our disposal, the free flow of information, and with philosophy, english and otherwise, an absolute wealth of timeless books, and more.
It's true, we have this wealth of information, but what time has anyone to learn it? Everyone has to make a living and that is generally a full-time affair. And even then that assumes that people have the interest in learning. Such interests have to be cultivated. People are in large part what society makes of them and our society tells us to spend our spare time watching funny cat videos or whatever, not spending their time in intellectual pursuits.
Well, yeah. But if people were sincere about the importance of people learning philosophy, english, etc, they'd be looking for ways to make it something a person could engage in without dropping a dollar. Take the money out of the equation, and suddenly for many people this noble task of education no longer seems worth the effort. Funny how that works.
Sure, but I'm not worried about whether "we" are sincere about wanting people to learn the liberal arts, in fact I think it's quite clear that "we" don't want them to. Like I said, everyone has to make a living and nobody is going to drop tens of thousands of dollars and years of their life to learn something that isn't going to give them a good living. You're talking about individuals, I'm talking about society and what society prioritizes. Sure, nobody needs to learn about history or literature to get a job, and we could stop teaching Shakespeare and the history of the world in high school entirely and civilization would not collapse as a result. But I think it is essential to the existence of a democratic society that people know about such things.
It's true, we have this wealth of information, but what time has anyone to learn it? Everyone has to make a living and that is generally a full-time affair.
'Full time affair' in the West largely means 40-45 hours a week, weekends off, vacation days and sick days, hours a day after work, and more. If you mention it's still problematic to fit learning in there, feel free to tell me how they'll swing formal classes.
But I think it is essential to the existence of a democratic society that people know about such things.
I agree. Which is why I endorse giving them opportunities and prioritizing those individuals' opportunities, rather than thinking in terms of how to best support a top-heady academic apparatus that is often offered up as the sole way to 'get an education'.
People are in large part what society makes of them and our society tells us to spend our spare time watching funny cat videos or whatever
Well, our society also tells them that learning is something you do in a university while going into tremendous debt, rather than something you can and should do of your own free will and on your own time.
What? Most every scientist or mathematician I know has many interests outside of their specialization. But if you just have some weird desire to other-ize "stem people", don't let me stop you.
No, no, of course not. I'm not talking about individual interests but the point of schooling. More and more the point of higher education is to prepare a person for a specific career and nothing more. I propose that this is both harmful to society as a whole, and a symptom of the harm that has been done to society. As someone who is currently in a trade and trying to go back to school in a STEM field, I am far from trying to otherize STEM people, but rather commenting on a larger trend in education.
I propose that this is both harmful to society as a whole, and a symptom of the harm that has been done to society.
I think the internet has replaced higher education when it comes to accomplishing the goals you mention.
I'm currently taking Honours Biology and Philosophy, my school also has an interdisciplinary institute directed to the study of origins, connecting together philosophers and scientists.  Most universities also have an "Arts and Science" faculty, including mine.  On top of that the Social Sciences have long been a meeting place of disparate disciplines, we've spoken readily of Descartes, Chomsky, and Aristotle in my Psychology class.
I'm not saying its perfect, but they haven't assigned us particular careers yet.
Literally nothing in that post said or implied that scientists have no interests outside of their specialization. Fuck, that's pretty much false on the face of it. You can't deny the neoliberalization of the American university, that it's been retooled as some sort of elaborate vocational school. 
Retooled as a vocational school? During the course of my math and computer science degrees, I took a number of classes in literature, history, philosophy, art, and music. Perhaps your experience has been different than mine, but I couldn't disagree more strongly with your assertion.
A human being should be able to change a diaper, plan an invasion, butcher a hog, conn a ship, design a building, write a sonnet, balance accounts, build a wall, set a bone, comfort the dying, take orders, give orders, cooperate, act alone, solve equations, analyze a new problem, pitch manure, program a computer, cook a tasty meal, fight efficiently, die gallantly. Specialization is for insects.
-Robert A. Heinlein
Or, from the best side of the political spectrum; Marx:
In communist society, where nobody has one exclusive sphere of activity but each can become accomplished in any branch he wishes, society regulates the general production and thus makes it possible for me to do one thing today and another tomorrow, to hunt in the morning, fish in the afternoon, rear cattle in the evening, criticise after dinner, just as I have a mind, without ever becoming hunter, fisherman, herdsman or critic.
But this is precisely the opposite of the direction our society is heading. We are heading to this insectile specialization Heinlein spoke of.
No rebut, just reiterating the idea while in agreement with you.
I know, I am also doing the same.
Whoops.  I wooshed myself.
Just, so inefficient. It's easy to talk of being a renaissance man when you're already well off, but the inefficiency hurts the poorest members of society, for whom a shift in efficiency makes the difference between eating and not eating.
And the efficiency is what robs us of our humanity. Overpopulation is what makes the former more important than the latter by asking us to maximize the well-being of seven billion people at once.
The problem is a general education at university is impractical, because the volume of information for each field has vastly increased over the decades. In a biology degree, for example, there is now only enough time to very briefly cover the fundamentals (evolution, cell biol, biochem) that underpin biological processes. Pre 1950's there was time to cover a more general education in 3-4 years and it's simply not possible now. in 2015 you'd need 20 years to even just briefly touch on the range and content of current academic fields (many of which didn't even exist pre-1950's, but which are incredibly valuable now in most fields - e.g. computers and programming).
I'm late to the party, but more and more I think that formal education should be this specialization for a job.
High school should be the basics that everyone needs to learn to have a solid ground for self-education.  College and University should be to prepare for a job.
Interest-learning is best self-directed.
I took an honours English and B.A. in philosophy, and learned a lot.  But I learned more in the four years working after graduation when I could follow my interests, and research as I pleased.  And my knowledge is much more varied. Urban planning, physics, biology, economics... I've learned more outside of university than I did in it because I could simply follow my passions.  And it didn't cost tens of thousands of dollars.
So high school should teach philosophy, civics, economics, and others that have historically been the domain of college but which are important for being a modern democratic citizen?
Civics has traditionally been the domain of college?  I have never heard of college teaching civics.
I would say that the main change I'd make to high school would be to stop teaching kids as though they are computers memorizing, but teach them how to think about thinking. In the US, common core has moved toward this, which is really good.  I hope that as time passes, we realise that people don't need information, but ability.  Information can be gathered later, but the ability to think critically and metacognitively is essential to learning.  Those that didn't learn that ability struggle for their entire lives, in everything they do.  Those who have it never stop learning or improving.
But, yes, also give people the tools to meaningfully analyse potential  policy and participate in our democracy.
I'm using civics as a catch-all for a variety of skills and knowledge relevant to participating in democracy.
Ahhh, OK.  I have just never really seen that as something that college does.  I never studied any economics or public policy analysis or government structure and theory in my college education.  
And it shouldn't teach those things.  Not everyone goes to college.  If there's knowledge relevant to participation in a democracy, it should be part of the basic education every citizen gets, i.e. primary and secondary education
Eh, I only bring it up because it's something that high school doesn't do.
>implying science and math are in demand.
>implying things were ever better for those outside the upper classes
implying things were ever better for those outside the upper classes
Economically, sure. But education for its own sake is still very much an upper class affectation, even if it's permitted to everyone now.
education for its own sake is still very much an upper class affectation
That's my point.
Math and science, no. Just engineering and technology. Things actually were better for the common person for a time, though. At least when it came to University education. Granted it didn't last, because a robust, affordable education that teaches a person to be a thinking citizen rather than just a specialized cog was very dangerous to the established order.
It's just inefficient to withhold a career as a chemist until a person knows that difference between Hobbes and Locke. Do you also require dancers to learn chess? Do you require painters to be able to differentiate between the fundamental forces? Do you require butchers to know how to fly a plane?
Actually yes, we do require painters to be able to differentiate between the fundamental forces, it's called a high school education. There is a baseline level of learning that everyone should have in order to have a functioning society.
I'm not talking about technical things like flying a plane, I'm talking about the basic sort of knowledge necessary for a person to be able to function as a citizen in a democracy.
I feel like 'getting a job' is the only reason 95% of my peers are at school. I go to a university that has intense engineering and computer science programs, and I feel that even though a lot of people enjoy what they do, they're all mostly concerned with financial gains, and have little to no interest in any other discipline but their own. It gets to the point where the university administration agrees with them, and basically cuts funding from the arts faculty to boost the engineering faculty.
Sure, pursue a degree in engineering, but realize that the whole world isn't engineering.
They think that way because society makes them think that way. We all are forced to play the game, and it is normalized to the extent that people don't even know it's a game.
When we have to get a good job to live well, and we have to get an education to get a good job, then any responsible person is going to prioritize and get an education in order to get a good job. And when the market controls society, it controls education, and education thus prioritizes what the market demands.
It's easy enough to say that when you have the money to get education that you don't strictly need, but many people who go to college are being bled for what little money they have, they can't afford to get frivolous education.
When a process is industrialized, the environment suffers. We have industrialized college. What did we expect would happen, The Federation?
I am not so sure much thought went into it.
No point in teaching English, or Philosophy, or any field of study that will not result in an in-demand job
Well yes, that's unfortunately the reality of it. To change this would be to change society into one where jobs are not necessary, such as with Basic Income.
Also, you're forgetting that the spectrum of future-proof jobs is sometimes rendered STEAM, to acknowledge the importance of the creative aspects which can't be automated.
In fact, art degrees are increasingly profitable these days. Especially in tech companies.
If you want to make money with a philosophy degree, apply it to the tech industry somehow...
Or apply it to politics and get us all that Basic Income. :)
No, not where jobs are not necessary but where the market doesn't control education, or our lives for that matter. As for a basic income, I don't think that that would be sufficient. It's utopian to think that other people can benevolently control our lives and provide us with our well being, simply in return for us buying our products. I think a basic income alone with no other changes in society would frankly be scary.
It's utopian to think that other people can benevolently control our lives and provide us with our well being
No it's not. That's absolutely the whole point of civilisation itself. It's why we evolved social skills, and it's why we invented agriculture. It's why we covered the Earth in empires, and it's why we have a UN and an EU and a USA.
Although I'm not exactly a Utopian, I maintain a utopian ideal that I work towards, as do most people. Why try to change it if you don't know what you want to change it to?
Other things need to change, this is true. But a Basic Income takes the pressure off and allows that growing percentage of unemployed people to invest in their education, or simply pursue hobbies.
I think we need more than just Basic Income though. We should also be using the Internet to facilitate better democratic engagement. I would like to see kings and presidents replaced by consensus-drawn constitutions, and digital direct democracy used for political decision-making. I would like to see mass renewable energy investment, and a subsidised electric vehicle industry.
But for now, as a single step that isn't much change overall fiscally but as one that will prepare the road for an automated society, I think Basic Income is the best idea so far.
Saying that, I wouldn't be on this sub if I wasn't willing to have my mind changed... :)
No it's not. That's absolutely the whole point of civilisation itself. It's why we evolved social skills, and it's why we invented agriculture. It's why we covered the Earth in empires, and it's why we have a UN and an EU and a USA.
In none of those cases did the people in power benevolently provide for those they ruled, in fact quite the opposite. From the empires of old the the US and the EU the people at the top lived, and continue to live, at everyone else's expense. The empires we once covered the Earth with were all built on slavery and murder, even the relatively benevolent British empire.
It isn't that I don't think a basic income is a good idea, and I think it would be a vast improvement over the current state of affairs. But it alone is not enough.
With automation it will get to the point where a basic income becomes necessary to the continued functioning of capitalism. Firms will still need to sell things, and if nobody has any income to buy anything, obviously their profits will dry up. They'll accept a basic income because they have to, but they will still remain in control, and to an extent they will probably resent the taxes that will be taken from them to generate that basic income.
Suppose that they might see consumption as a responsibility. Now that you no longer earn your income but are given it as a necessity, you're beholden to the power structure that provides it for you, you've been reduced to a consumer and nothing more. Suppose what you gain with a basic income is not a right to be provided with what you need to live, but rather an obligation to spend it to keep the economy going.
And what about people whose labour is still cheaper than a robotic equivalent? What about factory workers in the third world who work for pennies and don't have to be given benefits or even bathroom breaks, are they going to be given a basic income?
It isn't that I mind the idea in itself, but to implement it just as a solution to an automation-driven profitability crisis without a more radical and far reaching change in society is probably going to lead to a rather terrifying dystopia. We'll have reduced ourselves to pure consumers living only for amusement and meanwhile the people who run the corporations that control the robotic workforce will hold all of the power, probably prolonging their lives indefinitely with futuristic medical technology and becoming godlike. How long until they realize that they no longer need a planet full of parasites who do nothing but use their money to purchase their products?
I don't think basic income and your proposals for more democratic participation through information technology will be anywhere near sufficient to keep the profoundly anti-democratic potential of automation in check. What we need is democratic control of these new productive forces, and only then can we actually guarantee a democratic future. If the vast industrial machine armies are to be under private control, they will be used to advance private interests and nothing more.
In none of those cases did the people in power benevolently provide for those they ruled, in fact quite the opposite.
That's not entirely true. The early civilisations were originally multicultural trading posts, and the rulers tried to keep it that way. Ancient Greece had a form of incapacity benefit, and Rome had their grain dole. These things had their critics, just as the welfare state does today.
Civilisation is about building a zone where nature can be subverted to create plenty, and the organisation of that bureaucratically. Sure, rulers have exploited, I'm not denying that. However, even that is due to the labour debt that civilisation creates, and that only automation can cure.
I personally feel like you. I think - at least for now - natural monopolies should be the target for state investment. Moves must be made carefully, so as to not piss off the industries that are creating our brave new world for us. Buying a few state shares might be a reasonable start. Even if there's profits being made, at least dividends can pay back.
I think Norway's handling of their oil is a sensible model that already exists. They own tons of Statoil the company, so not only are they getting the tax money from oil trade, but the state can actually get some of the profits.
If we were to think democratically, and either do the e-democracy thing, or at least vote some people in who can do it for us, we could think about all the human needs, and acquire (or at least hire) companies to build houses, and provide necessary infrastructure like water, gas, electricity, petrol, coal (for those houses!), sewage, postage, public transport, fibre Internet, food, etc., then there would be no problem.
Over time, we just increase our state buying into these monopolies so we can trade normally with other countries. Hell, why not buy out Foxconn and improve lives in China too?
Personally, I think all of this is far more likely if we have some sort of movement towards more direct democracy, but I'll be voting for anyone who wants to implement a Basic Income along the way... :)
Norway has done well with their sovereign wealth fund to be sure, but social democracy has quite obviously failed and I don't see why it wouldn't fail again if we tried to re-implement it. The kind of social democracy practiced in just about every western country in the 1960s degenerated back into free-market capitalism dominated by the wealthy elite in less than a half century.
social democracy has quite obviously failed
In what way?
In that it is gone from the Earth. If I'm not mistaken it is fading away even in the Nordic states.
huh?  edit: seriously, do you care to explain here?
Also, the task of education should be to give people a skill so that they can earn a living for themselves. This high minded rant of hers is so self indulgent and pretentious.
That message definitely resonates with me. I just can't figure out if the people who look sad all the time but maintain that the system works are just lying, or if their problems come from something else entirely. 
Wittgenstein always believed that academicisation of philosophy would ruin it and turn into a dogmatic, dull subject. If teachers themselves have such a defeatist attitude , then how do they expect any different from students. Very few teachers can make philosophy fun, and she doesn't seem to be one of them.
More on this topic.
A man wants a grilled cheese let the man indulge himself. If that is the pleasure he seeks and as an answer to your question. Reflecting his current wants, then let him damn well have it and don't complain about it. Cause he at least knows what he wants. Far ahead of me for knowing what I want for lunch. 
The students' probably all thought things like sex! alcohol! marijuana! television! video games! ...etc but didn't want to say it because in college classes (not necessarily elsewhere on campus) everybody pretends to not indulge in activities that society considers vices
I'm no expert in existentialism and what not. Not a graduate in anything at all, I've just got a keen mind and a curious thought process. 
Lately though I feel like I've realised the importance of understanding my existence. 
Whether you want to believe what I say or not is irrelevant to what I think I felt. 
I've done lots of 'question asking' and 'self-finding' and consciously trying to choose what I want to feel and not feel. 
I'm a happy guy, I'll be at work bombarded with more work than I've ever had and thoroughly enjoy it because it's simply a challenge, rather than complain all day about it like everyone else. 
If you act positive, you will see a positive world. It's up to you to find the positive in it.
I personally seek the positive because I believe it is 'right' because it FEELS right.
Maybe I've been brought up 'wrong' in understanding what 'right' feels like, but regardless. It still feels right.
A few weeks ago I felt like I got to the point of something I would describe as 'enlightenment' (call me crazy if you want, don't really care. I'll happily stay crazy, it's fun as fuck)
It felt as if I had 'discovered' my true self as much as my sole self could. 
It was only for a split moment and felt like a massive surge of emotions. But more than anything I felt understanding. From that moment on, literally everything became so much clearer. Thought processes and understandings seemed to just 'click' into place.
My mum related it to hearing that final note played in a song. The song builds up and you can feel the end of it. But the final note doesn't play. 
Then, when it is struck. You get that feeling of relief and satisfaction on hearing that pattern of music appear to 'sound' complete.
Kinda felt like that, but with everything everywhere that I am physically capable of thinking of.
Like it's suddenly become a lot more difficult to be 'confused' by things because I am able to apply my own personal beliefs on everything, to everything else because I know myself so well.
It's a great feeling, terribly lonely one. But damn great. Makes me really FEEL like I see the world completely differently to most other people, even though I 'know' I always have...
A couple 'problems' with this feeling and event that I feel I've experienced is that is is pretty much IMPOSSIBLE for me to describe how it will feel for you. I was unprepared, in my own usual random thoughts when it felt like the true 'me' made its way in there. For me to explain what it would feel like for you would be for me to explain who you are. Haven't a clue who you are I can only assume you're human and therefore just as capable of experiencing the same thing as me, in your own way. This is all after years of consciously trying to 'change' my personality to one I would consider 'better'.
I also want to point out that this feeling was momentary. Like a split second of understanding and anything past that moment is merely the memory of the event that had occurred. Which may make it appear to go for 5-10 minutes. But truly felt like a very small moment.
My theory to why I think this is because I I was 'doing' something. I was on my way to Krispy Kreme to get some lovely donuts. The very world I exist in influences who I am at all moments in an infantismal amount of possible ways.
So yea, I may have been sitting at the traffic lights and felt the most powerful and amazing experience I think I have ever experienced in my life, or, it was just a brain fart. 
But more importantly. What did it teach me?
Not a whole lot really, I had a lot of thoughts thy were pretty close, it just needed that nudge of 'myself' to get 'me' to understand it all.
Now I am not entirely sure how different or similar this would be to someone 'seeing God' or 'experiencing aliens' as I don't think I've felt those thing either. But the fact I think I would know what those would feel like makes me believe this was something different.
But what have I learnt the most? Truly?
Enlightenment, whatever that may be, is literally the MOST selfish act a singular human being could ever do in this physical universe.
As it requires full and complete understanding of one's self without the distractions of this world. Maybe why meditation, sitting and staying in one spot for long periods of time, allows prolonged feelings of 'enlightenment', makes sense.
This is why I would encourage people to discover themselves or question their existence. If each and every individual existing human could reach their own version of enlightenment and hopefully experience the utter USELESSNESS and irrelevance of the SINGULAR human. I think it'd change a lot. 
I mean how the fuck were you even born if humans were 'meant' to be alone?
I have a strong belief that I should do my best to understand myself equally as much as I understand others, as others 'appear' to 'exist' equally as much as I do.
After reaching this 'enlightened' point. This became incredibly stronger. Maybe because it was already there, maybe because I am 'right', if that is even a thing...
A lot of debates seem to be arguments between peoples misunderstandings of what I believe are the same thing.
Like arguing whether or not we were created or evolved.
Does it really matter? Truly, truly matter? I don't think so. The only, one thing that could ever possibly matter is what is most certainly and undeniably going on right NOW. 
Existence.
With every moment I exist, there comes another moment where I exist, that previous 'moment' no longer 'exists' as it becomes a memory, to me. If I choose to 'forget' that memory and no one else in the universe has the ability to 'remember' it or 'experience' it again, then it truly does not exist any longer in this physical a world.
Thoughts, the only way we can possibly know whether our thoughts are 'valid' thoughts to exist in this physical realm of existence, we must share them with other apparent beings of existence in this reality. Other humans is all we have at the moment.
How can one person ever know they are 'wrong' without first talking about it with someone else to whether they think it is wrong. If you both agree, it most certainly is 'wrong' if one disagrees then there is a misunderstanding somewhere that can quite often be quite easily understood with just a bit more thoughtful communication.
Instead of 'that doesn't make sense, therefore it isn't 'right''
Or 'I don't believe you, therefore you are wrong'
If you were to ask me, that's what's 'wrong'.
We keep trying to determine whether or not someone is 'lying' so that we may use their information in our own lives. I would argue that we need to stop judging whether or not people are lying and just let them do it. If they don't realise they're 'lying' to themselves then are they really lying?
Like the guy at work who claims we didn't go to the moon because of 'magnetic fields'.
I could laugh, be rude, make a joke, make him feel foolish, for what reason? To make myself feel better? I don't need that, I've got myself covered, cos I'm fucking awesome like that.
Or, I could correct him, in the most respectful and knowledgeable (of the physical 'world') manner. That way, we now BOTH have an understanding of one another and we can conclude that with my 'evidence' and his 'evidence' the moon landing was in fact, possible.
But then you could argue that everything I (and he) have as 'evidence' is just what I learned from school or movies or the Internet. Maybe even from a big bearded guy who came down from heaven and dropped a knowledge bomb about the moon landings for me. It's equally as possible from what I truly know. But not necessarily probable from what I understand.
Unfortunately. Most people don't enjoy feeling 'corrected' or 'being wrong' so when someone other than yourself claims something else. You automatically assume it to be 'wrong'. If we are far more accepting with others, I think we'll really start getting places. Just have that little bit more patience with other people and choose carefully WHAT you say to them and HOW you say it.
Understand yourself in the sense that you know what you are saying and you are not lying to yourself or them, and
Understand others so you can know what and how to say what you have to say without being disrespectful, rude or unpleasant. 
But, then again, after all this I really might be crazy. And everything I have thought up this far in my existence is gobbldy gook and is completely 'wrong' in the grand scheme of things anyway. But you'll have to trust me when I say that consciously viewing the world in this way has increased my value for my life exponentially, and also everyone else's.
It's all good and well to base your belief on nothing but 'proof', but seriously, where's the fun in that?
I used to believe in the apparent non-existent, as I was brought up Christian.
I then 'believed' it all to be nonsense because there was no 'proof'.
Then when I questioned the 'proof' that people claimed to have I came up with similar answers to what someone like God would give me. 
The physical world says this does this and that does that. 
God says this does this and that does that. 
When one 'misunderstands' the other we have conflict. 
But truly think about it, maybe it's us that are misunderstood about everything and both God and the Universe are always correct.
Maybe not.
What's the difference? Fucked if I know. Maybe I'm not supposed to know. Maybe I can't know. But what's more fun for me to thinking about is the fact that, like life and everything else. I CAN know it. And I have. Or I appear to have. Is it the same? Is it different?
Like my (and I believe everyone elses) underlying answer to anything and everything that could ever be at asked.
"I don't know."
Have a lovely day! :D
Good read, thanks for sharing. The problem with your conclusion, in my opinion, is that you ignore my perception that humans are perpetually bombarded with moral and philosophical questions that shape society. I don't think anyone is kicking anyone elses door down to correct misunderstandings, but when making decisions that effect society humanity needs a metric to make those decisions, that metric is reason based on evidence. People can live in whatever world they want, but when meditating on the future of humanity I would prefer to have decisions based on reflection of evidence. 
Thanks! I really appreciate it. 
Straight away I'd like to clear up that I like to think the term 'problem' and 'misunderstanding' are the same thing. I can see a problem and understand it, if I understand it well enough I can see that it is no longer a 'problem' but just a different way of seeing the world.
'Problem' to me sounds too subjective and is too similar to 'wrong' which is why I admire that you included "In my opinion"
From what I understand of the universe is that all these 'questions' that we are bombarded with are formed from the physical universe because that's all we can prove there is.
(I wont go into the whole chaos talk but if you've read the Principia Discordia, you'd have a decent idea where I'm coming from on the matter)
These 'questions' about the physical world do indeed shape our society. You're quite right. But me saying your 'right' is simply me understanding your understanding. I can say 'you are right' but that doesn't mean I believe you to be. (In this case I do)
If a large amount of people all agree on similar enough things then it would be a society.
If a large amount of people agree that killing is 'wrong' then, in that society of people who see killing as wrong. Killing IS wrong. But that doesn't necessarily mean that every single being in that society ALL believe killing is wrong. I think a society is different to recognising individuals.
I think I may have also forgotten to put in there that yes the mental world that we view the physical world is important. But something like 'enlightenment' is SO selfish, that you lose that importance of the physical world. If I COULD exist without physical form, enlightenment would be the way to escape this world.
I don't believe that is possible.
I believe what is physical and apparently IS, is still more important that what COULD be.
If I didn't have that grasp then I wouldn't be able to hold on to what I define as 'reality' and what I define as 'belief'. It can become a fine line, but if you want to be a tightrope walker, it's fun as dicks.
I don’t mean to imply ‘kicking doors down’ when I claim misunderstanding as well. It simply means that you know something I don’t and the miscommunication we have on that thing at the moment leads us to a misunderstanding of it.
Share your beliefs and your attitudes so I might know YOU more and understand what you have to say. Which is precisely what you have done by leaving your comment. 
As I mentioned I was on my way to Krsipy Kreme when I felt I had this ‘moment’ of clarity. I believe It was because I still physically exist in this world as it is one part of who I am. And my idea of 'meditation' has nothing to do with the future of humanity, nothing to do with the future of anything. Meditation to me is like looking inside yourself to find who you are. If I was to meditate on the future of humanity I would have to be humanity itself, right?
Maybe not, I'm not a Guru.
Hope that clears things up a bit, let me know if you have any further questions or ‘misunderstandings’ of my understandings of everything. :D
[removed]
My reaction was similar but not as strong. I agree that the questions were incredibly culture-bound. They seem to be in the self-actualizing  Romantic mode, which I think is fading away and was more popular in the professor's youth than today. And hedonism was once a way to rebel but I think now it's old hat.
That said, I think there's still some relevance to 
developing what Kierkegaard calls ‘interiority,’ the aduton or sanctuary that is an established self, one committed to a task in the world.
but it can't be taken for granted today, it needs an argument. I find that many Americans, in many walks of life, are extremely susceptible to social influence, often without even realizing where they get their ideas. To me, this is a form of unintelligent life, and tends to lead to large groups happily skipping off a cliff together, or falling victim to propagandists. That way also stifles creativity.
Solitude and reflection are important. But I don't think I can get behind
an established self, one committed to a task in the world.
Which is a prescription to attach yourself to and define your self by identification with a mission. It's one way to live, but not the only, and has well-known problems. Personally, I consider it (and K's project generally, from my merely glancing acquaintance) to be voluntarily living an illusion--ultimately anti-philosophical and anti-self.
This belongs in /r/lewronggeneration
When one accepts the idea of capitalism as a way of structuring society, one accepts the framework of competition being the general state of things. So to me it makes sense we are all exhausted, either because we accept it is what it takes to survive and get where we want, or because we still feel the same but misjudge how much effort to put in to reach a satisfactory position. 
She should leave the psychology to the psychologists. She thinks her students are exhausted and she's completely fabricated the reason why. Did she ask any of them if they're tired and if so why? It's probably just typical fear of public speaking in a new class. 
Great post. Need to read more on the philosopher to author was referring to. Seems like I'm still too focused on the well known ones instead of studying deeper on the subject. Looking forward to expanding my philosophical thoughts, and thank you very much for posting this. 
Existentialism is a problem for people with too much time on their hands.  Get a job your enjoy and a wife/husband and a kid or two and a couple hobbies you like and it just won't seem that important anymore. Does life have some grander objective meaning, no.  Is there some compelling objective reason to live rather than die, no.  
Is it worth moping about or fixating on when there are things to do and people to spend time with, no.
I have a job and it sure doesn't make me not want to kill myself.
Unionize and seize the means of production.
You got an upvote from me buddy. I tried that once and I almost came close. Not to the latter obviously but to the former.
I did it at a pizza joint by using a spontaneous anarcho syndicalist model of unionizing the work place. It actually worked to get us all a raise (even the scabs) and our old manager back that we liked. Eventually though the steam blew over, everyone forgot that it works but the pizza joint never forgot and slowly cut everyones hours until we were all forced to quit.
Even if every one of your coworkers but you forgot, you must be proud of having used the power that so few workers these days use. Are you sure they all have forgotten? Maybe you have planted a seed that is still yet to sprout.
Yes possibly it made an impression on those kids but I'd be surprised if any of them attempted it again. The results weren't ideal and I never really introduced much political language or theory into it. About 12 of us came together to do a walkout one day and forced the franchises hand because the owner wasn't in a position to get the police involved (its a "right to work" state). The owner was doing shady illegal animal trading with the pet shop next over
Wait, they were buying animals from a pet store to use on pizzas? Fuck.
Ha. Maybe, maybe. We do love turtle soup around here 
Existentialism isn't a problem at all. Its a like a big mirror that asks you to answer the questions that will allow meaning to enter your life. Existential philosophy is about making every moment your own. It's not invented, it goes hand in hand with living. If no one embraced meaning, then the answers to all those things you listed would indeed be no. The point is for them not to be no. If you have meaning in your life, and you can still answer no to the question of grander meaning, you're probably living to fulfil someone else's meaning, maybe your wife idk. That's totally a great life too, but some people want to be the one's with personal meaning, and not necessarily follow another in the world. 
???  I am not living to fulfill any meaning. 
I am just living and making the most of it.  Musing about the ultimate pointlessness of it all is ultimately pointless.
Fair enough. What you doing in r/philosophy then?
Philosophy is a much broader topic than existentialism.  Existentialism was fascinating to me in my teens and early college, but as I learned some useful philosophy, and became busy with a life spending much time worrying about it quickly it lost its luster.
If I have questions, it's wrong to just distract myself from them. I'd only do myself justice by seeking answers, as I would for any other questions.
Unless your question is flawed to begin with. 
This is a dangerous thing to say in an area of study where nearly everything is subjective. 
Doesn't mean it's not something to consider. 
Certainly seek answers, but the questions existentialism concerns itself with do not have answers, or at least ones that are of any interest/consolation.
“the greatest hazard of all, losing the self, can occur very quietly in the world, as if it were nothing at all. No other loss can occur so quietly; any other loss—an arm, a leg, five dollars, a wife, etc.—is sure to be noticed."
What does "losing the self" mean?
[deleted]
When did I dismiss philosophy?  I think you have me confused with another commenter.
[deleted]
That comment was made by MartinBlank73
Existentialism is a problem for people with too much time on their hands. 
The whole of life is "for people with too much time on their hands" any kind of philosophy can take up time, just as can watching TV. There is no such thing as "wasting time" when it's all we have, it's just a case of deciding what is important.
Get a job your enjoy...
Got one of those
...and a wife/husband...
And one of those
Is it worth moping about or fixating on when there are things to do and people to spend time with, no.
Existentialism is not about "moping" or being depressed that life has no meaning. In fact it's pretty much the exact opposite.
It's (for me) about exploring the biggest questions and finding answers for your self. It's about emergence from this self-imposed immaturity, about constructing your own morality and reason for existence. Instead of finding distractions that numb the mind from life, it's about hitting them head-on and revelling in the absurdity.
Your comment was inspirational. Thank you. 
Thank you, I just don't like all the gloom and doom which some see in Existentialism. 
I think there's a lot of truth there, but I would put it in a less judgmental way. The person embedded in a community, who spends much of their time and energy on community projects like child-raising and work, and the rest on needed recreation, feels supported by people around them, and isn't suffering from anxiety or depression, doesn't need to think about these questions too much.
But that's not everyone, and I doubt it's anyone all the time.
Does life have some grander objective meaning, no. 
I thought all critical thinkers had left that idea behind by now. I don't think it has anything to do with existentialism, which seems to be about self-created meaning.
I don't know what meaning is or whether it exists or is important, but I think there's something of value around there. Family and community life can let you down in all sorts of ways, so it's good to have enough of an independent self that you can go your own way when you need to. 
Get a job your enjoy and a wife/husband and a kid or two and a couple hobbies you like
That's the answer of Ecclesiastes and Candide, and in my opinion it's the simplest and the best. But that's only after trying lots of other ideas and finding that none of them really work. But the placebo medicine market is still big, whether it's for vitamins or world views.
Have you thought about putting this thought into a paper? Maybe a book? I'd be interested in reading, say, 100,000 words on it. I think this could be a breakthrough theory.
Its absurdism, is it not? Life is meaningless, so I'll forget that fact and pretend my family and job are my meaning. Yay.
The absurdist can't lose sight of the absurd, but must live in concert with it. What you described, Camu would call "philosophical suicide".
One way of doing away with these kinds of discussions is to recognize that “nature” and “natural” are words. They have meaning in many contexts—often very different meanings, from context to context. But I assume that you both know exactly what a laptop and a bird’s nest are. Whether or not they are “natural” is an argument about language, not about the reality of the laptop or bird’s nest.
Great minds, great read. Just came here to say that. :) 
Your brother is being inconsistent when he disagrees with the Merriam-Webster definition of "nature" and yet says his phone is not "natural." If you both stick with the Merriam-Webster definition of "nature", then GMOs along with almost everything else we eat are not natural because humans have selectively bred/"made" (and hence genetically modified) almost everything we eat.
I guess your brother though could take his argument against GMOs down another road and say that the type of genetic modification in GMOs is physically impossible with selective breeding techniques alone, and therefore is not confined to the natural 'safeguards' that are perhaps built into Nature... but then you could challenge him on both those premises. 
Read this.  
Also, make sure to read all the definitions of nature rather than just the first one.  It's easy to talk past one another when you are thinking of different definitions.  
I would say that everything is natural. Because something that we conceive as 'unnatural' is usually a product of our actions or our action in itself. However, if we concur that we are natural being, our actions should be natural. I view as nature as 'what is' and we are a part of the nature not something different. We will easily say that the pigs' excrements or any product of such natural, why can't us be part of this larger picture?
Additionally, isn't out action and desire natural? For instance, GMO, the example that spurred this discussion, is based on our natural desire of well-being and eat. So the cause is natural, and we used the natural phenomenon to create an organism (which I will argue is also natural). Our action and our product should be natural, as it is cased by, made from, and used nature. Since I have six minutes to spare, I will extend further. I see that someone brought up synthetic material. Isn't that made from the natural source? Or back to my point, everything is made out of the natural source, if we say that what is unnatural is what 'we' change. Certainly there can be an argument that can be made if we consider ourselves something special, and our entity from the beginning is something other than this world. Then, perhaps, the argument can go that we, the human, and every actions that we make are unnatural, thus being artificial. However, I do strongly disagree with that idea, and I believe that many does. (I want to talk about this also if I may, but I believe it's little irreverent :p) 
There are two major differences between a bird nest and a cell phone: 1.) one was manufactured artificially (from synthetic materials), using abstract intelligent design and the other was created naturally, via instinct.
2.) The bird's nest has a place in the natural world, it is "naturally occurring". It's materials are collected from the natural world, vaguely modified, serve a purpose within the natural world, then degrade back into it after said purpose has been fulfilled, adding to it. It's been in a process of refinement harmoniously with the rest of the ecosystems that it participates in for millions of years.
We have created a world separate from the natural world. While it remains in the same dimension, in the same universe, on the same planet, etc. it is still quite separate.
I would disagree.
This position puts humans above nature. Really the only new difference that is stated is that birds create nests out of instinct, unlike humans with cellphones. Cellphones do come from nature, degrade back into nature (given enough time), and serve a purpose to humans. Whether or not a cellphone is harmonious with nature or not is irrelevant. Birds do not make their nests to be harmonious with nature. No animal has the goal of being harmonious with nature, and since humans are animals, they should not be held to a higher standard (theoretically). I say theoretically because I do believe we should help take care of our world.
Why can't we say that cellphones come from human instinct? What gets me is that most people here believe in determinism but that would mean everything we make is an instinct in the big picture.
It's not that we're held to a higher standard, it's not even about goals, it's that what we create is abstracted from nature. What other animals create is instinctive. We've created an artificial world, intentionally. No one would argue that it exists outside of nature, but we need terms to separate that which is naturally occurring and that which we have created aside from what was going on back in our original home.
 I understand what you're saying, and of course we are a part of nature, and we are nature. Obviously we are animals just like the rest, but you're taking it in an odd direction. We make a distinction between nature apart from human creation for the sake of discussion since it is (while technically the same place and source) different.
The only sensible definition of "natural" is everything that can exist (not supernatural).  Every other definition runs into the problems of being subjective.  For this reason, you should probably stay away from the term 'nature'.
It is extremely common for anti-GMO people to make an appeal to nature.
Ask him what he thinks of mutagenic hybrids, which are untested and used in organic agriculture.
You're overthinking this. Nature in the kind of context you are talking about just means "not made by humans". This doesn't put humans above nature, it just makes a distinction between those things we made and those things we didn't. This distinction is sometimes useful to us (or this word wouldn't be in common use).
Of course nature has another meaning which is more common in philosophy and science which includes humans (to the extent that we don't have anything like a soul) and their constuctions and excludes supernatural/spiritual things.
Both these uses are perfectly valid and should normally be distinguishable by context.
You are right. I'm coming to the realization that nature has multiple definitions and that using only one of its definitions for all of its applications doesn't make sense. Although I still believe my brother is being stupid for being against GMOs.
Isn't that second definition loaded with materialist assumptions? I've heard people say to me that if you show me a ghost that just means ghosts are natural and the supernatural still will never exist. That seems hairsplitting to me.
That would be hairsplitting, but the word "natural" in philosophy rather than being loaded with materialist assumptions is often used to help distinguish materialist and non-materialist theories.
I find it amusing that the psychological damage on the drone pilot was addressed, but not that of those living with the constant horror that the flying terminator machines might one day mistake them for terrorists and pump their wedding party full of Hellfire missiles.
What of the psychological harm of soldiers acting as an occupying force? Why do we say drone warfare creates psychological trauma on the victims rather than warfare in general creating psychological trauma?
It reminds me when I googled for statistics about whether the occupation of Irak was wanted / justified, and I wanted statistics about the opinion of Irakians, but strangely, I only got statistics about American opinions. I searched for quite a bit of pages, before realizing that nobody cared what the Irakian think, and I think that was an insight into the debate in itself. (I know how to google, but it was much harder than it should have been)
But that's not the point of the article, it's specifically referring to the validity of Strawser’s argument. There's only so much you can do with 1,000 words.
Premise 3 rests on not sacrificing something of greater moral value. I'd throw terrorizing people with robots on one side of the scale.
What makes drones uniquely capable of terrorizing people to this degree that military forces and their current technology excluding drones cannot? Is the threat of military force inherently more frightening for some reason if it's coming from a drone than a tactical bomber?
Yet another objection we may call the asymmetry objection: many people feel that there is something especially disrespectful about drones as a weapon of war. They may think that we treat our enemies as vermin when we kill them with a drone, or that the kind of asymmetric warfare we wage with drones is unfair. Again, we also must think this means giving up some important value.
"Some important value" happens to include the idea that when one becomes capable of engaging in lethal action against a party that is incapable of causing it's attacker lethal harm, one simultaneously assumes the responsibility to resolve the problem without the application of lethal force.
The fourth argument against the third point is incredibly poorly represented in the text.
"Some important value" happens to include the idea that when one becomes capable of engaging in lethal action against a party that is incapable of causing it's attacker lethal harm, one simultaneously assumes the responsibility to resolve the problem without the application of lethal force.
I think were a lot people would disagree is regarding "causing it's attacker lethal harm."  We could imagine drone strikes that kill people who would otherwise harm others in the long term (i.e., planning suicide bombings).  The idea that because they can't harm the drone that they are somehow 'harmless' doesn't really ring true. 
This isn't a perfect comparison, but requiring ability to cause harm to the attacker seems like it would eliminate many tools that are in current use by military/law enforcement (e.g. snipers, especially in hostage situations).
No, that seems like a very good comparison.  
So thought police using death from above to prevent people from possibly harming people in the future.  Doesn't sound dystopic at all...
We prevent people from harming each other all the time.
Not using surveillance and drones.
The means are pretty irrelevant.  It's the principle that matters. 
I think his final point is perhaps the most pertinent and one that I've made many times.  Combat pilots (though this could be extended to artillery men, vehicle operators, etc.) are often doing just about the same thing a drone operator is, looking into a screen at an infrared image, from an almost equally invulnerable location, and pressing a button.  At least in current conflict zones the threat from the enemy fire is low enough that they might as well be in an air conditioned room in Arizona, and the information they have about where their ordinance is about to be delivered is about the same.  
The whole argument is flawed by what is determined "valuable". 
If drone strikes didn't have such hazardous collateral damage results,  they would be considered an acceptable improvement in warfare tactics.  But they do have severe flaws in accuracy because we can't have a perfected information system.
It's the same reasoning that has caused my views to change regarding the death penalty.  If we accept a system that has any chance (and especially history) of killing an innocent person in an effort to punish a criminal, we are all murderers.
Drone and other air strikes have much fewer deterrents to the trigger man psychologically. Killing a person and seeing it first hand compared to on a monitor has a completely different psychological effects on willingness to do so again with absolute confidence in action. Yes, that hesitancy may get a marines brother in arms killed (also why police are nearly encouraged to be trigger happy in some areas), but it may also prevent years of future knowledge that he killed an unarmed mother and child I'm cold blood. That has value. That's war and why we should never accept imprecise killing measures
Mortar and howitzer fire just has as much of a possibility of killing non-combatants, and the fireteams do not even see the target in detail. Maybe the answer to this is a lower-yield Hellfire variant?
That would work for some situations, but it would be nice to see improved tech steps to identify targets as well as possibly following the rules of engagement for attacks with denser civilian population. Hell if we are going to break those rules, just go for using knock out gas and and an EMP to black out the area with a team to move in and confirm
It seems, to me, the bigger problem with the asymmetric objection is that assume warfare is how warfare functions, whether by drones or soldiers on the ground. As such, nothing is given up by having asymmetric drones instead of asymmetric soldiers.
Heck, the asymmetry could potentially do the other direction. A resistance movement in an occupied country which got its hands on a drone, somehow, which employs drone warfare against the occupying force is still at the disadvantage and outgunned. It's asymmetric warfare either way.
I agree with the logic of the author's argument that drone strikes can be justified in particular situations.  That I disagree with their current use comes from the first point. 
I'm not convinced we have a morally justified goal. 
Sure, that's fair. But when people complain about drone strikes in the media, it doesn't seem that they're talking about that. Nobody ever criticized the ground invasions by talking about M16s.
I think most people have those "secondary objections" into mind when it comes to drones. People don't criticise drones for just being a 1-to-1 substitution of ground invasions, but they criticise them for those objections the article poses, like the threshold one, the framing one, etc.
This comes specially with what parthian_shot said, where the goal is not really morally justified.
For instance, if vengeful aliens from outer space started attacking us, I don't think many people would complain about using drones against them instead of deploying human soldiers. But the contexts are different
I have no problems with drones because of those reasons.  They are cost and human capital effective.  
Problem is policy on airstrikes and how targets are acquired.
It makes no difference if a traditional  pilot drops the bomb or drone pilot if the intelligence is done responsibly.   
The argument doesn't work for unjustified war, but an unjustified war with drones in the sky is still unjustified with soldiers in the war zone. The argument is that any war for which soldiers in the war zone are justified, drone warfare is justified, if not required.
As I said, I agree with the logic...
But that's not an argument against drones per se. It's an argument against war, or at least against a particular war.
Now, of course there's the old tropes about how if war isn't terrible enough, people will be too eager to engage in it. But no matter how terrible war gets, people still seem pretty damn eager for it. So it seems to me implausible that lessening the harms of war will make people much more eager to engage in it.
But that's not an argument against drones per se. It's an argument against war, or at least against a particular war.
Like I said:
I agree with the logic of the author's argument that drone strikes can be justified in particular situations.  
I disagree with their current use because I don't believe our goal (which I suspect has to do with controlling other nations' resources) is morally justified. 
Now, of course there's the old tropes about how if war isn't terrible enough, people will be too eager to engage in it. But no matter how terrible war gets, people still seem pretty damn eager for it. So it seems to me implausible that lessening the harms of war will make people much more eager to engage in it.
If the goal is morally justified then lessening harm seems absolutely reasonable.  The trick seems to be finding morally justifiable reasons to go to war.
But the article is saying if we have a morally justified goal. Your objection would be on target if they were assuming that we do have a morally justified goal. Your response is a bit of a non-sequitur since that isn't the point of the article.
You are correct that if we don't have a morally justified goal then the use of drones is immoral. But then so is the use of any military action not justified by a morally justified goal, so this has nothing to do with the ethics of drone use specifically.
Yes, the article's argument is correct and I agree with it, I guess I didn't make that clear enough.  My comment may be non-sequitur but some people might use this argument to justify how the US government uses drone strikes.
well I think you also have to ask, when we use drones instead of sending troops or pilots to pull the trigger, is there some greater value we are sacrificing? 
What exactly do you mean?  Like being removed from the killing?  I think it's all relative.  Before you had to beat someone to death with your hands or a rock.  Then knives made it much easier to kill.  Then bullets - which are very impersonal.  So I don't think drones are very different from that.
The thing that doesn't change with drones or with troops, is that the decision makers are removed from the action.  And they almost always will be.
[removed]
There is no abstract, so here's the intro instead:
It is no secret that slurs offend. Yet public figures regularly manage to embarrass themselves or worse because of their unreflective uses of these explosive words. Not long ago radio personality Dr. Laura Schlesinger got into trouble by repeatedly uttering ‘nigger’, much to the dismay of a shocked African-American caller. Even though it was clear Dr. Schlesinger did not intend to insult anyone, her callous use caused such a stir it ultimately led to her resignation from the show.
The bottom line is slurs are messy, and so, require great care in their analysis; in particular, two important features of slurs must be explained: first, why do slurs vary in offense both across groups (‘chink’ is more offensive that ‘cracker’, ‘gimp’ more than ‘suit’, and ‘bitch’ more than ‘pig’) and even for co-referring slurs (‘nigger’ is worse than either ‘coon’ or ‘darkie’). Second, how can slurs admit of nonoffensive uses within certain specially marked didactic contexts, and perhaps with quotation, but more commonly with so-called appropriated (or reclaimed) uses among in-group members?
Recent literature in the philosophy of language and linguistics divides the explanatory landscape into two broad camps: content-based and non-content-based, with the consensus being that (uses of) slurs express negative attitudes toward their targets. Content-based theorists adopt different strategies for implementing this view, but all agree that slurs (or their uses) communicate offensive content.
In this essay, we will challenge the consensus and defend a non-content-based view. According to us, slurs are prohibited not on account of offensive content they manage to get across, but rather because of relevant edicts surrounding their prohibition. We will argue that Prohibitionism, a term we coined, accounts for all the relevant data, namely, both variation in degrees of offense among slurs and their nonoffensive uses, better than the content-based competitors. We will proceed as follows: First, we will present our positive view and address specific issues that arise for it. Next, we will defend our view from objections, possible and actual. And finally, we will compare Prohibitionism with certain alternatives and show why we believe it to be superior. Before we dive in, several clarifications are in order.
why do slurs vary in offense both across groups (‘chink’ is more offensive that ‘cracker’, ‘gimp’ more than ‘suit’, and ‘bitch’ more than ‘pig’) and even for co-referring slurs (‘nigger’ is worse than either ‘coon’ or ‘darkie’)
That's easy. Look at all of those less offensive words, they all have double meanings at least, where as the offensive ones are specific. Now why does that matter? I might be tempted to say it's because by using a metaphor like cracker or pig the target at least acknowledges your attempt to tone it down which shows a tiny bit of tact. 
But I think it goes deeper as well. I think it has to do with the images these words manifest in your sub-conscious. If you call someone a darkie your subconscious might get the mental image of a dark evening instead of a colored person. But nigger (yes i'm going to say it because I'm serious here and we're trying to figure it all out right now) is a very specific word with LOTS of sub conscious baggage and there is no mistaking the sort of imagery it stirs. 
I do think humans develop group moralities as defense and evolution mechanisms, lot's of us and especially those of us who are colored are going to want to avoid any images or references to slavery so casually. Ideally we want to abolish the entire idea from our sub conscious and conscious minds as a species. 
The slang version I think has successfully been recuperated into black American culture and evokes a more neutral and passive imagery although it is highly distasteful for a white person to use it because of prior context and the fact that whites weren't the ones to "liberate" that word so to speak. 
I want to underscore that the comment section is for discussion of the article, and not for general remarks on offense, political correctness, and the like.
I suspect my comment (below) risks being in violation of this.  I did not comment specifically on the article, and I was in fact trying to address a provocative issue, though (hopefully) in a non-provocative way.  
A few related objections:
Overgeneration objection
Anderson and Lepore's account, as it stands in this paper, seems to overgenerate on offensive slurs.
In general, violating a prohibition doesn't always result in an offensive action. For example, stepping on a lawn with a sign forbidding it isn't necessarily offensive (perhaps stepping on it was accidental). Even if it were intentional, it's not clear that doing so would communicate offense, as opposed to something like callousness or rebelliousness. Futher, in extreme cases, like a Prohibition-era smuggler delivering alcohol to a poor hospital for surgical use, there's not a clear case of offense either.
In the case of language, using a prohibited word isn't always offensive. We don't find offensive a machine combining random characters and spelling out "nigger" by chance. Nor do we find offensive an actor reading off the lines of Huck Finn.
Being charitable, I imagine this account isn't fully fleshed out, and Anderson and Lepore will want to say something else on top of prohibition to deal with this overgeneration problem. I imagine what they'll say will be something pragmatic, like:
It's common knowledge a slur S is prohibited (for inappropriate institutional use, inappropriate introduction, whatever story you want to tell). When I use S offensively, I violate the prohibition. I intend to violate the prohibition. My audience becomes aware I violated the prohibition. I intend my audience to become aware that I violated the prohibition. And my audience becomes aware of my intent that they become aware of my violation, and so on.
Embedding and reporting objection
Anderson and Lepore consider it a virtue that their account captures the offense that comes with reporting or quoting a prohibited slur. Unrelatedly, they object that other accounts don't capture the different levels of offense with coreferential slurs (i.e. "nigger" vs. "coon").
The latter objection applies just as well to the analysis of the former. That is, on Anderson and Lepore's account, if I said "Mary used the word 'nigger' to refer to Tom", I would be saying something just as offensive as if I said "Tom is a nigger". But this is plainly counterintuitive.
A more fleshed out prohibitionist/pragmatic account will have a lot more to say here. For example, the former is less offensive than the latter because, in the reporting and quotational case, I don't intend to make the audience aware of my violation. Rather, I intend make the audience aware of Mary's violation.
Undergeneration objection/Eliminativism?
If Anderson and Lepore need to flesh out the prohibition account by importing some pragmatic machinery, then we might wonder what work prohibition is doing at all.
After all, a slur is prohibited for a reason, so why do we even need the notion of prohibition to explain offense? Why not just make direct mention of the reason for prohibition itself and then use the pragmatic machinery to explain the offense?
We can motivate this line of thinking by observing that, as Anderson and Lepore admit, calling a rich white person a "wasp" is less offensive than calling a poor black person a "nigger", even though both are prohibited slurs. However the prohibitionist account described in the paper analyzes these to be equally offensive and undergenerate here.
But if they simply use their pragmatic analysis on top of the reason for prohibition, then they could explain the difference in levels of offense. Maybe "wasp" is prohibited because it was inappropriately introduced by newspapers in yellow journalism. But "nigger" is prohibited not just because of inappropriate introduction, but because of the historical and institutional ties to slavery, persecution, and racism it connotes.
In this case, even though both are prohibited, it's clear that my intent to violate the prohibition in the latter case is far more offensive than my intent to violate prohibition in the former case.
Because prohibition both undergenerates and overgenerates, we need to use pragmatic machinery and the normative reasons for prohibition to correct these problems. But in so doing, the notion of prohibition is no longer doing any work in our analysis.
But "nigger" is prohibited not just because of inappropriate introduction, but because of the historical and institutional ties to slavery, persecution, and racism it connotes.
This is such an important point, it's difficult to understand how it can be readily discounted or ignored.  I don't think it necessarily condones prohibition of slurs though--discourse about the context of slurs probably accomplishes much more than their prohibition.  
How do you feel/what are your thoughts about slurs across cultures and international lines. For instance, the common place slur for white people in Asia is usually "white ghost" "pale devil" or things that legitimately link skin tone to negative connotations- no beating around the bush, no questions like "oh where did the term 'wetback' come from". Just pure, to the point, skin based discrimination. Same could be asked about certain words and the weight they carry as slurs across borders. The prime example of which is the word 'cunt'. where in most of the English speaking world this word is offensive, it carries a lighter almost joking feel to it compared to the heads spinning and exploding should you say the same word in the states 
[removed]
This link doesn't work so I can't see what their methodology was.
I'm not sure how many feel like I do, but given the social context of the words, "darkie" and "coon ," to me they are much more chilling.
Also, "pig" is more impactful. Perhaps because it's not a swear word? It seems to remark on character more than appearance, unlike "bitch," which is so ubiquitously misogynistic, it means very little. It's use says more about the user of the term than the subject of the characterization.
It's use says more about the user of the term than the subject of the characterization.
This is true of most slurs tied to identity. Only, I'd go farther and say that their use imparts information only about the user of the term.
Tom is gay
Tom is homosexual
Tom is a faggot
In all three cases the information we're being given about Tom stays the same. What changes is what we know, or think we know, about the person uttering the statement. The first one sounds neutral, the second archaic and perhaps a bit uncomfortable with homosexuality, and the third a hateful bigot. The same would be true if we used "black", "colored" and "nigger" instead. Or pretty much any other set of racial indicators.
What's missing from this discussion is something about the  unhelpful emotive/cognitive distortions that might come into play when we are subject to slurs. The paper's title deliberately taunts us with the provocation "what did you call me?", but the paper does not seem to actually consider the psychological experience of feeling slighted, and some of the other questions that seems to naturally arise in the minds of the receivers, such as "how dare you?" or "who do you think you are?".  If the article pursued such questions as a part of its inquiry into what we ought to do about slurs it would have been helpful.  In the interest of fairness, it's usually useful to pursue such questions at least in a preliminary way.  If a teacher or a parent or someone else in authority is slurred by a student or a child, it's often useful for that authority figure to reflect upon whatever initial emotive/cognitive response they might initially suffer in response to the slur, before acting on it in any way.  Wise parents and teachers are often not quick to actually be insulted in response to a slur.  Their experience (with some help perhaps from Seneca) prompts them to temper their reactions and to question whether or not a legitimate slight has actually occurred.  Anyone who has spent much time on anonymous online forums usually finds that such a reflective strategy can have broad applicability.  
edit: Someone responded with an important point that I wanted to responded to, but they deleted the comment for whatever reason.  So let me just add that I disagree with the idea that all insults can or should just be "laughed off."   Speaking personally, in some instances of being insulted, i.e., when the insult had some merit, the measure of shame I have experienced (rather than laughed away) has actually been beneficial to me.  Racial or gender slurs are a different matter.  They can be very hurtful and demeaning depending upon the extent to which one is living in a culture where racial or gender prejudice has an impact upon the quality of one's life.
I love Slavoj as much as the next guy, but this is typical of him: state a big theme and then immediately forget about it. " The Event" and then blah blah blah and so on and so worth, and then " Oh yes, The Event!"
I think the idea is to embody precisely the 'messy contingent stuff, messy contingent stuff, EVENT [epiphany which brings out a pattern in the contingent stuff]' he's talking about here.
From what I have read, this is very similar to the way Hegel used to lecture. Whatever you think of it, I believe it is intended to be a feature, rather than a bug.
Just like his books. Great premise but could use an editor to make it more concise.
Couldn't agree more. I bet Verso intentionally keeps editors away from him so he can keep writing 600 page books every year uninterrupted.
I bet Verso intentionally keeps editors away from him so he can keep writing 600 page books every year uninterrupted.
But why would Verso want to do that? Wouldn't it be in their best interest if Slavoj books were shorter and easier to understand and thus more accessible to a bigger audience?
There's a quote of Kafka (I think) that actually makes the same point. Something along the lines of: Sure, you can say I was influenced by ___ and ___ but you can only say this because you can weave a line of influence back from me. But you'd never have seen those ideas or structures in their writing without me.  
Does anyone recall the quote?
I personally don't think Zizek needs an editor. I like those leaps of his and I'm not type of person who puts much stock in having a "main idea". Wittgenstein showed that there is no true way to engage in philosophy other than following your philosophical ideas to their full. I think Zizek's contingencies are his strengths, revolving around the main idea without fully getting to it.
Exactly. While he takes a lot of flak for being repetitive and not explaining his points crystal clear in many cases, I feel all of his theories are consistent enough that it's important to meander through them to understand his final point in context.
It's sort of like taking a scenic train ride, you know your destination but it's what you on the way that is why you take it.
Sorry if this reply is annoyingly late.
Ha it's fine. I agree!
Where did Wittgenstein show that or can you expand?
Ok, this is where it gets a bit fuzzy and he might have been a wrong example. On one level Wittgenstein thought philosophy only had one end, but that end was of great importance. In Tractatus, he used mathematics to break down language to its simplest form and then by the end, told the reader to cast off the methods he outlined to get at the true nature of reality. Badiou calls it "Sense" over everything, which I would say is akin to the epiphanic, transcendent sensation of great poetry. Badiou calls certain philosophers anti-philosophers like Neitzche, Rousseau, Descartes, Wittgenstein. Wittgenstein propelled "Sense" above all. Neitzche believed that it was the individual will to counter nihilism. To Neitzche, that was the importance of philosophy since it will have differing individuals who are never going to agree on anything.  Wittgenstein lived his philosophy, was obsessed with both moral and ethical perfection along with perfection in philosophy. Neitzche and Wittgenstein were very concerned with how to live and followed a methodology to their philosophy.
Zizek is by no means an antiphilosopher. But his ideas aren't always clear and often his contingencies are the substance to his work. It doesn't seem like he is going to abandon his method anytime soon. Since the methodology and not an opaque and graspable idea are important to Zizek, it is related to that attempt of a methodology that contains substance, method and language containing "perfection in itself." 
Yeah, I apologize, Wittgenstein was not the best example but that's how it is related. 
I should make the point that this notion of Event is originally from Deleuze and he takes it from Bergson. So ironically we can claim retroactively this video is The Event that generates the predecessor of processual retro-causation.
The Borges essay this is from is called Kafka and his Precursors
Not a /r/philosophy reg, but saw this on /all and recognized Zizek as the guy that plagiarized from 'American Renaissance'.  Do people not take a hit for that kind of thing these days?
I think he apologized and everyone forgot... lol
I think you're confusing happiness and my happiness.  Someone could argue that we don't take your pill because doing so would not maximize aggregate happiness, in which case it's still happiness that is the ultimate end.  And utilitarians do construe the ultimate end as happiness (or "pleasure") rather than as my happiness.
Also, a minor point: there is some conflation of moral judgments and behavior here.  To make it clearer, you might want to say not "Would you take the red pill?" but "Would you regard taking the red pill as the moral choice?" or something like this.
I think you're confusing happiness and my happiness. Someone could argue that we don't take your pill because doing so would not maximize aggregate happiness, in which case it's still happiness that is the ultimate end. And utilitarians do construe the ultimate end as happiness (or "pleasure") rather than as my happiness.
I was referring to "my happiness", but I get your point regarding a utilitarian's single ultimate end.  But what about those of us who are not utilitarians?
Also, a minor point: there is some conflation of moral judgments and behavior here. To make it clearer, you might want to say not "Would you take the red pill?" but "Would you regard taking the red pill as the moral choice?" or something like this.
I intentionally kept moral vocabulary out of the OP because I am a moral nihilist.
But what about those of us who are not utilitarians?
Sorry, I'm not really sure why you're asking this.  I assume your point was to object to positions which take something like happiness to be our ultimate end, and utilitarianism is the paradigmatic case of this kind of position.
I intentionally left moral vocabulary out of the OP because I am a moral nihilist.
If you're not asking about moral reasoning here, I don't really know what you're asking about.  If it's just a question of how in fact people behave, there probably isn't any such thing as ultimate aims, but in any case this is a question for psychology rather than philosophy.
I don't think you can move anywhere near that fast in throwing out the idea of non-moral individual good as of philosophical interest. Plenty of modern and influential philosophers do begin with such a concept and it isn't intended to be purely descriptive (if it was you might be right in saying that it should be left to psychology). I have already cited one in this thread Peter Railton who is a naturalist. I think you could plausibly argue that some non-cogs are also of the view that good for an agent makes sense. Then there are all the neo aristotelians and of course relativists and contextualists. 
But he's told us he only has in mind the descriptive question about motivations, and that he's deliberately avoided normative terms because that's not what he's asking about.  This isn't throwing out norms, it's just following him to what he says he's saying.
The op hasn't clarified their stance on normativty only 'moral terms'. I think their discussion of ends makes a lot more sense when read as a discussion of normative concepts. 
They did clarify their stance, explaining that it was people's actual motivations that they were interested in--and they agreed that this was probably a scientific rather than philosophical question.  I don't know how to contort this clarification in a way that makes it mean anything like that they're talking about norms, just aesthetic or epistemic or prudential ones rather than moral ones-or something like this, without doing it untenable violence.
The closesest I can find to the clarification you describe is just below where danhors talks about 'ultimate motivational considerations'. Now obviously that isn't a standard philisophical phrase but I find it pretty easy to read it as a normative term and pretty dificult to read as a descriptive one.   
Read normativly 'ultimate motivational considerations' could mean something like what they ought to be motivated by.  
Ought can't be read morally of course (given danhors stipulations) but could be read as something like 'in order to best serve their own intrests' or whatever.   
This then opens up the door to discussions of headonism and the whole host of interesting theories on wellbeing and/or individual good. This seems like far less violence to me than simply calling the stance incoherent, uninteligable or beyond the perview of philosophy.
Now obviously that isn't a standard philisophical phrase but I find it pretty easy to read it as a normative term and pretty dificult to read as a descriptive one.
I find it difficult to understand how you could reasonably find it difficult to read someone clarifying that they're referring to motivation rather than morality, and agreeing that this may be a scientific rather than philosophical question, as talking about any descriptive issues.  So I'm not really sure where else to go with this.
Read normativly 'ultimate motivational considerations' could mean something like what they ought to be motivated by.
But it's not naturally read this way, and the writer's only comment on normative issues has been to disavow that that's what he's talking about.
This seems like far less violence to me than simply calling the stance incoherent, uninteligable or beyond the perview of philosophy.
Nothing in taking him not to be discussing normative issues implies that what he's saying is incoherent or unintelligible, and there's nothing uncharitable about taking something to be more properly a scientific than a philosophical question--and it's all the more curious to characterize this as uncharitable given that the OP agreed with this characterization.
I feel like I'm just repeating my original points here, so I don't really see where else this can productively go.
If you're not asking about moral reasoning here, I don't really know what you're asking about. 
I am asking about ultimate motivational considerations (which is what I mean by "ultimate ends").  Such considerations need not imply the existence of moral facts.
If it's just a question of how in fact people behave, there probably isn't any such thing as ultimate aims, but in any case this is a question for psychology rather than philosophy.
We indeed could have ultimate motivational considerations hard-wired into us (as a result of evolutionary processes), but you make a good point that this may be more of a question for psychology than philosophy.  Thanks.
I am asking about ultimate motivational considerations (which is what I mean by "ultimate ends"). 
Sure, but there probably isn't any such thing, and in any case it's a question for psychology.
but there probably isn't any such thing
Why wouldn't self-interest and concern for others qualify as ultimate motivational considerations?  Both have plausible evolutionary explanations.
Why wouldn't self-interest and concern for others qualify as ultimate motivational considerations? 
You mean why would we think they aren't in fact the motivations behind everything we do?  Because we do things that don't seem to be motivated by them.
Both have plausible evolutionary explanations.
There are plausible evolutionary accounts of why we would have these motivations, but there aren't plausible evolutionary accounts of there being a single motivation (or two) as the basis for everything we ever do.
You mean why would we think they aren't in fact the motivations behind everything we do?
No, I mean why wouldn't they qualify as ultimate motivational considerations, regardless of whether there are additional such considerations?
Because we do things that don't seem to be motivated by them.
Such as?
There are plausible evolutionary accounts of why we would have these motivations, but there aren't plausible evolutionary accounts of there being a single motivation (or two) as the basis for everything we ever do.
Then what would be examples of other plausible ultimate motivational considerations?
I mean why wouldn't they qualify as ultimate motivational considerations, regardless of whether there are additional such considerations?
Because if there are other such considerations, it's contradictory for it to be an ultimate end.  An end is ultimate when it's the end of everything we do.  An end which we sometimes have, although we sometimes have other ends instead, isn't an ultimate end, it's just an end.
Such as?
Kicking a stone, substituting dominant sevenths for the dominant, half the things we do on the internet...
Then what would be examples of other plausible ultimate motivational considerations?
There probably isn't any such thing.
Because if there are other such considerations, it's contradictory for it to be an ultimate end.
Why can there not be more than one ultimate motivational consideration?  There could be two ultimate motivational considerations--self-interest and concern for others--that could sometimes conflict.  In cases of conflict, one would simply choose the action that most motivates.
An end is ultimate when it's the end of everything we do.
When I say an end is ultimate, I mean that it has no further end underlying it.  There can be more than one ultimate end.
Kicking a stone
Could be done for amusement--that is, self-interest.
substituting dominant sevenths for the dominant
What does that mean?
half the things we do on the internet...
Such as?
There probably isn't any such thing.
As already discussed, there are plausible evolutionary explanations for self-interest and concern for others as ultimate motivational considerations.
Nihilist? Why? I understand that morality is all just man made and non existent, but morality itself tends to address a much larger picture than just human behavior. There is no such thing as I. Not trying to force a religion and belief, but people need some mutual ground and understanding that no one thing can come into existence without the other. Everything we are today is due to what we have evoked from the pasts and present.
Nihilism as an observer rather than a participant? I never really grasped the concept.
If you are a moral nihilist, then you likely would think that as long as you are happy and dont know of others' suffering, it wouldnt matter to you, and you would take the pill. 
But there are a variety of other perspectives that would have different implications. As was said, a utilitarian would maximize pleasure by not taking the pill, and in doing so, not cause suffering to the majority of humanity. 
A virtue ethicist would likely feel that causing suffering to others at one's own gain is not a virtuous trait.
A moral relativist could say what's the other option? A blue pill that makes everyone, yourself included, dull and indifferent, nearly like moodless zombies? That could be worse because it would mean all happiness in the universe is eradicated. Maybe selfish to have you be the one to have the red pill, but an empty monotonous universe could sound worse relatively. Im not familiar with the source of the red pill blue pill question so i dont know what either pill does in the original, but thats just an example i thought of. 
Someone with strong emotional ties could simply refuse the pill because in the current moment, they are aware of the consequences and that people will suffer. After you take the pill, you wont be aware, but before taking the pill, their decision making is based on their moral theory, and they would not make the decision to take it. 
Other people who havent put much thought into their moral status may be overwhelmed by the question and flip a coin, or mentally make a spontaneous and impulsive decision to minimize the stress of thinking about such a tough question. 
Others may believe they have enough will power to remember that others are suffering after taking the pill, and try to help them be happy. Infinite happiness for yourself, average happiness for everyone else with your effort. They are mistaken, as the pill (so I would assume) is 100% effective since it's made of magic hypothetical stuff, but that's human nature to affect a decision based on estimating personal abilities and previous experience with drugs. 
Someone else may go the opposite way for the same thought. They may not trust that it will fully erase their memory of everyone else's suffering, and be nervous that theyd be thinking about it and regretting their decision, thus fucking up their perfect happiness too, making the whole thing a waste. 
I think you're confusing happiness and my happiness. Someone could argue that we don't take your pill because doing so would not maximize aggregate happiness, in which case it's still happiness that is the ultimate end. And utilitarians do construe the ultimate end as happiness (or "pleasure") rather than as my happiness.
While that is true, it's trivial to rewrite the thought-experiment so as to demonstrate the same point some other way.  He's basically rediscovering Moore.
The difficulty here is that the point referred to be your expression "same point" is rather obscure.  The OP looks mostly like a response to utilitarianism, though on discussion it turns out this isn't what was intended.
It seems what was intended was to maintain that people are motivated by concern for others, and beyond merely how concern for others is instrumental to self-interest.  I do think we can argue this case, I just think it's pretty far removed from the concerns about utilitarianism which seem at first blush to be at stake here.
I don't think your thought experiment is fair.
Seeing my friends and family be miserable would obviously not make me happy. You think you've side-stepped this issue with your third clause, but I don't think you have.
You're asking me before I've taken the pill if I would take the pill.
Former-me doesn't want to take the pill because I know the suffering it would cause, but post-pill-me would be oblivious to this fact. I'd probably say I was 100% satisfied with my decision after having taken the pill (how could I not -- I know not of suffering?).
And no, I can't think of any other ultimate end. Sex, procreation, pride, satisfaction, ending suffering and all of that stuff serves to boost my happiness in some way, if you really want to boil it down to a single point.
And no, I can't think of any other ultimate end. Sex, procreation, pride, satisfaction, ending suffering and all of that stuff serves to boost my happiness in some way, if you really want to boil it down to a single point.
This is interesting.  What if happiness is the by-product of activities that help us achieve evolutionary and social ends? Over millennia we have could have evolved to get satisfaction out of the actions that ensure the advancement and sustainability of our species.  Therefore happiness might not be the ultimate end, but pursuit of happiness could lead us to achieving these ends.
I take it back.
I have thought about this before. "Survival" is the ultimate end, not happiness.
Survival is the ultimate end, because we wouldn't exist without the desire and ability to survive. We evolved to survive. Same is true of plants and all living things. Every action can be tied back to survival somehow.
Every action can be tied back to survival somehow.
Only in so far as every action is the result of a mind that is the product of evolution and so thinks in ways conducive to survival and reproduction within a certain habitat. There is a difference between the purposes for which human minds developed and the purposes those minds aim at. Take a look at some of your examples:
Most sex humans have probably is not for the purpose of reproduction, we use technology specifically to reduce the chance of reproduction.
It doesn't help surival to care about anyone who isn't useful to you. Yet we care about lions on the other side of the world.
But beyond that, we just arn't thinking about survival when we do half these things. So sure, from an evolutionary perspective our purpose is to survive and reproduce, but apparently the best way to do that is to create a creature with a diverse set of ends rather than any one goal.
I think we're so far evolved that surviving day-to-day just isn't much of a concern for us anymore, which frees our minds to do other things.
However, when the going gets tough, I think we'd be right back at square one.
People use protection to stop reproduction because they know they'll be in a bad situation if they can't adequately care for this child. But when they get to be about 30 years old their primal urges start to kick in and they desperately do want children. This might not apply to everyone, but it's quite common.
Former-me doesn't want to take the pill because I know the suffering it would cause
Then you agree that your happiness is not the only ultimate end.  This indicates that the thought experiment succeeds.
Doesn't his point invalidate the purpose of the third clause?
I am less happy now if I know my family suffers, but in the future I will be more happy since I am ignorant. This is trying to get me to compare happiness at different points in time and rate my future happiness as more valuable than my present happiness. But this doesn't seem right. Would you accept torture and misery now, for vastly increased happiness in the future? What about torture and misery for most of your life for 5 minutes of infinite happiness right before your death?
The red pill has a name.  In the US we call it heroine.  Except for about a million heroine addicts it is generally agreed not to be an acceptable moral framework.
Heroin is not a one-way ticket to happiness any more than most other drugs of abuse or even something like extreme thrill-seeking, junk food, wealth accumulation, etc.  Being high on heroin might numb emotional pain to an extent, but it won't make a mistake person "happy" in the way that I think we're using the word here.
As far as the negative effects on people around the user, most of that has to do with the types of behaviors that users become willing to engage in after real physical dependence sets in.  If heroin addiction didn't carry the social stigma that it does and didn't become so expensive (financially and time-wise) once the user develops a tolerance, the negative effects on others wouldn't be noticed any more than drinkers who needs a pint of vodka to get to sleep at night.  
Heroin isn't a one way ticket to happiness? That's literally exactly what it is. It causes your brain to go into hormone overload and dump happiness in massive amounts.
Yes, temporarily. Then you acquire tolerance and dependency etc.
In an attempt to answer your second question I posit this: Choice. I think it fits better than happiness. Emotions are guides, whereas choice is the driver.
Your thought experiment is not very different to Robert Nozick's experience machine 
I would recommend you explore the responses that Hedonists have offered to that. In particular this.
I think the idea of an ultimate end is inherently flawed. 
Why?
Because it's an arbitrary fantasy we tell ourselves to pretend there's some purpose to the coincidentally derived biologically driven impulses we have -- that what we do, how we behave, the morals we derive, the philosophical topics we debate -- that it all has some concrete or absolute, some non-arbitrary reason. This is something that's been a problem in philosophy for a while (not to discount the philosophical works, but the influence of the ego and psychological biases has created too much emphasis on our importance).
Further, it attempts to generalize something that will ultimately be too general to have any significant meaning or consistent result. It's a fool's philosophical game. 
Look at happiness and how general that term has to be in order to even say anything about it. We can't rely on biological underpinnings, so it needs to be something more abstracted. What then happens when everyone's goal is their happiness which ultimately conflicts with others' happiness like your thought experiment points out? It's quite trivial to construct situations wherein we're forced to accept morally reprehensible actions because it justifies an individual's ultimate end. What about a collective ultimate end? That's as problematic for similar reasons -- we must give up ethical behavior towards an individual for the benefit of the whole. Does the needs of the many outweigh the needs of the few, etc. etc. 
Well, what makes some other "ultimate end" any different than happiness? Nothing. There is not one that exists that isn't logically problematic in consistency.
When most classical schools of philosophy speak of happiness as the ultimate end, they use 'happiness' in a very specific sense, more like 'fulfillment' than 'pleasure', and 'fulfillment' implies certain conditions of fulfillment. Very few would say that personal pleasure is the highest end, but many people would say that "happiness" as an all-things-considered overview of life is. I think your thought experiment relies on a very narrow conception of happiness-as-pleasure, which is not how it's generally thought of among the ancients (who are prone to using the term "ultimate end" or "telos") or even most people today.
Great questions--love the thought experiment! Thanks, but no thanks on the red pill.
I wonder though, about the notion of an "ultimate end." There are so many kinds of ends we pursue, and the idea that some of them are "for themselves" and others are pursued to reach different ends is an idea that makes a certain amount of sense in abstract epistemology and in certain paradigmatic real-life situations. But when we view ourselves as animals, as primates with nervous systems tuned by the forces of evolution to seek food, shelter, sex, companionship, knowledge, territory, anxiety-relief, and so forth, the distinction between "ultimate ends" and other kinds of ends gets pretty slippery. From this perspective, it looks more like drives of varying strength competing for our attention. So of course we need more than happiness. 
And more than just everybody's happiness, to boot. People also need gratitude, wonder, sustenance, love, work, achievement, and a lot more. If we put them all together we get, what? Thriving? The thriving of all conscious creatures? Is there more than that?
Thanks for reading and providing an interesting perspective, GeoffChilders.  In case you are wondering why I am interested in these questions, see page 5 of the document linked here.  I am the author of that document.
I briefly looked over your document--I don't have time to read it thoroughly now--but it's nicely put together, and on many issues, I'm more or less on the same page. One possible difference in perspective is that I've been gravitating more and more away from the project of trying to find a set of "isms" by which to live my life. 
Ideologies steer our process of tuning-in and tuning-out information--they provide "correct answers" to our questions such that we "know" what to make of a wide variety of evidence without really having to look at it. And that can be dangerous because it encourages us to dismiss anything that does not fit in the box that the ideology provides (confirmation bias). This often results in a simplified view of the world where everything "messy" gets swept under the rug. Moreover, the quest for truth and understanding gets supplanted by the quest to find increasingly clever arguments for and against a variety of "isms." When ideological thinking thoroughly infests our brains, it almost begins to look like we exist to serve the ideologies rather than the other way around. Trying to get through to anyone who is 100% committed to an ideology is virtually impossible. For that reason, I like that you say "While I am comfortable with my positions, I am not certain of any of them." The more certain we are, the more our thinking becomes constipated. 
Thanks for taking a look, Geoff.  Regarding "isms", please note that I take positions in only a few areas, and that almost all of my positions are qualified in some way.  Should you read the document more thoroughly at a later time, please feel free to provide additional feedback.  Also, if you have written anything on the intersection of philosophy and life, please do share!
Isn't what you describe kin to 'the point' of having scientific models? (Not trying to contest your view, just personally curious for your input)
As far as utilitarianism is concerned, the fact that most people don't want others to be miserable is perfectly acceptable. Utilitarianism doesn't assert that people only care about their own well being, it asserts that only well being is intrinsically valuable. 
Please see my response to wokeupabug.
The only happiness-focused consequentialists who might have a significantly different answer would be egoists, and their responses might vary. They might say that you are perfect liberty to choose whichever one you want, or they might give some account about how it's irrational for anyone to choose not to take the pill (e.g. people's intuitions about this are just a result of indoctrination by society, so they don't mean anything, etc). But I'm just speculating.
Also, whether or not you are a nihilist, using the right vocabulary is important if you want to engage with the relevant ideas. Otherwise it's difficult to be sure what kind of argument you are making.
Also, whether or not you are a nihilist, using the right vocabulary is important if you want to engage with the relevant ideas.
Where have I not used the right vocabulary?
By not making the proper distinction between moral judgements and behavioral questions, which is important for clarifying what your argument is.
You did not answer my question.  Where, specifically, have I not used the right vocabulary?
By "using the right vocabulary", I meant no more and no less than to echo exactly what wokeupabug meant when he said,
there is some conflation of moral judgments and behavior here. To make it clearer, you might want to say not "Would you take the red pill?" but "Would you regard taking the red pill as the moral choice?" or something like this.
You have failed to point out any instance of my not using the right vocabulary.  
I don't understand what you're after. I have made my point as clear as I can. If you were offended by my phrasing, I'm sorry.
Yeah, I'm not seeing it either. If someone wants to make a distinction between what they would actually do and what they think is the moral thing to do, I'm not sure why they couldn't simply include that point in their response without berating you for phrasing a question differently than they might have. 
Name one animal on earth whose primary motivating force is happiness?
The beatudinous centric theory will probably out last the mole people who live at the center of our hollow earth.
It seems to me the ultimate end that my being allows is to experience all time, and to discover experiences beyond imagination.
Dolphins seem pretty jovial. 
as for the second question:
The ultimate end is survival / procreation. Your brain makes you happy (releases happiness), when it senses you're moving in that direction. Sex, Food, Power, etc... Everything is easily reduced to this primal urge imo. Happiness isn't the goal, it's the carrot that pulls you towards it.
Then why do people have sex while using birth control?
What about people who don't want to have children at all?
By the way, I'm not doubting evolution - only your interpretation of it.
The biological machine doesn't reward the actual result (birthing a kid) but the direction along the way (being healthy, ...). So you can fool it with a condom. Really this shows that what you're after is that dopamine.
When something is wrong with the dopamine release system you become suicidal even though from a logical point of view it never make sense to commit suicide (it decreases you chances for survival / procreation).
And not everyone works the exact same way: some people will get more gratification from power or sex; others get their kicks from eating.
Ok, sure.
I think perhaps we disagree on what counts as "ultimate end".
I agree that the evolutionary reason for all drives is survival, procreation, etc - anything that increases the frequency of the genes we carry in the population.
However, the drives we have don't actually care about whether our actions increase our evolutionary fitness. That's not how drives work. We don't have a part of our brain which asks us "What, is this really what evolution intended with sex?" - we have sex for own reasons, and screw what evolution intended.
So I wouldn't call the evolutionary origins of our drives "the ultimate ends".
I agree that the evolutionary reason for all drives is survival, procreation, etc - anything that increases the frequency of the genes we carry in the population.
Actually some of them could be "spandrels", mutations that tagged along with stuff that helped survival and weren't harmful enough to be selected against.
The ultimate end is survival / procreation.
Then why, for example, would I want to listen to pleasant music?  The music makes me happy, but does not help me to survive or procreate.
We might like music itself because deep down we're hardwired to seek out information about the world, and one of the ways we get this information is through sound. So listening and hearing non-threatening sounds feels good. I don't know, I haven't really thought about it much (even though I make music myself). I think a lot of music also has to do with evoking emotions, another way we can fool the machine.
Ultimately, the things around you will be those who survive and procreate, because those that do not will quickly cease to be. Music doesn't help you survive or procreate, but the brain reacts like it does. There's an /r/frisson subreddit where people share videos which evoke massive releases of dopamine.
edited to add: there's a link on that sub right now to https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sxo0OJkbaMY The Great Gig in the Sky (Live performance by The Australian Pink Floyd Show.), one of the comments on the video is: Kaylasa JaguarStar: 4 months ago
The music + the vocals = me having an orgasm right now.
49
Thanks for the links.
So listening and hearing non-threatening sounds feels good.
So does listening to threatening sounds.
very true !! I'm personally a fan of complex percussion https://youtu.be/AAxm60KLhmk?t=1353 
(the entire album fits the "why does this spooky music make me feel good" bill)
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Evolutionary_musicology
"One part of the adaptive function question is whether music constitutes an evolutionary adaptation or exaptation (i.e. by-product of evolution). Steven Pinker, in his book How the Mind Works, for example, argues that music is merely "auditory cheesecake" - it was evolutionarily adaptive to have a preference for fat and sugar but cheesecake did not play a role in that selection process.
Adaptation, on the other hand, is highlighted in hypotheses such as the one by Edward Hagen and Gregory Bryant which posits that human music evolved from animal territorial signals, eventually becoming a method of signaling a group's social cohesion to other groups for the purposes of making beneficial multi-group alliances."
"Jordania suggested that for humans, as for many social animals, silence can be a sign of danger, and that's why gentle humming and musical sounds relax humans (see the use of gentle music in music therapy, lullabies)"
Evolution is the origin of the reason why we listen to music, not the end.
So what are the ultimate ends of listening to music? I would say enjoyment, relaxation, social participation and belonging, status, learning, and probably some more I can't think of right now.
So what are the ultimate ends of listening to music? I would say enjoyment, relaxation, social participation and belonging, status, learning, and probably some more I can't think of right now.
Which all boil down to happiness.
Sure, they are all related to happiness.
They could still be our terminal values (things that we do for their own sake and not just for the sake of achieving something else).
Ultimately the scenario you have setup here is unclear on many issues. So I can't answer your questions. For example the pill will make you happy for the rest of your life. Do you mean it magically keeps away people with a counter pill that would bring sorrow? Could you die one second later by pure chance? While the rest of your friends and family live long terrible lives? This is only the beginning of a long list of unclear shit about this scenario.
(2) Can you think of other plausible ultimate ends in addition to happiness and concern for other sentient beings?
Survival, health, friendship, social status, love, joy, aesthetic pleasure, curiosity, and much more.
From the biological perspective there's is no absolute maximum of happiness, only higher levels of dopamine.
On a mental perspective, there IS such thing as maximum satisfaction/fulfillment, however it is based on what you THINK is needed in order to achieve such an absolution.
In your offer you tell us at point 2 that it will make our family and friends miserable and in point 3 that we won't notice? I think that is the main issue here, because you already know that your family/friends will be miserable so point 3 has no effect. 
I think the idea is that the pill will somehow get rid of that knowledge that we would possess before taking it. 
But I agree that to know that you would be bringing misery upon those around you and to still take the pill does not qualify as a means of achieving "true" happiness. In my mind, it would be closer to the euphoria or joy that can be reached by the abuse of recreational substances or the like, not true, pure happiness.
I think a lot of what I want to say has already been said
But still, in my opinion, being put in the position to make this decision would be difficult. You've outlined in your third clause that I would be blissfully unaware to the sufferings of those around me.
However, in the moment of making that decision, I believe it would be quite amoral to go ahead with the pill, in possession of the knowledge that it would bring misery to those around me; regardless of whether or not I am aware of it after having consumed the pill.
And as for your questions, there are many different definitions of happiness, and I'm sure everyone has their ideals of what happiness is (or should be). For me, personally, happiness encompasses harmony and joy between me and those around me, not solely for myself alone.
Of course, if I were to take the pill, I would be unaware of the misery present in those around me, and therefore happy, by my own definition.
So, I would argue that yes, happiness can be the ultimate end for certain individuals, but the pill described here would not provide happiness, at least for my aware, post-pill self.
And no, I cannot think of any other ultimate ends.
You're could be making a moral judgement by not taking the red pill. A moral judgement is one made in order to sustain happiness for yourself in the long run. You want to live in a world where other people would not condemn you to be miserable. So you choose not to condemn people to be miserable.
Ha, the matrix is/was a simple idea for the masses.  Interesting for a brief period then annoying at conclusion.  The mirror opposite of fight club, initially attracting the mindless (whom still remain clueless) post conclusion providing a compelling idea to those with intellect.
Regarding the pill, absurd.  Happiness is being assured all is harmonious.  Being well living well is a shared experience.  Ignorance may be blissfull for the stupid, f it who cares.  Take both pills and od. 
I concur with your thoughts on Fight Club. Interesting how the author has tried to rectify the response of its popularity. 
I wouldnt take the red pill, but only because I see no reason to distinguish between the value of my and someone elses happiness and suffering. The thought experiment is directed at egoistic hedonists only, so no it doesnt succeed.  
To your second question, I'm not 100% hedonist, I do hold that happiness and the absence of suffering are by far the most important values but there are also some comparatively minor goods like empathy, friendship, understanding and excellence. What my value system lacks completely is justice, since I believe that there is no incompatibilist free will
I very much agree with your point. I don't think any sort of emotional state of being is what we need to strive for. It's fickle and lazy. Something else that may take its place that may or may not solve your presented issue: pure accessibility and efficiency of Will. If you can do what you want in a very tactile and swift manner, as well as support others in getting what they want/need moment by moment, efficiently and completely, then I think personal happiness as well as collective happiness can be a by-product of that; and people also will enjoy your presence more, and may even see it as "divine" (for lack of a better word). You can do what you want for yourself [fulfilling your dreams], as well as empathetically do what you want for others [aiding in fulfilling their dreams]. People want to be around that kind of loving person and it commands respect. You also start seeing yourself in an extremely loving manner. That, to me, is success and the "happiness" others are may be describing. 
Happiness and sadness goes hand in hand. I would argue that you can never really experience true happiness and joy unless you undergo a great suffering and sacrifice.
A rational person would choose to take the pill (because a person's own happiness is, indeed, their ultimate end).
That most people would not take the pill does not mean happiness is not the ultimate end. It means that most people have not rationally identified their ultimate end. They just live their lives with a random jumble of assumptions about what is valuable.
Re: 2. There is no plausible ultimate end other than happiness. Concern for other sentient beings is not an ultimate end. It's arbitrary to say that it would be.
I don't see happiness being any less arbitrary. The very idea of an ultimate end is arbitrary.
We are hard-wired to value pleasure. I mean "pleasure" in the broadest, most generic sense. That includes physical pleasure and emotional pleasure.
Pleasure is the only thing that is inherently valuable.
because a person's own happiness is, indeed, their ultimate end
This is what the thought experiment shows to be false.  What is rational depends on one's ends.
Pleasure is the only inherent value. It is given by biology.
So, it is the ultimate end, and any other end has to be for its sake.
A person who holds something else as an ultimate end is simply mistaken and is erecting a mental fiction.
Many people do not hold pleasure as the ultimate end, and that is because they are mistaken.
As a point of clarification, I was willing to say "happiness is the ultimate end" instead of "pleasure is the ultimate end" because they are approximately the same thing. "Happiness" is a good way to sum up what it means to be in a sustained state that consists, mostly, of emotional pleasure.
That most people would not take the pill does not show that pleasure is not an ultimate end. It shows that most people do not recognize the ultimate end. They have false ideas about what is valuable and why.
Pleasure is the only inherent value. It is given by biology.
Please explain. It seems to me that any end we have is the product of biology, so why favour pleasure?
The only ultimate justficiation for any action is that it gives a person pleasure. An action taken for any other ultimate reason would have no value.
I think it should be clear why pleasure has value.
It's probably less obvious that there is no other possible ultimate value. But, if you try to think of one, you won't succeed. That makes sense, because our biology is built to reward pleasure, and only pleasure.
Pleasure, in my use, includes two broad categories: emotional pleasure and physical pleasure. Within physical pleasure you have sating hunger, quenching thirst, getting warm when too cold, getting cold when too warm, and so on.
You can come up with other hypothetical ultimate ends. An altruist may say that his ultimate end is helping people. Religious people have ultimate ends rooted in religion. The problem is, those are not valid ultimate ends. They produce no value, while rejecting an ultimate end that would produce value---namely, pleasure.
You've offered no explanation at all. You've just said that if I try think of something valuable other than pleasure I won't succeed. Even if I grant that pleasure has value its not at all clear why things like fairness or other peoples wellbeing or freedom are valueless. Our biology rewards with pleasure, but that doesn't entail that we should only ever seek this reward. That same biology makes us aim at all sorts of different things, and when we are talking about what to aim at this seems far more relevant.
If you want to claim that fairness or other people's wellbeing are valuable, the burden of proof is on you.
As a side note: Actually, those things could be valuable if they somehow contribute to the ultimate value, which is pleasure. I have lots of values in my life, but they are all valuable because of the ultimate value (pleasure).
That same biology makes us aim at all sorts of different things
No it doesn't. We can choose what to aim for. Biology doesn't make us do anything. However, it does incentivize one and only one ultimate value.
If you want to claim that fairness or other people's wellbeing are valuable, the burden of proof is on you.
I'm not looking to prove that, I'm looking to demonstrate that your position is unwarranted. The burden of proof is on you to demonstrate that pleasure has something these things don't. At the moment, I don't accept that pleasure is any more valuable than those things.
No it doesn't. We can choose what to aim for. Biology doesn't make us do anything. However, it does incentivize one and only one ultimate value.
Most of our aims arn't chosen though. I didn't choose to care about my siblings, but I do. And there are good biological reasons for that. You still haven't drawn the connection between our biology using pleasure as a reward and pleasure being the only ultimate value.
At the moment, I don't accept that pleasure is any more valuable than those things.
Well, I have demonstrated that pleasure is inherently valuable, and you haven't demonstrated that those other things are inherently valuable (i.e., ultimate ends).
Most of our aims arn't chosen though. I didn't choose to care about my siblings, but I do.
You care about your siblings because they have a connection to your own pleasure. I don't have siblings, but if I did, I'm sure I would care about them. I care about other family members that I do have.
Some people don't care about their siblings. If a sibling is a drunken deadbeat who harms other family members, people tend not to care about them. So it's not like people just "automatically" care about siblings. Caring about your siblings or not is based on a complex set of mental premises.
You still haven't drawn the connection between our biology using pleasure as a reward and pleasure being the only ultimate value.
Well, I have shown that pleasure is an ultimate value, though you'd need to think about it and make the observations for yourself. As for being the "only" ultimate value---I can't prove a negative. I can't prove that God doesn't exist, but I'm still an atheist, because the burden of proof is on the people claiming that God does exist.
Well, I have demonstrated that pleasure is inherently valuable
You've done no such thing. You've made some appeals to its being the brains reward, but you've not shown me the connection between that and inherent value.
You care about your siblings because they have a connection to your own pleasure.
What makes you so sure about this? Why not take it to be the other way around. I care about my siblings and so I feel pleasure when good stuff happens to them. And I care about them beyond how much pleasure they bring me.
though you'd need to think about it and make the observations for yourself.
Didn't you say earlier that you had demonstrated that pleasure was inherently valuable? I guess its easier to defend your view by saying your opponent just needs to think about it themself.
As for being the "only" ultimate value---I can't prove a negative. I can't prove that God doesn't exist, but I'm still an atheist, because the burden of proof is on the people claiming that God does exist.
That doesn't mean you get to say "there is no God" and then think you have no burden. You claimed pleasure is the only inherently valuable thing and now you're trying to shift the burden of proof. That was what I objected to, that and its consequence that any goal is irrational if it isn't ones own pleasure. The view I am defending here isn't that there are things other than pleasure that are inherently valuable, its that there is no reason to think that pleasure is any more valuable than these other things. Personally I don't think there is anything that is inherently valuable, "inherent value" being a malformed concept.
A typical reply from the headonist to your argument is that although happiness may be the only ultimate end this does not mean it will be the only thing people persue or the only thing people consider as intrinsically good.  
Given that certain desires and goals will generate personal happiness, those same desires will be postivly renforced. Conversly those desires that lead to our own unhappiness will be negativly renforced. Over time these other desires, that quite likely are not actually about happiness will be aquired by the individual and will be sailient when they are not even considering happiness.
The point is that even if happiness were the only 'ultimate' individual end, a person might well have intrinsic desires for other things as a result of the process of desire formation. That might well include a stong desire to promote the wellbeing of your friends and family.  
Peter Railton has a great paper in which he argues for Headonism as a theory for the ultimate individual good. It isn't quite his own view but he gives it a good go! It includes a fantastic extended metaphore with seaworthyness. I would recomend!
http://philpapers.org/rec/RAINAP
Thanks for the link.  I'll have a look.
The thought experiment is weird. Couple things
First you seem to forget the role socialization plays in being human. We socialize daily. When you're exposed to something every day of your life, it's going to have an effect on you. When you're around people who act miserably every day of your life, it's impossible for miserableness to not grow on you as well. In this case, your red pill does not actually make me happy. Even if you were totally ignorant towards how they felt, you'd still see and have how they act ingrained in your mind. You'd pick up habits here and there and your quality of life goes down. This kind of thing happens all the time.
Second, under the assumption that this thought experiment were perfect, no problems etc, HOW does this show happiness isn't the end result? You would need to know why the person said no to make any sort of judgement calls about this. It's not something simple like "do you want to be happy? No? See it's not the end goal!"
To close out, it seems to me that you're talking about the Aristotelean school of thought, but keep in mind that he was alive hundreds of years ago and spoke a different language. When we refer to what he's talking about as "happiness," it's an imperfect translation. Some people call it human flourishing, which carries a totally different meaning. Just a thought if that is what you're referring to.
In this case, your red pill does not actually make me happy.
That's impossible, as it is stipulated that the red pill does make you happy.
It's not something simple like "do you want to be happy? No? See it's not the end goal!"
Why is it not so simple?
Happiness is such a broad term its hard to say exactly how it's achieved and what constitutes true happiness. Though one could argue that in order to focus on the happiness of others you must first be completely satisfied with yourself. personally, i put the happiness of others before myself which backfires a lot. but i don't change my ways. i don't dwell on the happiness of others where i have little. It all depends on one's personal beliefs and whether or not they have the mental capacity to put others before themselves
A popular candidate for ultimate ends amoungst naturalists is 'that which an idealised version of myself would desire that I desire', where idealised means 'with full relevant information, unhindered rational capability, and full imaginative capability'.   
This certainly wouldn't be victim to your counter example,although it does of course have its own problems! Perhaps the biggest imidiate problem is that it might be underspecifid in terms of giving only one ultimate end for each individual. But there are arguments both ways.
'that which an idealised version of myself would desire that I desire'
But what if such an idealized version would result in desires that are sometimes in conflict--such as happiness and concern for others?
The idea is that goodness is that which an idealised version would desire the actual version to desire.  So while they might well have conflicting desires even after rational reflection, it seems plausible they would still be able to make a decision. Given we can make decisions of this kind without idealisation it doesn't seem outrageous to suppose an ideal version of ourselves could also.
I would think most people want to know their existence has purpose and meaning
But why would they want to know this? Could this not simply reduce to happiness?
OP is right. The human experience abounds with examples that are explainable in terms of the search for happiness, but just don't quite fit, even given our expansive definition. Take for instance some examples of selfless sacrifice. There are more things in heaven and earth.
1) I think so, though you do confuse personal happiness with a more general happiness.  Nonetheless I think that you are right that happiness is a poor goal.  I see it as being akin to winning an Oscar.  In other words, happiness is the feedback you get for pursuing your goal successfully, it's not the goal in itself.  You don't really want the Oscar, what you want is to make a film that is worthy of winning of it.
2) Sure -- success, spiritual fulfillment, acceptance by a social group, the satisfaction of knowing that your talents are being applied to their greatest capacity, ensuring the thriving of your fellow sentient beings in the future, causing happiness in others.  I don't mean to imply that these are universal, but each of these seems like its an ultimate end for someone.
success, spiritual fulfillment, acceptance by a social group, the satisfaction of knowing that your talents are being applied to their greatest capacity
Could these not simply reduce to happiness?
ensuring the thriving of your fellow sentient beings in the future, causing happiness in others
And could these not simply reduce to concern for others?
No, I don't think so.
You may be terrifically unhappy every day of your life managing this massive project to build the Brooklyn Bridge.  Every day you are doing hard labor, having friends die around you.  You would be much happier curling up on a hammock with a good book and playing ball with your kids.  But you feel the project is important enough that it's worth the sacrifices you make to your personal happiness in order to get it done.  This is a different kind of fulfillment than merely doing what makes you happy each day.
Similarly many a great scientist or philosopher has abandoned the simple, happy life in pursuit of something else entirely: truth -- about the universe, about human nature, etc...
Nozick's "Experience Machine" is a good example of how most of us would choose truth over happiness.
But you feel the project is important enough that it's worth the sacrifices you make to your personal happiness in order to get it done
Presumably you mean "important enough" to other people, so this aspect of your motivation reduces to concern for others.
Similarly many a great scientist or philosopher has abandoned the simple, happy life in pursuit of something else entirely: truth -- about the universe, about human nature, etc...
But why would you want to know the truth if not for self-interest and/or concern for others?
But why would you want to know the truth if not for self-interest and/or concern for others?
For it's own sake.  That's precisely the point.  It is an end in itself.
Did you read about the "experience machine"?  What did you think of it?
For it's own sake. 
Then presumably you would be motivated to count all of the blades of grass in your local park because you would just want to know the truth of how many there are.  Reductio.
Did you read about the "experience machine"? What did you think of it?
With respect to self-interest, I see no reason why I would not enter the machine.
Then presumably you would be motivated to count all of the blades of grass in your local park because you would just want to know the truth of how many there are. Reductio.
I'm not sure why you jumped to an assumption that all truth is of equal value to everyone.  I didn't say that.  I could make a similarly ludicrous example of happiness coming from schadenfreude.  Shouldn't we be injuring others for our pleasure?  But of course, that exaggeration is silly.  I have a much stronger desire to know the basic workings of the universe than the number of blades of grass in a park.  All knowledge, like all happiness, is not equal.
With respect to self-interest, I see no reason why I would not enter the machine.
That's fine.  For you, happiness is paramount.  But you should also recognize that because most respondents would not enter the machine, that this thought experiment implies that your predilection is not universal.  Happiness is not the ultimate end for all.
I have a much stronger desire to know the basic workings of the universe than the number of blades of grass in a park.
Why?
But you should also recognize that because most respondents would not enter the machine...Happiness is not the ultimate end for all
Or maybe it is just a failure of imagination.
Why?
Why do you desire happiness?  I desire such truths for the same reason.
Or maybe it is just a failure of imagination.
Unable to imagine anything more important than happiness opens you up to the same charge of course.
Why do you desire happiness?
This question makes no sense, as the benefit of happiness is self-evident.
I desire such truths for the same reason.
By contrast, the benefit of possessing truth is not self-evident.  So again, I ask:  Why?
Unable to imagine anything more important than happiness opens you up to the same charge of course.
With respect to self-interest, I indeed cannot imagine anything more important than happiness.  If you can, then please provide support for your candidate.
How about length of life?
Being happy is dependent on being alive, so the longer one's lifespan, the greater potential for happiness. 
The common counterargument is that this would potentially lead to overpopulation on Earth. I agree that society would have to adapt to meet the needs of an increasingly exponentially growing population. However, I believe it's possible to reject most economic concerns. If the price of living a significantly longer life is greater investment in research and a decrease in the quality of lifestyle, I for one would gladly accept. Economies are important, but only as a means to human ends.
Isn't the red pill basically just a shit ton of heroin to the point you OD and your friends/family suffer by having to know that you were a drug addict and be sad cause you died?
It depends on the motivations that each individual has. 
Also, it depends on the strength of someones character.
If someone is already selfish and only does things to satisfy their own needs/wants no matter what damage it does to others, then they are selfish enough to take the pill. In fact, they are pretty much already on the path of following of the points made.
If someone is more on the selfless side of the scale and naturally wants to help those around them, they won't want to take the pill.
The thought of causing the people they love harm hurts them and will most likely push them further away from the idea of taking this pill.
For those in the middle, it would be a true test of character. It would surely force them to decide which side of the scale they truly tip the most. The choice is yes or no, not maybe. 
I agree that concern for others is not an ultimate end for everyone.  Sociopaths, for example, have little or no concern for others.
I enjoyed entertaining this experiment but from my perspective there is a problem with it.  I would never choose ignorance because I value truth above my own happiness. Just how I feel... 
I think seeing other people happy makes us happy, and that we cannot be happy ourselves if we know our loved ones are suffering. So there is a problem with your experiment, you're asking the person to knowingly make their friends suffer. Of course they will be ignorant of the fact had they taken the pill already. But they haven't.
1.The Buddha abandoned his family to pursue happiness (specifically the cessation of suffering) and, while not ignorant of their suffering, he certainly felt their suffering was worthwhile in some sense.
So no, I think the example mostly succeeds in showing that:
A) Happiness can be made unpalatable with the right example and
B) We're lucky happiness is more complicated than taking a pill, or we'd all die from drug overdoses!
2.Beauty and Understanding easily fill the top three goals with happiness. The one thing the example does point out is that many people hate blissful ignorance. This may demonstrate our desire for understanding or the beauty of living a compassionate life, but also that the stability and longevity of our happiness can matter as much as the degree of it.
What is your reasoning fit not taking the red pill? 
Two answers:
(1) It shows you will be more happy choosing to not take the pill.
(2) I do not know.
This is a crude experiment. No, I would not take the pill. The ultimate end is knowledge. Knowing the effects of the choice to take the pill or not intentionally sways the audience to your own beliefs. Suppose this experiment was different and only /u/danhors knew the outcome of taking the red pill. Do you think the answers would be the same? Suppose, again, in this experiment, that red velvet cake was offered instead of a pill. I would be much more inclined to take a slice of cake from someone than a red pill. I don't like pills. I certainly would not take one from a stranger.  In short, yes - your experiment suckceeds . Another "ultimate end" of philosophy is to address the human condition, to ease the suffering of man. The benefits of taking this pill do not out weigh the side effects. 
The truth is, there are no truths, and change is the only constant. Meanwhile the Universe consists of non-simultaneously apprehended events. The end is never the end. A new challenge awaits. A test no man could be prepared for. A new hell he must conquer and destroy. A new level of growth he must confront himself. Also don't forget about the reason people do drugs... to escape the predictability and mundane feeling of the familiar. If you're always striving to be happy, and let's even pretend you succeeded. After a certain quantity of time, it would hold no more value for you, because just like doing heroin for the 100th time, it's just not even close to that first time. Everything in moderation, it is key. Experience life FULLY. Even the sad and the bad. 
Often the sad difficult becomes the most illuminating.  Emotions are amazing and necessary.  You make a great point. 
Thank you, it's also a shame when people get confused, and lack understanding, they spontaneously click down vote without re-thinking their conclusion. Whilst simultaneously hiding a deep, and heart felt message, away from others who may have found it intriguing. Just primitive monkey DNA at work I suppose. Good day to you sir. 
You're being downvoted because your comment is confusing and unclear. This sentence for example:
The truth is, there are no truths, and change is the only constant.
Is self contradictory. And also seems to contradict the rest of your post where you go on to say a bunch of things you presumedly think are true.
Language is not 1 for 1, or absolute in any variety. I was simply making an attempt to convey my thoughts concerning a subject requiring much more than the commonly utilized black & white perception can offer. Hence my seemingly contradictory vernacular. If you don't understand it I apologize, but my grammar and wordage are not to blame. 
Question 1: It makes people think that happiness is not the ultimate end, but people are easily confused. Consider where we get our morals from. 
Question 2: Nope. Well, happiness is a weird word. Suffice to say we only do what we want in to do. We can and will only ever choose to do what we want to do. Of course limited by the realm of possibility.
